FlyPolar [info] 31M for 35F. Have been dating LO for around 2 months now. About a week ago she bumped into her last ex and it brought back all sorts of bad mental issues, as a result she's asked for space while she sorts through them. I was fine for maybe a day?? Then the obsessive thoughts switching from elated ecstasy to gut wrenching anxiety started and haven't let up since. In February after a lifetime of mental unrest I was diagnosed with bipolar. Since being on medication my mental state has cleared up so much (with a lot of work as well as the meds). I've had some minor limerence episodes since then but this is a big one rearing up. I'm not stupid or in the depths of uncontrolled mental illness this time though! I found an issue with myself and got to researching what I can do about it.At about 3pm today I came to the realisation that the negative side of things was adult separation anxiety, then after a few searches I found a post about it in this sub."Limerence? What the hell is that". Proceed to me scouring the Wiki entry. It reads like a script to every relationship I had or wanted for all of my life, right back to the first girl I had a crush on.Despite my mood chart for the day being as low as it can get I'm so happy to have been able to put a name to the face of one of my biggest issues. I felt like I could've cried with happiness at one point.Can anyone recommend any good resources for managing the condition?
viral_snyde [info] I mean. I just dont have an attachment to being alive is the best way to put it. I dont care that I'm alive but I get so envious of death around me. I was suicidal for a long time and dealt with childhood abuse up until the age of 22. Things are better now and I'm fine. I ho to therapy, take my medication. I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder, but my medication has it under control for the most part.I'm just not too keen on being alive. I just got informed my brother has a high possibility of being COVID positive and aside from the concern of the money involved, I'm actually quite excited. I mean, what if I get sick? Hopefully no one else does. Hopefully it can just be me and I can die from it.I just don't think I should be alive. It just feels wrong.
mattsulli [info] I had a fiancée before I married my wife. During an alcohol withdrawal stint at a hospital I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder. I never sought treatment and let my behavior get worse and worse until she finally left me. I beat myself up over and over again, cutting, lashing out, drinking, spending days crying and other days going out trying to get myself killed on the streets of Baltimore. When I spent a couple of years dealing with this and getting a little better, I met my now wife. I was honest with her about my disorder but lied pretty heavily about my past. When I eventually got on some insurance plan I started seeking treatment. I became more honest with my wife about my past because I began to understand that as long as I got better I could unload the truth and she would understand. She has. Past that, getting on meds and understanding the nature of my old behaviors has allowed me to come to terms with losing a woman whom I loved dearly. I don’t know why I’m typing all of this out. I’m just saying that this will pass like ever other terrible thing that’s happened to you and you will find someone who loves and supports you for who you are. Stay strong.
rule1n2n3 [info] Somewhat highjacking this thread:I had the opposite experience recently, I am diagnosed with bipolar 2 and plagued with mostly depression.I had edible a couple days ago, had too much (always with edibles, they are ticking timebombs) and felt like shit for the next day til now.Is there a thing as too much? Does it actually give you the opposite effect?
itsbudgie [info] I've been diagnosed with bipolar and borderline personality disorder and a few other things and in all cases my psychiatrist used my past medical history and other information from other psychiatrists to come up with a diagnosis. If I was you write down what you think your symptoms are and also write down questions you want to ask your doctor. Good luck for the future my friend hope things workout really well for you
anarashka [info] I was prescribed amitriptyline early on in my diagnosis, along with several other medications. It worked great! Except for a previously unknown problem.  Some time after about 3 weeks, I began waking up in places I don't remember falling asleep. When I woke up with half of my bottle of pain relievers scattered on the counter, I stopped taking it.Years later, I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder. Amitriptyline and I don't get along. It causes fugue states.
unkemptsnugglepepper [info] I put myself in a hospital because of suicidal ideation.  I kinda suspected it, but I didn't really accept it until I was looking at a pamphlet that had the symptoms while hanging out in the ER. I knew I had depression since around 6th grade, I was diagnosed with bipolar II when I was 21.     I suggest going to your primary care doctor and explain the symptoms.  They'll recommend you to a psychiatrist for further evaluation and medication.  Possibly a therapist too.  I also suggest cutting out substance use, as it can interact with the medication, especially alcohol.
HB1C [info] That struck me too. I used to think meds weren’t necessary until I was diagnosed with bipolar-boy was I wrong! After 3 years of going on and off them and having destructive manic episodes, it turns out I do need them if I’d like to live a productive life.Just like any other chronic condition (diabetes, rheumatoid arthritis, insert your disease of choice). There is no shame in needing a medication, and mental health (including sobriety!) is just as important as physical health, if not more.And major NTA-I hope your husband can get back on the path to recovery ASAP.
shibany [info] That's what I thought at first when I was diagnosed with bipolar 2, but I don't think that every time I feel good it's an "episode" and that I need to cool my jets...since starting tracking my moods and activities a month ago I'm beginnj g to see that sometimes I feel good BECAUSE I did stuff, not the other way around, y'know? Also, when I'm hypomanic I feel agitation beneath the euphoria, like I haven't done enough or I don't feel in control. Anyway, noticing those differences is helping me enjoy...life more. Instead of looking over my shoulder for the demon every time I'm starting to enjoy it.
sadcthulu [info] Yes! But I am diagnosed with bipolar 2 disorder.
missholls910 [info] It’s so true! I’m a millennial and there are so many people that I grew up with that claimed they had some sort of mental illness that they over came when really it was like they had a hard day once. On the flip side, my boomer mother.... when I told her I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder I had to explain to her that I was not “going all crazy like Charlie Sheen”. And when I told her it was genetic, her response was “well it certainly didn’t come from me”. After the conversation she then proceeded to spend $20,000 for a weekend trip to the Kentucky derby.....
justalurkerkthxbai [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar II disorder and given medication. It made all the difference in the world.
capricorn_bus [info] I am SO GLAD that you posted this. Before I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 last fall, I described (what I didn't know was) hypomania as getting a star in Mario Kart while driving on Rainbow Road, except the power-up (and the road) never stopped--like you can't brake or exit. Neither of them (my therapist or psychiatrist) understood the reference (lol) but it was one of the only ways I knew how to describe it.
ByePolarCoordinates [info] I’m sorry you are going through this. It’s not an easy journey. I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder several years into my marriage. I had been with my partner for about ten years at that point when things started to manifest as severe, recurrent depressions. Depression excels at feeding those afflicted terrible, soul-crushing lies about their environment and self-worth. When I was in this state and was approached by my husband for physical intimacy, it was terrifying. I cared for my husband, but I was incapable of feeling any love for myself. The whole idea of sharing myself with someone felt threatening and foreign. Over time, frustrations and resentments grew, and I felt so pressured any time the subject came up. I needed better communication and I would have hugely benefited from strengthening emotional intimacy during this precarious time without any expectation of sex. I needed validation and we needed open honesty. I needed to feel safe. But over time his resentment grew because his needs were not being met. Because I was constantly being pressured, any time he became affectionate this would often trigger me and make me fear it would lead to sex. I hated this feeling - it felt like almost a loss of trust on my end. I was afraid to be touched, and physical touch has always been one of my top love languages. It did not help my sense of alienation or my depression. During an episode, my husband talked me into a night where I would submit and let him seduce me. I wanted to feel good and please him despite all the lies my mind was feeding me. It ended up being emotionally overwhelming and I spent a couple of hours crying in the bathroom afterwards. He had nothing to say to me and seemed irritated which made things worse. Some of his behavior was certainly selfish. But I know for the most part he felt personally rejected or perhaps inadequate with each disappointing exchange, and I wish I had had the capacity to communicate that I still wanted and needed him. Depression doesn’t just hurt its sufferers. It affects us all. It’s not an easy road to travel. Is your partner in treatment? This makes a big difference. I would prioritize emotional intimacy right now. Physical intimacy may follow naturally once she feels safe and supported. My husband and I eventually sought counseling while I was in treatment but it was probably too late to repair our relationship. Once I properly stabilized, my husband later admitted he didn’t think he knew how to properly emotionally support me and that he needed to work on that. We separated and our divorce was finalized last year. I’m stable, happy, and healthy and have enjoyed much better physical intimacy with men that communicate and emote. :)
ProxiC3 [info] I take Vyvanse (90 mg), Latuda and Lithium.  I used to take Dexedrine and Vyvanse but they recently switched it to a higher dose of Vyvanse.I was diagnosed with bipolar first.  My psychologist was the first to see the ADHD, so then I got an independent assessment done with a psychiatrist who specializes in comorbid disorders.  He agreed with the ADHD.
gentle_but_strong [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder last fall. Before that, I would experience these highs and lows that I didn’t understand. I would be really depressed for months, and then hyperactive/on top of the world for others. My grades were either stellar or subpar. I was either the sweetest most upbeat girl around, or the most depressing and moody elephant in the room. It ruined friendships, how I handled conflict, how much I could grow as a person. Now, I am medicated. Now that the fog has lifted so to speak, I’m able to look back on all the horrible things I did and how horribly I treated my partner (he’s a saint and has literally helped me through this diagnosis more than anything), embarrassing moments, money wasted, etc. I am now doing much better, my relationship is in excellent shape, and I’m able to critically think and react in an acceptable way. This was the worst experience with mental health. If you think something’s wrong, please get treatment, because you are hurting people whether you realize it or not.
fullfacejunkie [info] My sister has BPD and she is so genuinely caring even though she may go on and on about certain topics and ruminate and get overly excited. But she cares so much about others even over herself.When I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder, I asked my doctor if it was possible that it was actually BPD. She said, "no, you wanna know why? Because I like you." No, people with BPD aren't all monsters or unlikable and I bet she's misdiagnosed people just because they weren't class-A monsters. 
Stilllovemyring [info] Do you know the bipolar subreddits?  join!I am diagnosed with bipolar 1. For me it’s medication or death during an episode. I struggled for years to come to terms with having to take my meds but ultimately they make my life much more worth living. Thats just my personal experience. It can be such a struggle and you’re tough for getting this far.
wooptyd00 [info] You're downvoting all my posts and asserting my non-schizo diagnosis was not properly done. You sound like a passive aggressive troll trying to convince me I'm schizo... This wasn't the only time I was diagnosed with bipolar btw. My personal psychiatrist diagnosed me with bipolar years before that hospital did.
starter_kit [info] After a psychotic episode put me in the hospital 9 years ago I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder.  I'm still learning how to cope.Two years ago my Dx was changed to Schizoaffective disorder-bipolar type.During the first six years of life after my initial diagnosis I took my meds and lived a relatively stable, mostly fulfilling and very productive life.  I also supplemented my medicine with copious amounts of alcohol.  With time the meds and booze were working so well that my doctor changed my status to "in remission".  This turned out to be a bad move as I quickly became relaxed with treatment.  Psychotic behavior returned and I ended up in the hospital for a second and third time.Coming to terms with the fact that I have a chronic life long condition is daunting.  I don't always think about it but at least once or twice a day I feel terrorized by my illness.Medication is a must.  Therapy needs to be considered and tried.  Group support has been invaluable to me.  Other things I find that are helpful for managing my affliction are journaling, mood tracking, hiking and playing my music at top volume.I've been changed by my illness.  I am far more lonely but also far more resilient.  I am far more anxious but have a greater sense of gratitude.  My meds dull my experiences but I have filled in some gaps in my intellect.Good luck on your your journey.  Consider  and   There is quallity support in the world if you are committed to wellness.
lavloves [info] There are people out there that NEVER realize that they’re an asshole, or manipulative, or just a hard headed person. Either they never realize it or they’ve got their head stuck too far up their ass that they will absolutely not admit to it, or even attempt to see it. This is a VERY goof thing that you’ve noticed. I never really thought about how bad I was in highschool/middle school, until I got on my old iPad ( it synced to my old phone and all of these texts from way back were on there. ) from how I treated my friends, from how I treated the guys I dated, Once I saw those texts, I felt so disgusted with myself. In one convo this poor guy I had dated was pouring his heart out to me, telling me that I broke his heart and had cheated on him, and I was cussing him out in return and calling him all sorts of names. I felt so bad I was in tears, I actually sent him a message telling him that I’m so sorry and I cannot believe I used to be like that, and you know what he said? “Wow! This is something I never expected to hear!”. I must have been pretty damn bad. He was very sweet about it though and told me he forgave me a long time ago. I believe I apologized to a few other people as well, and there’s still some I wish I could apologize to, but I’m no longer able to get in touch with them. I didn’t have a very good home life, my parents divorced. Lots of fighting between me and my mom, whom I didn’t live with, me and my dad always fought and argued, I mean yelling in each other’s faces fighting, verbally abusive, he had a girlfriend who was terrible to me, I just wasn’t very happy and I guess I let myself take it out on those who were around me. I was on antidepressants from a really young age, I think 13? I never really thought my home life was that bad, until I started to think back on it a little bit and I realized how broken it actually was, and how it broke me. Just because there were other households a lot worse than mine, doesn’t mean it wasn’t terrible. Leaving my childhood home, and moving out was probably the best thing to happen to me in terms for my mental health. I also smoked a lot of weed, which I think also made me reflect on myself and life a lot, I’m not saying you need to do this I’m just saying I think it definitely switched something in my brain lmao. Maybe I’m just permastoned and permanently “chilled out”.I have a way better relationship with both of my parents now, I have had stable friends for years who I love to death, I’m engaged to a great man who brings out the good in me, I have been diagnosed with bipolar 2, which I’m not saying is an excuse to be mean, but it could have been a factor in all of my past assholeishness. I actually think that I still feel so guilty of how I used to be to people that I try to overcompensate when it comes to helping people out, or giving advice. I just want people to know that I’m there for them and that I’ll listen. Because that’s probably what old me needed the most, was somebody to listen and understand. You have a lot of time to reflect and think on this, think of some of the worst things you’ve done or said to people, think of how much that hurt said person, think of how they must have felt.. and put yourself in their shoes. Really think on your life right now, at a glance you may think everything is fine and nothing seems bad, because you may be living comfortably, not struggling with money, parents might still be together, but that doesn’t mean things aren’t going haywire and you’re maybe just oblivious to it. I’m not saying this is what’s happening. If you really want to change, you will. You’re feeling guilt, and noticing your habits, that’s GOOD. Just try to understand yourself more, it takes time but eventually you’ll see how your brain works and you’ll be able to figure out why you say or do what, or why you react a certain way to things..  the rest will come easier afterwards. Good luck man.
Mellamellamella [info] I am bipolar and unmedicated. It's going pretty terribly if I'm being honest. I was supposed to have a psych consult on the 19th so I could start medication but it was cancelled. I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder in November and was put on a waitlist for the medication consult. I finally get called, and then this global pandemic happens and they said I'll get a call next month, meaning I'm probably not getting in until May. I just feel like I'm getting worse but there is actually nothing I can do because I won't be able to get a prescription to stabilize my mood for a while. So each night I just go to sleep crossing my fingers hoping I don't wake up feeling worse.
bettygreatwhite [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar II 6 years into my marriage. I was first diagnosed with really bad post-partum and then regular depression that just wouldn't respond to medication.  It sucked, but not knowing what was wrong with me was worse. Thankfully, my husband who had been my friend for years and then my partner for 8, has stuck through it and is an integral part of my support system. We're just figuring it out as we go. Basically, this is a long way of saying that I get what you've gone/are going through. 
viral_snyde [info] I mean. I just dont have an attachment to being alive is the best way to put it. I dont care that I'm alive but I get so envious of death around me. I was suicidal for a long time and dealt with childhood abuse up until the age of 22. Things are better now and I'm fine. I ho to therapy, take my medication. I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder, but my medication has it under control for the most part.I'm just not too keen on being alive. I just got informed my brother has a high possibility of being COVID positive and aside from the concern of the money involved, I'm actually quite excited. I mean, what if I get sick? Hopefully no one else does. Hopefully it can just be me and I can die from it.I just don't think I should be alive. It just feels wrong.
sony_alarm_clock [info] I'm so sorry this is happening. I was diagnosed with bipolar three years ago and I know it can be hard for people to live with me sometimes, you're really strong for sticking with it. I don't know if this will help at all, but once I got a diagnosis and a good psychiatrist and therapist, I've been able to live a fairly stable life for a good while. There's hope that things will get better.&#x200B;I'm sorry to hear about your father, that's heartbreaking. Have you considered seeing a therapist? One might be able to help you sort out some emotions and figure out ways to cope and communicate. I'm here if you want to talk, hang in there 
idreamofcake [info] I was diagnosed with major depressive disorder from my early teens to my late thirties, when I was diagnosed with bipolar 2. And getting proper treatment changed my life. So it's definitely worth looking into.I can't diagnose you over the internet, but you should definitely see a psychiatrist for a diagnosis. Your agoraphobia is more than just social anxiety if you can't leave the house. It sounds like the SSRI'S aren't helping you, and even if you don't have bipolar, working with a psychiatrist to try different classes of medications would be helpful. I'm hoping the best for you in your mental health journey.
AmNotLost [info] I tell them by date 3 or so. Though sometimes I'll start it as "you know how some people have epilepsy and their brain goes all haywire in their motor cortex sometimes? Well I kinda get something similar, but instead it's in my amygdala, so my emotions will not match my current experience. And sometimes it isn't like a quick thing, sometimes it can last for a while until my brain can heal a little. So if I get a sudden mood shift and I don't seem like myself, go ahead and ask if I'm ok, but please never ever assume it's that you've done or said something wrong. I'm usually aware it's happening and ASAP try to find a calming spot to de-stimulate for a while. But I know I'm not always in the moment able to vocalize exactly why I left the room, or whatever, right when I'm doing it."Though if they seem to have any experience with mental health or the medical profession, I usually just say "hey, just kinda FYI, I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 when I was 28. I've been hospitalized once, but now that I have meds that work most no one would ever notice."gentle_but_strong [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder last fall. Before that, I would experience these highs and lows that I didn’t understand. I would be really depressed for months, and then hyperactive/on top of the world for others. My grades were either stellar or subpar. I was either the sweetest most upbeat girl around, or the most depressing and moody elephant in the room. It ruined friendships, how I handled conflict, how much I could grow as a person. Now, I am medicated. Now that the fog has lifted so to speak, I’m able to look back on all the horrible things I did and how horribly I treated my partner (he’s a saint and has literally helped me through this diagnosis more than anything), embarrassing moments, money wasted, etc. I am now doing much better, my relationship is in excellent shape, and I’m able to critically think and react in an acceptable way. This was the worst experience with mental health. If you think something’s wrong, please get treatment, because you are hurting people whether you realize it or not.shadowscale1031 [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 while in college. It was definitely challenging, as the chaos of college and the chaos of bipolar don’t often go well together. That said, I still graduated and have done well since, so here are some things that have helped me, although many I didn’t learn until after graduation.-Get established with a mental heath provider early, especially if you’re on medication. It can take awhile, and you don’t want to navigate that system while in crisis. Campus therapists aren’t always great with managing illnesses like bipolar, but they can help with managing stress and the transition to college life.-Take your medication consistently. There were times when I would go off mood stabilizers during hypomania to get a “manic boost” during a particularly busy time. Don’t do that. The ugly side of hypomania doesn’t take long to come out.-Get enough sleep. Way easier said than done, but I’ve found that my emotional stability is nonexistent when I don’t sleep. This is one I only figured out once I graduated and actually had a regular sleep schedule.-Find what motivates you and make sure it’s somewhere you’re reminded often. I’m a goal-oriented person, so thinking about how what I’m doing (or not doing) will affect those goals helps me stay focused. In college, I changed my laptop background to whatever motivator I needed at the time (gentle support, kick in the ass, funny and relatable, my pets). Phone backgrounds as well. -Find a support system, aka make friends. Join clubs that interest you. It’ll help you feel more invested in staying. Networking with professionals in my field through campus events also helped with motivation, because it helped excite me about what I could do once I had my degree.-Learn your limits. Manic me likes to sign me up for way more than non-manic me can handle. If that happens, don’t be afraid to step back from lower priority things. I once had to resign from an extracurricular I cared a lot about due to academic overload, and I still remember my advisor saying “You’re here to get a degree, not to be Vice President of this club”. -Learn how to cope with stress. You mention alcohol, and at one point I did develop a problem because I was using it as a coping mechanism for stress. Once I realized I couldn’t keep drinking like I was and still meet my goals (see point above), I changed and learned other ways to manage stress. But I had to hit that breaking point to finally start learning healthy coping mechanisms. If you can, try to find those before you end up too deep in something harmful.-Be kind to yourself. Learning to live with bipolar is mostly trial and error as you figure out triggers, treatments, and coping mechanisms that work for you. There will be a lot of failures and mistakes, but the faster you can get back up and move forward with what you’ve learned, the better off you’ll be.I hope this helps. Good luck!
_killjoy99 [info] I prefer female therapists and psychiatrists because I've had bad experiences with male doctors. My first psychiatrist was male when I was 14-17 and he just chalked up all my symtoms (including self hard, attempts at my own life,  eating disorders and depression so bad I couldn't leave my bed for over 6 months) as my "hormones balancing" and that "puberty is difficult on females because their whole biological function changes in order to prepare for having children" which apparently included me being so depressed I needed hospitalization. He also refused to connect me with help after I turned 18 because "my hormones won't be raging then" and I was left without help until I found it on my own. Since I've been diagnosed with bipolar 2, generalized anxiety disorder, OCD, and EDNOS and am working towards being better. But also fuck dr. Stein for saying girls just get depressed as teens because of "raging hormones"
ontopofyourmom [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder when I was 29. It has ruined my life. I do what I can to make things better, but this is a serious and chronic illness that I will have until the day I die.I suspect that the other poster is in an analogous situation.You ask what we have learned? We've learned a lot - but nothing we can learn will make us get better or reduce our symptoms. Diseases affect plants' ability to grow. The same thing is true for human beings.Our growth might be going up a flight of stairs in a 100-story building that we used to work at the top of. It's a step in the right direction, but it's not going to solve your problems - especially when you have to stop at every floor for more bullshit.Please acknowledge this and cut out the toxic positivity.
loony1uvgood [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 but I feel all of this. I now wonder if there's comorbidity. Is that possible or it was wrong diagnosis. Especially awareness of self destructive behavior.
lsmels [info] Hi I'm diagnosed with bipolar 2 and GAD. I take seroquel XR and took it all through my pregnancy and currently while BFing. I was on 200mg but dropped it down to 50mg. I'm also prescribed klonopin as needed but I'm much more leery to take this if I know I'll be feeding soon and I only took it 2 or 3 times during pregnancy. My psych is super conscientious about meds and pregnancy and made me nervous about benzos while breastfeeding. My psych, OB and baby's pediatrician all know about the seroquel and didn't have an issue with it, and I didn't notice any withdrawal symptoms in him after birth. I also used to take lamictal and my psych didn't have any issue with that but did tell me to start taking a folic acid supplement along with my prenatal due to he chance of neural tube defects.
bipolarpug [info] Can I ask what bipolar type you are? Are you on any other medication? How often do you smoke? I've been diagnosed with bipolar II, but I've long struggled with anxiety depression and ADD. Smoking always gives me perspective on my mental health that makes me realize everything will be alright, like you describe. But other times it gives me really bad anxiety and panic attacks, I always question whether it is safe for me or not as there is such conflicting anecdotal evidence everywhere..
all__lies__and__jest [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and depression first. An antidepressant sent me into hypomania. That’s how I was diagnosed with bipolar.
glorywesst [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar2 when I was 40ish. Before that I simply got treatment for my depression. I’m 59 now and thinking that I have ADHD and maybe even some form of autism.I plan to get tested for ADHD to see if this is true. The more I’ve been reading on Reddit and seeing myself, it’s getting very scary. Also it answer so many questions about issues I’ve had for years. I am totally terrified of stimulants though as a treatment plan. Stimulants make me rage, and I have been in a hypo manic phase now for several months and it’s killing me. Maybe even mixed episodes, I’m not sure, the crying is totally out of control. Rages are something else. They scare me and those around me.If I wasn’t a person of faith, I don’t know what would happen. But because I am a person of faith, I know all this crap in my brain is not reality and I’m able to hang on until it passes. Also, I’m old enough to have seen the phases come and go. So I do know that things change, and can change for the better when getting treatment. I have appointments this week and next to follow up on all of this.I hope you will continue with your treatment and be able to tough it out. Better things wait for you on the other side.Edited to say: Your symptoms sound terribly similar to mine. Although I don’t have a diagnosis of ADHD I am going to try and find out if I have it.
speculatingserpent [info] I've been diagnosed with bipolar 2 disorder, GAD, and ADHD.
abc3612 [info] I get why you are asking this and although I was diagnosed with bipolar after having kids so I may have decided differently had I known prior, my kids are the reason I keep going every single day. They have saved me from myself more times than I can count. I do worry about one of them becoming bipolar but I also feel like it makes me mindful of their mental health and I’m ready to step in and help them should they ever need it. That is something I wish my parents had done.
alisa_emily [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar2 about 9 years ago, and I only just started EMDR to address underlying trauma last month. Getting a diagnosis is scary, but now you can start to get better. It will be really hard, but you can find treatment that works for you.
theskittlestubesock [info] Before I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 I was on Effexor. It made me really manic. Then once I was diagnosed they added lithium and it helped but I still got mania quite often. It really helped with depression though.
Sneezehiccupfart [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 disorder in 2010. I met my future husband 9 months later. I think in the beginning what I did was make personal goals and was determined not to date until I felt better about myself and put in effort into meaningful friendships. Well one of those friendships blossomed into a marriage. I told him about my diagnosis about 1mo in and gave him an out bur he never took it. I would say love is absolutely possible, but I would focus on meaningful relationships first. Once you build yourself up it will inevitably happen. You dont have to spill everything on a first date. Challenge yourself to go a few months without dating and see where things lead.
plmtigr [info] Just replying to let you know that reading this warmed my heart, because I identify with it so much. I discovered polyamory (now relationship anarchy) before I was diagnosed with bipolar. My partner who I was originally monogamous also has agency and chooses to remain monogamous. Space is such an essential component in my life, I can never imagine being the way that I am and living with someone else without eventually lashing out and/or being triggered into a depressive episode. I need space to learn things about myself without any external influences.
UpsAndDownsNeverEnd [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 in the late winter a little over 4 years ago. It all started when I was roughly 18. I remember my high school girlfriend crying because she just couldn't seem to make me happy. That was the beginning of years of emotional hell. Bipolar 2 is focused around depression, and my episodes would last months at a time. Relatively long compared to how most cycle. But what got me in was a 1 month manic episode. Toward the end after a month of mistakes I was with this girl coming down off of mdma. She gave me a xanax and it ripped me out of the manic episode. Over the course of a couple hours I went from the happiest person in the world to staring down suicidal thoughts again. Few days later, was scrambling to get help cause I wasn't going to survive another year without help. I've been going regularly since, cause I know if I go without medication I probably will take my own life. Medication isn't perfect, still get depressed. But nothing like it used to be. 
thatgirlanya [info] Definitely look into bipolar. Adhd and bipolar are often diagnosed together. I was diagnosed with bipolar first and then adhd. Once I got the right mood stabilizer, it literally changed my life. I didn’t realize the kind of behavior I was exhibiting until I was stable. I’m able to take stimulants and mood stabilizers and I don’t have any problems with them inducing mania. I can see how if you aren’t stabilized, stimulants could easily cause mania. Hope you find some answers!
kcl086 [info] For me it was impulsivity. I had a psychiatrist tell me I just needed to talk to my therapist about it after talking to me for 15 minutes. I had a back up appointment with an APRN a week later. After taking a 90 minute history, I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder.
lollypopsandcupcakes [info] I feel that if I am diagnosed with bipolar disorder or any other mental illness my Nmom would have the same reaction. I hope that over time there is a possibility that he comes to accept it and gets help
twandar [info] I completely understand. I got a tattoo of a psychic vision I had to remind me of my psychic abilities and the spiritual realm. A month later I was diagnosed with bipolar and realized I'm not psychic. I'm actually psychotic and now I have a tattoo to remind me of that every day. It taunted me for a long time until I decided to add to it to represent my bipolar hallucinations. I've entitled it "psychic vs psychotic--the thin line between perception and reality." It's also just a low quality tattoo. So it also stands for imperfection and having to live with our mistakes. So it's now very meaningful to me.
Desirai [info] well, the timeline for me kind of went like this: I had the sudden realization that god/jesus was just like santa, that kids grow out of it. I proudly declared that I didn't believe anymore, because I felt like I was the first person in my class to figure it out. yeah, it didn't work that way. I received immediate backlash, bullying, I became "the antichrist" ... I didn't have internet at this point so I did not know what "atheist" was. I became bullied so bad I became suicidal and depressed. And when I got internet for the first time in 2001, my family blamed the computer for making me suicidal. they took it away to punish me. but it didn't stop the bullying at school, it didn't stop me from hating myself. at some point in that mess, the pledge went out the door too. I felt like if I was defiant enough, someone would finally hear me.later I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder and myriad of other anxiety disorders and I thank my classmates for contributing to it.
victorioushermit [info] I’ve told part of my close family and now they treat me oddly. They still care about me. They just treat me like I’m fragile. But they’re also supportive. I haven’t told others in my family because I know they wouldn’t react well. For instance my mother in law, knowing I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder, has told my spouse to leave me if I ever experience psychosis. So she’s not on my list of people to tell. And similarly my sister tends to use any information she has against me, so I’m not telling her. It’s ok to not tell people, or to only tell certain people. You should do what you need to do to feel safe and comfortable. There isn’t a right or wrong here except what’s right for you.
snailfrymccloud17 [info] I've been diagnosed with bipolar 1. Definitely an extrovert. I have a great psych doc who referred me to a neurologist who solidified the diagnosis. It was very helpful. I also work in case management for severe and persistent mental illness, which gives me a lot of insight into my clients
YearZeroHS [info] Works for both. I was diagnosed with bipolar, the Lamictal helps with my depression and anxiety.
insidetheborderline [info] At 16, I was diagnosed with bipolar I. I think my symptoms started as a kid, really. There were times when I would stay up all night rearranging my room, drawing, singing, dancing, all sorts of other things I would do when I had massive amounts of energy and urges to just *do all the things.* However, I realized I had a problem bigger than "just" depression (which started around 11-12) when I would go from being suicidal to on top of the world over and over again.
awkward_swan [info] Depression and anxiety can be so easily missed sometimes! When my anxiety became bad, I thought I just had a heart problem that was being blown off by doctors (it's just stress! also I'm a woman and I was 17 at the time, I knew they would say anxiety and not heart problem so that made my anxiety/"heart problem" worse). Then my second semester of college I just slept all the time and had no motivation to study or go to class. No sadness or anything like that, just an unwillingness to do things and a need for 12 hours of sleep. I ultimately wised up and saw a counselor on campus, and she told me that was a depressive episode. I did not figure it out myself, wtf. She also told me that the "heart condition" that started at 17 was likely panic attacks. Again, no idea those were panic attacks, or how frequently those are confused for heart attacks.So then I saw a psychiatrist and was prescribed zoloft, an SSRI. I had a lot of hesitations, but at that point I needed help and therapy was doing great but it wasn't enough. When the zoloft kicked in, I thought I was feeling better. However, a lot of things were really off. I was only sleeping 3-4 hours at a time, and whenever I felt like it not just at night. I was cleaning obsessively, like hand-washing all my dishes 3 times in a row. For about a week, I thought the only thing humans needed to eat were bananas, like the chimps who are so closely related to us (I obviously know chimps don't only eat bananas and that humans have different nutritional needs than other primates....). This lasted like a month, and there are other things that happened that I don't want to type. Point is that, once again, something was going on with my mental health and I couldn't recognize that at all, even months after this happened. I finally told a new psychiatrist about it over a year later, and that's when I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 disorder. That doctor was actually suspicious that I had it but telling him about that crazy month sealed it in for him.For those who don't know, it was a manic episode that made me not sleep, clean excessively, etc. that was caused by the zoloft. People with bipolar disorders can easily experience them on SSRI's or SNRI's, especially when taken on their own, which is unfortunate because those are the first meds they prescribe for depression, and for me it gave me my first manic episode.Where the hell would my life be now if I never sought help for this? Even with treatment, things are difficult, but I could have so easily just not have gotten help. I know quite a few people with bipolar disorder that don't get regular treatment, and they're in and out of hospitals and frequent drug users and stuff and continue in this cycle (I love all of them and support them, I just notice the patterns). At the same time, others I didn't even know had bipolar disorder until they told me what meds they were on and they're the same as mine. So when people tell me I "don't seem bipolar", it's not that they're denying I have this illness, it's that the treatment is working.If things are off, just get help! And be honest! Seriously. The professionals know more than you do. Anything that's off, just tell them. Mental health professionals are there to help. Even if they mess up, their intention is always to help you. Do not put it off. It's been a little over 10 years since this started and I will be at my psych appointment this time tomorrow because treatment and regular check-ins are super important!
ken2014 [info] I mean I can go a few days but then I become completely manic. I've been diagnosed with bipolar but there's question that my manic states have just been from not sleeping. It's awful! I hope you get some sleep soon
jingjang1 [info] Same as then, but i am about to ask for another fresh diagnosis. I am diagnosed with bipolar type 2, but i am just now starting to grasp that i had a psychotic episode about a year ago. Which would make it type 1 and perhaps treated differently.
stripedfire [info] Thank you for taking the time to do this! It's great that you're reaching out and educating others, especially when I'm sure you're very busy. I've got a few questions for you. I've been diagnosed with bipolar and typically have manic states that last less than 8 hours. Long manias are VERY rare for me. I thought for a minute I might actually have BPD but confirmed I don't. How common is this situation for those with bipolar? Is there anything else that might be going on to cause it?Also on a separate note, I want my career to be researching and solving chemical imbalances so I can do what I can to find cures (or better solutions) for bipolar, depression, Parkinsons, and such. What job role comes to mind when you hear that? 
famousdanish [info] I relate to your sister's experience: becoming nocturnal, suicidal, not taking care of my body.Depression just sucks out the fight, the motivation. Anhedonia is one term that describes these symptoms.For me, when I'm depressed, someone trying to force me to do something would make me recoil more. So, I can only say, don't try to change her. Maybe you could softly suggest seeing a therapist or starting medicine, if she has not tried these paths.Another idea: suggest going for a walk? And when you walk just try to be there for her, doesn't even matter if you twi don't talk or discuss her depression. Just be a support, be there.Also, time heals. For me, I'm diagnosed with bipolar disorder, so my depressive episodes have always lifted, just months or even a year later. Even if your sister isn't bipolar, I had a therapist who said "depression always lifts". Depression is episodic, even if it's chronic.For probably better, tested ways of help, I'd recommend looking into family support books for depression. I see [this book](https://www.amazon.com/When-Someone-You-Know-Depression-ebook/dp/B07DFP3FYY/ref=sr_1_2?dchild=1&keywords=dealing+with+depressed+family+member&qid=1588285047&sr=8-2) looks interesting.
pabloblessedcobar [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar 1 close to a year ago now. She is aware of this though, I told her fairly early on in the relationship. Because it's quite a severe and at times impairing condition it doesn't really seem fair to not give a heads up about it to a significant other.
LaneyyCakes [info] Hey guys, so I've been dating my boyfriend now for 8 months. He's 22 and I'm 19. We met in college and had the time of our lives together. We're absolutely head over heels for each other and are talking about getting married. The problem is, he graduated last spring and moved to Indiana for grad school while I'm still taking classes in Delaware. I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 in the spring of last year and shortly after, tried to commit suicide. Since then I've been living at home with my parents and taking part time classes at the University. I absolutely hate living at home and I feel like it's making me feel so much worse about myself. Me and my boyfriend decided to give it a trial run and I went to visit for a week in August. I had the time of my life and he hadnt seen me that happy since we lived together in Delaware. While I was there I decided to stay an extra three days. I called my mom and she proceeded to tell me that I was ruining her summer and that she's disappointed in me. Fast forward to now, me and my boyfriend have decided on moving in together on the 26 of December. I have no doubts this is the right move but the only thing that worries me is telling me parents. Any tips or suggestions would be greatly appreciated. I'm absolutely horrified to bring this up. 
Kaniela420 [info] I've never been officially diagnosed with 1 or 2, but I have been diagnosed with bipolar 3 times by different Dr's and therapists. I can tell you though that I most definitely am more inclined to believe I am bipolar 1, as I experience auditory hallucinations at times, and some pretty ghastly psychosis experiences. But, I've never been hospitalized for it, and apparently a lot of folks read that in a description and believe that to be a pre-requisite for a diagnosis of bipolar 1.I think I'm just better at suppressing my actual thoughts and feelings when I know I have an audience that has the authority to lock me up against my wishes. Probably my misspent youth doing illegal shit and evading cops.  My depressive phases, quite the contrary to what most people describe with 1 and 2, are actually relatively short. I'd say on average maybe 1 to 2 weeks, although I have had a depressive episode last upwards of a year once or twice. My Mania, on the other hand, is frequent and has a mighty large reserve tank when the gas runs low. My longest manic episode I would say lasted more than a year. As I don't have much of a frame of reference for the depressive side, (besides loss of interest in hobbies/things I've enjoyed, staying in bed and staying in my sweats and not bathing for a week at a time, isolating myself from everyone I know and becoming quiet and distant), I'll give you a rundown of what mania/hypomania looks like, for me.It starts out; everything is fucking AWESOME! I have so much energy and I feel so good, I really need to get this house clean! Oh wow I finished the house in no time! You know what, I should really clean out my closet and get rid of a bunch of shit I don't wear.... You know what? I'm having such a great day, and it's so beautiful out, I should have a Corona! Wow this beer tastes good, I think I'll have 1 or 2 more. Hmm.... I have a pretty nice buzz going, but I really feel like having a shot. I'm gonna go for a drive to the next town over that has the only liquor store in the valley open on Sundays and bump some gangsta rap. Man it sucks being in such a celebratory mood and not having anyone to hang out with, I'm gonna start blowing up Facebook with funny commentary and trying to hit up all my long lost friends on chat! Oh my God I have such a great idea on how to effectively make our partnership with our global convergys reps more cohesive! And while I'm at it, I'm going to put a training together on how to use our engineering coverage maps, I guess that means I'll have to learn how to ACTUALLY be what I always claim to be on my resumes, "proficient" in PowerPoint! Fuck it, I'll figure it out, I'll just wing it! Oh shit only 2 hours before my husband gets home and he doesn't like it when I drink, I wonder if I have time to pop in to the bar around the corner and have a couple crown and cokes and make it back here before he gets home... I just want to socialize a little bit! Next morning, after blacking out and getting maaaaybe 3 hours of sleep. "Oh damn. I think I might still be a little drunk. How did I even make it to bed last night? Why is my husband sleeping on the couch? No time to deal with that dfamay, gotta get ready to go get dis bread!" *Spends a COPIOUS amount of time fixing hair and makeup and getting those wings JUST RIGHT. Takes forever picking out a necklace and boots to accessorize perfectly* "well shit. I'm 10 minutes late as usual. Where are my damn keys!?" *Gets to work, spends entire morning meeting interrupting everyone and trying to make sure I command the most attention and have a funny comment or anecdote for every single topic that is mentioned.* *Starts on PowerPoint for that great idea I had last night. "Oh you need me to help you work your follow-ups? Sure! Bring em on! Gosh our servicing partners have a lot of questions, but I absolutely can NOT leave any of them unanswered. But the more I answer them the more they private message me and only come to me with their questions... Oh well, this should help get me some recognition so I have some visibility for that promotion I always say I don't want..." Before long I am over extended and HIGHLY annoyed and snappy and bitchy with ANYONE that tries to transfer me a call, as if it's their fault I'm busy...Aaaah home after a long day, time to pick a fight with my husband and be annoyed by my son's existence. I need some alone time. I'm gonna go see if there's any leftover fun drugs I can crush and snort. God my life is so MUNDANE and eventless. You know what would make me feel better? Some retail therapy. I'm gonna buy a bunch of clothes online and then because I can't wait I'm gonna go to a local store and buy a cute new outfit! None of my clothes fit me anymore because I've already dropped a fuckton of weight because I'm manic, plus I just cleaned out my closet today, I've earned it! This goes on, and on, and ON, for days or weeks, my fuse gets shorter and shorter and I fucking RAGE and go mad hoss at the slightest inconvenience. Then, thanks to good ol lack of sleep and photo editing projects, I start hearing shit. "What is that sound? Why does it sound like 2 morning radio DJ's talking? I don't have the radio on... Why is it so muffled like I can't ever make out what they're actually saying??" Then, the visual fuckery comes into play. -ESPECIALLY- if I am home alone, which I fucking HATE being home alone as I am convinced that the bad man has been laying in wait, waiting for the opportunity for me to be alone so he can rape/murder me. Throw that in with the eye fuckery and the muffled voices of 2 dudes in another room... We've got ourselves a party! I once carried a 9mm throughout the house all night and all morning long, convinced that there were people in the house that were going to get me. I saw someone's glasses reflecting in the moonlight watching me from the park across the street... I even called the cops and made them patrol my house. Twice. My house is fucking tiny. With paper thin walls. I can't believe they didn't haul my ass off. The best one was my most recent psychosis though, where I became convinced that my hairline was receding and that it was caused by scalp ringworm I must have gotten from my son or our dog. I walked around the house, spraying the walls with bleach water, I thought the cobwebs were mold or some sort of fungus that wanted to collect my hair. The spiders in the shower were watching me in eager wait to collect my hair, I saw them eating it, or making a web with it, I wasn't sure which. The flies were working with them, it was a covert op where they would dive bomb me, snatch my hair and give it to the spiders, who would then in turn give it to the mold monsters. I wore a beanie inside at all times, to try to protect my hair. It went on for several days, and didn't stop until my husband came and collected me out of the front yard, where I was sitting, picking ringworm pebbles out of a beanie I had just pulled out of the dryer, refusing to go inside because I didn't want to lose any more of my hair... He had to walk me around and make me point out the things I was seeing, so that he could explain them away for me. THAT. was a real muthafucka of a psychosis. Worst one yet, though thus far I've only had about 4 major events since I was diagnosed. As I get older, my symptoms get worse, even with medication. My rage gets more severe, my fuse shorter, the flight of rapid fire ideas, becoming early overwhelmed, crippling fear of calling places for bills, Dr's appts, basically any grown up obligation. And the presence of those auditory hallucinations definitely grows more prevalent. And so, yeah.... That about sums it up... Sound anything like your thing? Lol
ATXNerd01 [info] Hey there, my kids are my #1 motivation for getting stable and staying stable. It's really useful to have a good understanding of your triggers. My kids also sometimes trigger me (too much touching, usually). Their routine also helps me stay stable, so it's a balancing act overall. I understand what you mean when you say you can't let your kid down. I worry about that a lot. I know that I can't be perfect, but I hope that I can be a good model for what you do when you struggle with mental health: You find meds that work, you tell your doctor the truth, you ask for help when you need it, and you give yourself compassion when you're struggling. Considering my kids' genetics, that's a lesson that they're going to need. I don't know if you've stumbled upon this information yet, or not, but the hormonal changes of your period can really, really affect your bipolar mood episodes. If I'm off-balance emotionally before I get my period, there's a really good chance that I'm going to have a mixed episode that crests right around when my period starts. If I'm pretty stable, then a period just gives me a small wobble of mood instability. This has been going on since I was a young teenager, even before I fully realized that I suffer from depression, and decades before I was diagnosed with bipolar. It sounds like you get similar symptoms. I was relieved to find out that it's not just me, that I could predict how long until the shitty episode was over, and that it's not completely out of my control. 
stars_are_silent [info] I don't talk to my mom about it.  That's my solution.  Anytime I've ever brought up depression,  she recommends that I think happy thoughts on my commute, or take longer walks with my dog.  She also thinks medication is probably causing any problems that I have ("sometimes the side effects of all those medications are worse than what they are supposed to fix"). The last time it came up she suggested I might have a food sensitivity.  So, in the last 10 years, we've probably talked about my "problems" less than 10 times.  She doesn't even know I was diagnosed with bipolar.  Anyways, all that to say - I love my mom.  She means well, but she is not helpful and she is not part of my support system as far as bipolar, etc.  I have friends that I can talk to about it and I have a therapist.  I look to my mom for support about lots of other things, so it's not like she isn't there for me.  For me, it's not worth damaging our relationship with hurt feelings and resentment over this.  Take your meds and pursue your treatment on your own.  Don't let them discourage you.  You sound like you know what you need.  Trust yourself.  Good luck!
funsizedcase [info] I have bipolar 2. I know they are a bit different, but for what it is worth, I was being treated with SSRIs for depression and anxiety. Once I was diagnosed with bipolar 2, I was switched to Trintellix. It’s a much better antidepressant fit for me. I am also on a mood stabilizer called Lamictal. This medication helped so much!! It was like night and day. I appreciate your post and pls know that you and your wife are not alone in this battle. It’s hard and totally unfair, but I am so grateful for ppl out there like you, and many others, who love deeply and help. I wish you and your wife the best. Take care, friend.
cmcbryant1 [info] I don’t know if this is a safe space for me to post. I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder 3 years ago. I finally have a stable job but I have a lot of difficulties with it. I have made sure not to involve anyone in my life until now. I know this may not be the same situation but I thought maybe some brief thoughts could help. When my moods swing low [depression] I am completely lost. I don’t want to eat or do the things I love. Yes I get lonely and want my new significant other to be with me when I am like this. However, we have set up boundaries for these circumstances. I do not aspect him to be always by my side when this happens. Sometimes I actually just need to be alone and get afraid to hurt his feelings by telling him so. These periods honestly become a blur when you look back. You are going over and beyond for him as far as I can tell. Sometimes it will be best for you to be doing your own thing while he has these episodes. Unfortunately you can not do anything to pull him out of it. The person he was has currently changed and now you will have to figure each other out again. This DOES NOT mean you should have to give up your life for him. I recommend going to therapy or the doctors with him to get on the same page though. I promise things will start to level out for ya’ll. It is a learning curve for you both. He will need to get adjusted to his new life as will you.  You have to remember that you must be mentally strong now too though. You must still take care of your own mental health!!
Asdewq123456 [info] One of the best moments of my life was when I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 at 28. I finally knew what was wrong with me. Continued in therapy and drug therapy. Kept me alive through numerous suicide attempts and hospitalizations.I am happy for you.  It takes a lot to admit you have a problem. Never give up
pink-carnations [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar and I find that weed usually calms me down. That being said there are a lot of things that can trigger manic episodes so it is possible. It doesn’t sound like you were smoking that much though, so I’d place my bet on some other extenuating circumstance.
RadicalFemale [info] Hey there! I’m 36 F and just started treatment for adhd. I was like you, super smart with a high iq that sailed through school, until high school. Being restricted to a desk was awful and I didn’t do homework or know how to study. I was also very compliant and eager to please until adolescence.I was diagnosed with bipolar and have been treated for it since I was 24. I’ve brought up my executive functioning problems to several of my doctors over the years. If I was so smart how could I have no common sense and be so stupid??Well, I had my teen daughter tested for adhd as she had symptoms. She was diagnosed. I was able to go to my psychiatrist and by explaining my symptoms, what area of life they affected (all of them. If I don’t see a paper bill it doesn’t get paid.) and with the dx for my child in light of how heritable adhd is he diagnosed it. We started with Wellbutrin because since I’m bipolar I don’t want to see off a manic episode with stimulants.There are so many of us women that fell through this crack. I’m glad we’re getting up.
Eechimine [info] I only just started it yesterday and my experience was positive and negative. I am diagnosed with bipolar II, ADHD and GAD. He put me on it because I was having quite a bit of paranoia and constant irrational fear because I just got diagnosed with PTSD as well. He also chose it opposed to other antidepressants because I’ve tried so many of them and they didn’t work.  He also believed that it would be good for me because my depression has mostly been anhedonia related and he thinks this will help that. He warned me that hypomania is a risk from it as well but that is why the lamictal is there too.
divajess [info] I know exactly what you're talking about.  I was terrified to stop taking it.  A few years later, I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder and started taking other medications.Long story short, I stopped taking it because I saw it fueled manic episodes (being a stimulant and all).  I have a combination of mood stabilizers and anti-depressants that helps a lot with anxiety and the mood swings, but my eating is still disordered.  I can feel myself gaining weight and it's terrifying.I'm going to talk to my therapist more about it today.  I don't have an answer, I just wanted to let you know that you're not the only way.EDIT: I wanted to add that I recommend you come clean with the doc.  I lied to my PNP for a long time, and it ended up masking other issues.  Perhaps you need a different med, and they can't help you unless they know.  That's for the cloudy judgement :)
Superficial_Charm [info] The psychiatrist who I saw recently suggested that I may have had childhood bipolar disorder, and I think that he may be on to something.  He also suggested that the condition can be triggered by a mother's post-partum depression, of which my mother had a severe case.  I am diagnosed with bipolar II currently, as well as ADHD, OCD, GAD, and PTSD.I definitely had a hyperthymic personality as a child; extremely talkative and bubbly.  Every so often I would feel blissful, like everything was right with the world, even though I lived in a neglectful and abusive household.  I would get bursts of inspiration for novellas I would write, and just feel 'in the zone'.  Other times, it seemsed that everything was hopeless.  I remember sitting in the bathtub in 1996 and feeling a deep sense of despair and hopelessness pass through me.It wasn't until age 14 that I plunged into a long period of anhedonic, severe depression; and not until 16 that I first felt a true spark of hypomania.  But I always felt different than the other kids.  I noticed that I would feel things more deeply; my mother would often tell me to stop being so 'dramatic'.  It hurt, because she only called me that when I would try to express my emotions openly.I'm 32 years old now, and have been no-contact with my mother for over a year.  Without her toxicity, my general level of well-being has improved, and I've been able to take a critical look at my past.
VanStock1992 [info] Legit how i felt the day I was diagnosed with bipolar on top of my ADHD but someone told me something harsh that I’m going to tell you. They are CONCERNED (different than disappointed but can look the same). Also, they will have WAY more reasons to be concerned if you are hospitalized for unmedicated bipolar disorder than if you handle your health and get on the right meds before it’s an issue.
whywantyoubuddy [info] I am diagnosed with bipolar, as well as my girlfriend. Things are not easy given our mental illness, but we work through it all. I'm really sorry to hear about what kind of journey you and your wife have been going through. How did things go after the doctor said she doesn't have bipolar? Like, did you two just go "awesome! cured!" or was there a a discussion about what to do next? Has the pain and indiscretions been happening SINCE 5 years ago? Was she on something like a mood stabilizer? We are both on Lamictal and it has been absolutely mind blowing. We are able to focus our moods and thoughts more clearly and continue to work on our relationship. Have you tried couples counseling? We also did that and it created a better mode for communication.
novahex [info] I'm diagnosed with bipolar and I have shadow men whispering behind me when falling asleep at times.  Sometimes they say actual words, sometimes it's nonsense or breathing. The worst part is the intense feeling of danger and that someone is standing right behind me. When I'm having a really bad mental health day sometimes I'll hear and feel a hand rushing across the bed towards me and it's always scary as shit. Ive spent a lot of nights crying because I'm too scared to sleep and my boyfriend has had to calm me down. Hallucinations are a bitch. 
Cafe-Con-Leche [info] GO THE FUCK TO THERAPY.  I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 not long ago after 9 years of serious mental health struggles.  I would've gone sooner as soon as I saw the signs and gotten on medication.  Probably wouldve solved a lot
Dano216 [info] You should defiantly get a second opinion. Those are serious diagnoses.**Edit: OP had changed the post to include some of his/her history so I wanted to share my story because there are elements that are similar. Hopefully he/she can find some comfort in it and not feel so alone.**TL;DR: hang in there. Things will get better. It’s a good thing they are not rushing to a diagnoses because finding the right course of treatment and/or medication is paramount. Anyone in your shoes would have a difficult time dealing with this and you have my deepest sympathy for the ordeal you are going through and I wish you nothing but the best.When I was about five years old I told my mom, “I hate myself and want to die.” This was the first sign of trouble and the beginning of nearly 20 years of confusion, wrong or contradictory diagnoses, and depression and anxiety.As I grew older and had severe depression, anxiety, behavioral, and attention problems, my parents did everything they could to get to the bottom of it. We got second opinion after second opinion and I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder, ADHD, dysthymia, major depressive disorder, and ODD. In short, they were handing out diagnoses like Halloween candy.I had major adjustment issues in middle, junior, and high school. I was constantly bored in class, and to pass the time i drew. This got me in trouble constantly and I was given detentions. I drew in detention, and this led to in-school suspension and it just escalated from there. I was also a very sensitive kid and was the target of a bullies. Things just got worse and I felt progressively more lonely and alienated.I was given a battery of IQ tests. The ones administered by the school resulted in scores that put me in the average to below average range. The crazy thing is that I took multiple tests by different doctors - outside of school - and they all resulted in scores in the superior to gifted range. The school system wanted nothing to do with me, and my parents had to hire a lawyer to try and get some sort of accommodation in the hopes that I could just get through school. In the end, based on my diagnosis of ADHD, I was given a IEP and put in classes for students with disabilities. This just made things worst for my own self-esteem and for the constant bullying.I was put on a series of medication including Ritalin, Prozac, and Lithium for a mood stabilizer. I had a horrible reaction to these. They made things worse, not better, especially the lithium which thankfully was short lived, but I blacked out that point in my life. To this day I have no memory of what happened. The other drugs combined with my depression led me to gain a ton of weight. When I graduated I was over 300lbs. This further affected my self-esteem problems and the bullies had new material to work with.I managed to get through high school, albeit psychologically and spiritually damaged, along with my family who suffered through this with me. I tried college and immediately flunked out.I stopped taking meds and coasted through life in my early to mid 20's. I managed to lose all of the weight I put on through diet and exercise, though I still felt like a "fat kid" and had terrible self-esteem. This led to a lot of poor choices - nothing illegal or immoral per se, but its a time of my life I was not proud of.I finally tried college again in my mid 20s. I double majored in psychology and film production. I found there were a lot of other psych majors that like me where really there to figure out what the fuck they were and what was wrong with them. The crazy thing was that I really thrived in college and after my second year, got straight A's throughout.This didn't solve all of my problems. Now in my late 30's, I still carry a ton of baggage from the past, but I am working with a therapist to let go of it and focus on the positive things.My therapist and psychiatrist helped me realize that I was a highly sensitive and gifted kid that just got lost in the system due to my ADD and challenges caused by asynchronous development - the latter being somewhat common with gifted kids. Overcoming this crap has been an ongoing struggle but I met an awesome woman, fell in love, and got married. Things aren't perfect, and I still deal with loneliness, alienation, and self-esteem issues.The moral of the story is that psychological testing, evaluation, and diagnosis is FAR from perfect. Many mental illnesses are diagnosed by exclusion - meaning that they try to rule everything out first. This is clearly imprecise and imperfect, but even after 100 years of research and insight, the brain is still a mystery. Being highly sensitive made my problems that much more unbearable and traumatizing, but I think in a way there are positive things that I can pull out of it. People have suffered through FAR worse - but I'm reminded by the fact that human suffering is relative.Things will get better for you. Just hang in there. Hopefully you have a good support system at home. Hopefully you find what you are looking for in this subreddit that will give you the courage and strength to bear down and endure the challenges ahead. Good luck my friend.
celticraven2084 [info] I agree. The area I live has a mental care facility. Nothing big just an office building with some therapists in it. But mental illness and drug addiction is a serious problem in my town. I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder and chronic depression. I have ro be very cautious about who I tell about it in town otherwise I get labeled as crazy and dangerous.  Worse still I get the old "old straighten up and walk it off" or "cheer up" like it's that easy.
melissarose007 [info] It doesn't get "better" so much as EASIER. I have been diagnosed with bipolar disorder for 16 yrs. Panic disorder for 1 year (directly related to physical health issues I have recently been managing). Don't be afraid to speak to your mental health professional if you are not happy with your meds. Over time you will learn your triggers, and coping mechanisms that work to manage them. You will find medication that works to make up for what cannot be controlled by these coping mechanisms. You will become more familiar with the feeling of the symptoms of your mental health issues. You will create a good support system and You will learn to speak up and get support from those whom you trust.  You will learn there are good days and not so great ones. You will learn to use your mental health to better yourself and help others. It takes time, practice, and lots of "fresh starts". I don't believe anyone ever master's it all, but I also believe that is what makes us awesome.  I'm sorry you are struggling. It is so hard, I know. But there is hope. My life is not perfect. There are still not awesome days, but my life is good.  Yours is too. Don't focus on the destination, but on the journey. I'm sure you will find the tools you need to succeed.
AislingPeartree [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar too. I highly recommend a therapist you feel you can connect with, as well as Tapping (Emotional Freedom Technique). There are lots of free videos and resources online. I’m a mental health coach, I’m here and happy to help!
Weissach [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar II. I have my master's and have been working in that field for roughly 4 years now. Historically I did the 2 years at one place thing (since undergrad), but it was mostly because better opportunities presented themselves. I have been working for the government for a little over 2 years but in different positions (recent change). I've gotten lucky and have had really understanding/supportive coworkers and supervisors, so the BP hasn't really been an issue (i.e. never fired for disciplined). I do find myself getting bored, though. Regardless, don't let you BP deter you from doing something you love. I've had good luck with being open about my illness at work, which has made the bad times much easier to deal with since my supervisors knew it wasn't "me". If you made it through a master's program, then you can handle a job =] Also, talk to your therapist (if you don't have one, I highly recommend seeking one).
ishmoo21 [info] I've been diagnosed with bipolar for 15 years and just started smoking weed 2 years ago when it became legal. I've smoked almost everyday and it hasn't affected my mental states although I find myself smoking more when I'm depressed
SadBrainHappyBrain [info] Your experience is very similar to mine. Anti depressants never worked. I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder by an ARNP who cited “soft signs” of bipolar disorder like post-partum depression and atypical depression (where you sleep MORE and GAIN weight rather than sleep LESS and LOSE weight).In retrospect, I suspect some bouts of hypomania I didn’t recognize at the time During my most obvious hypomanic episode (AFTER my diagnosis) I started out getting very little sleep and then no sleep over a period of 5 days. Music felt too slow, I had not a care in the world. I contacted my ex and talked for hours outside WHILE ON THE CLOCK AT WORK. I literally thought I was too great of an employee for my bosses to care. Toward the 4th and 5th day I was laughing inappropriately and felt self conscious being in public because I felt like everyone could tell something was wrong with me.
shadowscale1031 [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 while in college. It was definitely challenging, as the chaos of college and the chaos of bipolar don’t often go well together. That said, I still graduated and have done well since, so here are some things that have helped me, although many I didn’t learn until after graduation.-Get established with a mental heath provider early, especially if you’re on medication. It can take awhile, and you don’t want to navigate that system while in crisis. Campus therapists aren’t always great with managing illnesses like bipolar, but they can help with managing stress and the transition to college life.-Take your medication consistently. There were times when I would go off mood stabilizers during hypomania to get a “manic boost” during a particularly busy time. Don’t do that. The ugly side of hypomania doesn’t take long to come out.-Get enough sleep. Way easier said than done, but I’ve found that my emotional stability is nonexistent when I don’t sleep. This is one I only figured out once I graduated and actually had a regular sleep schedule.-Find what motivates you and make sure it’s somewhere you’re reminded often. I’m a goal-oriented person, so thinking about how what I’m doing (or not doing) will affect those goals helps me stay focused. In college, I changed my laptop background to whatever motivator I needed at the time (gentle support, kick in the ass, funny and relatable, my pets). Phone backgrounds as well. -Find a support system, aka make friends. Join clubs that interest you. It’ll help you feel more invested in staying. Networking with professionals in my field through campus events also helped with motivation, because it helped excite me about what I could do once I had my degree.-Learn your limits. Manic me likes to sign me up for way more than non-manic me can handle. If that happens, don’t be afraid to step back from lower priority things. I once had to resign from an extracurricular I cared a lot about due to academic overload, and I still remember my advisor saying “You’re here to get a degree, not to be Vice President of this club”. -Learn how to cope with stress. You mention alcohol, and at one point I did develop a problem because I was using it as a coping mechanism for stress. Once I realized I couldn’t keep drinking like I was and still meet my goals (see point above), I changed and learned other ways to manage stress. But I had to hit that breaking point to finally start learning healthy coping mechanisms. If you can, try to find those before you end up too deep in something harmful.-Be kind to yourself. Learning to live with bipolar is mostly trial and error as you figure out triggers, treatments, and coping mechanisms that work for you. There will be a lot of failures and mistakes, but the faster you can get back up and move forward with what you’ve learned, the better off you’ll be.I hope this helps. Good luck!
keepcalmdude [info] Going to get help, and finding out what’s actually wrong with me. I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder and at first it was shocking to hear. But knowing what my condition is, taking medication and learning ways to keep myself moving forward has helped quite a bit so far
poopd0llaaa [info] I have been diagnosed with bipolar, anxiety, depression. I hate this part of me but it is still me and I’m learning to accept it through therapy, meds, and my own journey. My boyfriend is the most accepting, although I will say I imagine it can be a burden on him. We had a scare the other day, I was feeling really low and thought I needed the hospital and he had never seen me like that. I felt like a monster. He just wanted to see if I was okay. I do wonder if I push him too hard, even though I’m working on myself. I wonder if I’ll push him away.
seqtora [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder senior year of high school, and dealt with all throughout college. Trying to make friends at the same time was just a level or two above my pay grade. By the third year, I finally met someone I could hold a conversation with, but by then I'd already gotten used to pretty much being on my own.I don't really know if there's a point to saying all this. Just, even if there are a lot of things that suck about not having anyone, the inner strength you build and the things you discover about yourself can be worth it in its own right.
annielovesbacon [info] It was less formal but I sort of integrated Daylio. After I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder, she suggested I find a mood tracker. I poked around and settled on Daylio and used it regularly without sharing in therapy or anything. Every so often though, I would say “look how crazy my mood has been this month” and show her a chart from the app or tell her that I put together a behavio pattern because of the app. So it didn’t become a regular part of therapy or anything but it was occasionally a useful tool!
vannahcat103 [info] I know this isnt the same thing as schizophrenia, but I've been diagnosed with bipolar and I have a similar experience with smoking. Sometimes when I get crazy anxious and paranoid after hitting a bowl I just try to adapt to it and when I'm successful it helps me realize what I can do about my anxiety when I'm out in the world. So even if you feel negative or anxious, you're still reflecting on things that you might have been suppressing and I feel like that can be healthy. There's an interesting episode of midnight gospel that talks about this.
gothicwriter [info] Definitely. Before my bipolar 2 diagnosis the only thing that started to help me truly quit binge eating and lose 20 some pounds was Vyvanse. Then my psych nurse and I knew there was more going on because I still had depression underlying the ADHD. I got briefly on the med Merry-Go-Round when I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 in April. I can tell you that Lamictal made me eat sweets like a fiend, and I always had the impulse to stop and get drive-thru something. I gained a few pounds on the brief time I was on it and just felt like I always needed something to eat. Now that I'm on Latuda, I'm actually starting to lose weight on a stable dose. The short answer is that yes. I realize that a lot of my problems with eating and food have been due to moods and not being on the correct medication. I don't know what else to suggest for you other than exercise because that really helps keep my appetite in check even if it is only 10 minutes a day. I can tell a huge difference in what I eat and what I crave on the days that I exercise by 2 pm. I just have less of that pit of craving in my gut in general if you know what I mean. I realize some people don't but I think people who have binge eaten or really struggled with weight will know exactly what I mean. By the way, the bipolar has kept me from ever having an exercise routine or even feeling like exercising on a regular basis. in the last month and a half on Latuda, I have managed to start an exercise routine of about 4 days a week without a lot of trouble. I just shoot for 10 or more minutes a day and most days I do more than that. so yeah we're back to meds. I was very obese before I got on Vyvanse and I continued to struggle until I had my bipolar 2 diagnosis and got on a weight neutral drug that actually lifted my depression. I also take Propranolol for anxiety.
bugnerd87 [info] Loved this book. I've been diagnosed with bipolar I, PTSD, and ADHD and that book really explained a lot about why I am the way I am.
-A-Unique-User-Name- [info] Speaking from personal experience only... the first medication I took was a SNRI and it triggered a manic episode. I had the same question about whether it was only a s/e of the medication but I was diagnosed with bipolar anyways. About a year later I experienced another manic episode while I wasn't taking any medication. Maybe you have to wait it out to be sure which it is?I think I remember reading somewhere that if it was just a s/e, the manic episode will end pretty quickly after discontinuing the drug, while if it was BP the manic episode may last longer. 
wildflowerchild30 [info] I have felt the same. Spent from 14-19 yo doing and feeling exactly how you are. I have a LOT of scars that i used to be very ashamed of. I was diagnosed with bipolar in 2013, when I was 25 years old. I only went to get a diagnosis because I had been “clean” from self harm for six years and then all of a sudden it came back, along with all the mental anguish I felt as a teen. I’ve had my ups and downs but I have been totally clean from self harm for 2.5 years now. I am now 33. Four years ago I decided to get a tattoo to cover up the scars on my left forearm, and then two years later got another tattoo to cover up the scars on my right forearm. My reasoning was also that I would look at the beautiful artwork and reconsider my actions because I do not want to ruin it. I feel much more confident now that the main scars are covered. Once you get into therapy, hold nothing back. Be completely honest. I don’t know you, so I dont know if there is trauma that might manifest as dissociation and self harm. For me, it was a neglectful childhood and the  sudden death of my father at a young age. I didn’t acknowledge that for a very long time. Once I did, I was able to heal and focus solely on the bipolar aspect. That I manage with medication and coping skills therapy. There is hope. Just hold on and you will see.
MistressVelveetaVida [info] Ok I think I might have some perspective on the meds thing at least. I was diagnosed with bipolar when I was 15. It was bad. I'm almost 42.  I've been trying to find meds and combos that work until about 2 years ago when I when to a psychiatrist who did something call a "gene sight" test. Basically they take a cheek swab and send it into this lab and they then send your doc the reports of almost every drug for this and tells you which ones most likely won't work, ones you should not take, ones most likely to work and if the levels of medication you're on is too high, too low or just right. I was very surprised with the results, my doc ended up changing a few doses of my meds, stopping some and trying ones from the list of most likely to help. I cannot express how much this has changed my quality of life. Have a sit down with your doc and lay ot all on the table. You may require inpatient treatment for a short period of time to safely change medications. I wish you the best of luck
MuffinMan12347 [info] I've always been extremely empathetic from a young age. I've dealt with depression since I was 13 or 14. Due to this I could tell pretty easily when others were dealing with the same things and was always there to talk to them and support them. I've had 4 of my friends when I was 15/16 call me up right before a suicide attempt (sometimes multiple times) and I helped talk them down and get through it. Depression was one of the hardest things I've ever dealt with in my life, but knowing that my horrible experiences have possibly helped others around me, makes it seem like my suffering was worth it in the end if it helped others get through theirs.P.s I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 beginning of last year and have since gotten treatment and doing a lot better now.
SamSepiol925 [info] I saw them and they didn't help me. He didn't really do much. I made the mistake of checking off the part on the form about a mood disorder and he completely based off all of my issues on that. He asked me I was diagnosed with bipolar and I said yes. He actually checked me out and then gave me a 7 hour lasting melatonin pill and told me to use that. That's it. He thinks I should just take pills because I'm bipolar. I told him it's a misdiagnosis and I just need some sleeping pills but he denied and said I just need help with whatever symptoms I'm having in a psychiatric setting. I mentioned hallucinations but like it's common to have them when you aren't sleeping. Like it's obvious.
Gabriella_123 [info] Well to be honest I don't remember what happened before the car crash, it happened when I was 7 I am 26 now, , just what my family told me, I was asleep at the time, nor do I remember what I was like or my life before, I do sometimes forget things, I like making lists like grocery shopping, so throughout my childhood I went to a lot of psychologists for lots of psychometric tests, and I had to have a facilatator at school to help me with academic work and explain it more to me, I did physiotherapy, ah I see a psychiatrist now and take medication, I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder at 16 although I started getting depressed at like 11 or 12., after lockdown I want to see a psychologist, sorry if this is too long to read
Just_me_maggie [info] No, you don't. There are unfortunately too many mental health "professionals" out there who can't or won't diagnose something unless you're in the middle of an episode right then and there.I finally found a psychiatrist who spoke to me at length about past history of feelings, behaviors, how long the episodes lasted, etc. We had a few sessions, and I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder after many years of being told it was depression and/or anxiety. Regardless of what your actual diagnosis is, if they dismiss you out of hand just because you're not depressed right that second, I'd make an appointment with someone else.
thatirelandkid [info] I'm also 22. I was diagnosed with bipolar super recently. I've also noticed the cycles I went through, and also thought it was just normal, but mine have also been getting worse. My understanding now is that it will continue to get worse unless addressed. I actually made the psychiatrist appointment to get back on meds for my previously (mis?)diagnosed ADHD, but I think what made the biggest difference in that appointment vs prior experiences I had with psychs was that it was the first time I had a FIRST visit with a new psychiatrist while hypomanic and not while extremely painfully depressed. I have a much easier time talking to people (in general, but especially doctors, since that's WAY hard for me otherwise) when I'm hypomanic. If I'm depressed, or even just level, I'm way more likely to leave out important stuff or just straight up shut down because I'm either overthinking my word choice or I get stuck in an introspective thought spiral or I feel drained from the effort of sharing whatever I've already shared. I think writing down the things you know you want to say before you go in might help. You can even bring it with you and tell your doctor you made some notes to make sure you didn't leave anything out--they won't mind! Best of luck with everything
historyjc [info] Is there anything in particular you use track your moods? I was just diagnosed with bipolar 2 and I’m looking for all the guidance I can get.
notfromhere66 [info] Bipolar I, I was at 200mg Lamictal twice a day and I could not function, family was mad that I couldn't think, frustrated handling simple vacuum handle would trigger me.  Was on zoloft 200 mg morning, colozapam 1mg nightly, Seroquel 200mg nightly, topriamate 100mg 2 a day, Wellbutrin 100mg morning.  Basically one made me too tired, gave me something else, made me manic, pinball wizard meds. Currently taking Lithium Orrotate and Inositol, only 1 cup of coffee in the morning, no sugar except for Dark Chocolate.   I have tried majority of old anti-depressants before I was diagnosed with bipolar and was "just depressed". Even though I complained of a racing mind and couldn't sleep the last 30+ years. None worked, just made me purge or did nothing.  Exercise has always been good to me, but old, messed up tendons, bulged disks, etc...  Stretching and walking yeah.Wish I could have done the test to see which would work best for me.  I understand that we have to take time to figure out which drugs work for us.   Sounds really nice and surreal if the safety net works.  At 53 my insurance was cancelled because I can't work.  Not for a lack of trying.  Could not hold a job longer than 2 weeks to 3 months without wanting to run (triggers everywhere FL) no w2, no insurance, owe taxes because I don't qualify for the tax breaks.   Lawyers said don't worry SSDI will take care of it.  Attorney says no notes during ALJ hearing, I can't remember anything while on all these meds, "no notes for me"  everyone else has documentation, laptops, PC's etc.  No SSDI for me, no insurance, no money, use your retirement to live off of till you die. ...  20% penalty plus suppose to pay back, have not figured out how long life will be 4 or 2 years now if I can't pay it back, can't afford any tax help, can't afford life.  But if I had lived long enough to retire at 72+ over $2100 a month.  Yep worked hard for a long time.
Namasteiinbed [info] I always knew something was wrong with me as long as I can remember. I didn’t know BP was a thing, I thought everything I did was normal. Everyone knew me as the outrageous person. One night I sudden got the urge to cut my hair, that was almost to my butt. I shaved it, as close it’ll get to my scalp. I had this fuck everyone attitude, I was hot as shit and god himself couldn’t touch me. I would suddenly get into things that would soon lose its interest, I had to have anything that involved being obsessed with that one thing. My mom always said “you’re just like you’re dad.” After talking to my doc, telling her everything, being 100% truthful. I was diagnosed with bipolar type 2. I told her the stories I was told about my dad and she assumes he might’ve had bipolarI hardly slept as a child, I would be walking the house late at night and go to school the next morning feeling like I had endless sleep. My mom just said I was a night owl so I stuck with that. Nah mom, it wasn’t that. Lol.
ultramarineparalian [info] I’ve been struggling a little to find the positive things in my life. I graduated from undergrad in December and ultimately it was a rough two months to find a job in my career field. I was happily hired in February and things started to finally look up. Then I was laid off because my company was downsizing due to the Coronavirus in March. I’m struggling to stay positive especially being that I am diagnosed with bipolar disorder and have extreme lows and highs. However, right before the quarantine I adopted a stray tuxedo cat into my little family. It’s a positive thing because we were so worried about if he would accept being an inside cat but he is just the sweetest boy ever who loves snuggles and kisses. I love being able to spend quality time with my cats and husband. I’m focusing on them and cooking for them to give me motivation.
charms_ [info] Just my experience:When I got my first diagnosis, I didn't believe it and wanted a second opinion. It took forever to find a psychiatrist who would see me without me being already seen by a therapist in their same office (some stupid rule in USA perhaps). I called, told the receptionist that I was looking for a second opinion on a diagnosis of bipolar, and the appointment was scheduled. When I went in, I assume the psychiatrist was told I was looking for a second opinion because he immediately launched in to a stream of questions (have you ever felt this? have you ever done that?) as well as asking me about my life growing up. He was very throughout, asked a lot more than my first pdoc, and listened to a lot more context than she did. He confirmed the diagnosis. He also knew the clinic that I was already going to, and made a joke about how they waaaay over-diagnose  ADD/ADHD over there and it's a miracle I got out of there without that diagnosis.My only regret is that I wish I didn't tell the receptionist that I was diagnosed with bipolar, because I don't know if the psychiatrist was "looking for that" when he asked his questions. He seemed really professional, so probably not, but whatever. Your psychiatrist may very well ask why you're there to see him/her, and you can say whatever you think is necessary. There really should be no under-sharing with someone dealing with your brain. Although I'd probably keep pdoc 1's name confidential.Now, about leaving your current pdoc for the new one if you like him/her better... I got no advice for you. I want to leave my current one for anyone else, but I don't want to hurt her feelings. Yep. Go ahead, make fun of me. I did, however, leave my first therapist for another therapist in the same office. I just called the office and said I wanted to see X therapist instead of Y therapist (I did research on who I wanted to see), and they gave me a LOT of push back, but I kind of insisted (and implied that I'd just go to a different clinic), so they did it. I didn't tell Y therapist at all. I just never rescheduled with her. I've seen her around the office once or twice, and it's incredibly embarrassing, but that was over two years ago that I left her so she probably doesn't even care/remember.My biggest advice: if you're looking for a second diagnosis, say as little as you can about it at first, until they evaluate you. Then you can tell them every detail about your current treatment and everything and see what they have to say. Also, remember that these people probably have SO many clients that they will hardly care if you choose someone else. They may wonder about it for a while, but they'll get over it fast.Sorry this is so long, but if you have any other questions, definitely don't hesitate to ask!
cwillwin [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar by my psychiatrist. When I entered an IOP, the psychiatrist had doubts that I had bipolar. I think that she and other people in the past didn't think I had bipolar because I appeared high- functioning. I could keep up the act of high functioning because while the depressions were debilitating, highs were so productive that I could make up the weeks worth of work I missed in a couple of days. I also realized that when you're speaking with psychiatrists, you need to talk in "their" medical language rather than your own language. It's not enough to ask patients with bipolar, "do you go on huge spending sprees?" My hypomania manifested with psychosis, delusions, hearing voices, and hugely productive days. But they never asked me those questions, and I didn't have the language to properly express that I was experiencing these things in a way that they would understand. So on the basis of their biased questions, they'd rule out bipolar even though it runs in my family through generations.
la_luna653 [info] Oh hey wow, so a bit random, I kinda do the same with the hallucinating out of the edges of my vision. I was diagnosed with bipolar 2, I wonder if that’s normal lol and I’ve noticed since my smoking has gotten worse so have those hallucinations. Like when I was sober I rarely (maybe once or twice) ever saw things.
Shifty-Manzanita [info] Hey there. I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 about a year and a half ago. I also had a lifetime of suffering. I found out at 45 years old. I’m happy to know what it is. Not just suffering in the dark anymore. Just wanted to share and let you know you’re not alone.
coffeeandjesus1986 [info] I have several but the worst of them. My 3rd grade teacher. She repeatedly called me stupid and that I would never amount to nothing being a stupid white cracker who doesn’t know math. Second worst-4th grade teacher sent me for all kinds of tests because I wasn’t “fitting in with my peers” and that “She cannot understand simple math instructions” she convinced my parents to do a CT scan on my brain to prove that something was wrong with me. I have zero faith in school especially teachers. As an adult I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder, and I have a slight developmental delay because I was born premature. In the early 90s they had no idea that preemies had challenges compared to full term. I had so many school problems because teachers either didn’t care or didn’t understand.
Brocktreee [info] I am not a doctor.  I am diagnosed with bipolar disorder. [Here](https://www.nami.org/Learn-More/Treatment/Mental-Health-Medications/Lithium) is a resource published by the National Aliance on Mental Illness on guidelines for taking lithium and managing extraneous situations, such as missing a dose. &#x200B;[Here](http://www.gsk.com.au/resources.ashx/prescriptionmedicinesproductschilddatadownloads/772/File/55B213AAC248EBF588A7E6F5EEB3F9CB/quilonumCMI.pdf) is the drug information leaflet for Quilonum SR, and the instructions it gives:  >Tell your doctor if, for any reason, you have not taken your medicine exactly as directed. If you forget to take Quilonum SR, take it as soon as you remember. Do not double the dose to make up for any missed or forgotten doses.&#x200B;Lithium is excreted by your kidneys, but the longer you take lithium, the more it builds up in your body. This is what gives it its protective effect. **To be clear: Your system maintains lithium even if you miss a dose.** This is not a reason to panic.&#x200B;I've been on lithium for several months myself. I've felt the benefits of lithium. It's amazing. I had to reduce my intake from 900mg (effective therapeutic) to 600mg for thyroid related reasons, and it took a week or so for me to start noticing the...loss of the 300mg. I'm no longer in mania-therapeutic level range, **but the change was not immediate.**&#x200B;Bottom line: Don't sweat it. You'll be fine. Call your doctor and discuss the situation when you can. Big hugs.&#x200B;
thefriendykas [info] I was taking Modafinil 100mg for a while, before I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 rapid cycling about a month ago.Honestly I was only taking 100mg to 200mg per day on days where I felt sluggish. Occasionally even when I felt good but knew I had a long day ahead.It basically feels like someone is keeping your eyelids open with those eye clamp things lol, but your still technically tired which is a strange feeling.I'm personally trying to stay off them while they get to my therapeutic dose of Lamictal. I want to see how it goes with out any help from other pharmaceutical drugs.I have been taking some herbal stuff for alertness and cognitive function.Been going well so far but it's a lot less edgy and not nearly as intense.I'm taking rhodiola and lion's mane. Just for reference.
BeautifulGhost [info] From what I've learned with my doctor and research over the years it's a lot to do with medication and our unstable lifestyles when we stray from routine. Most of the medications cause weight gain and during episodes it's easy to stray from a healthy diet to over eating or not eating at all. I've had bipolar since my childhood but it wasnt treated until 7 years ago. I'm a rapid cycler so the ups and downs can sometimes change in as little as minutes. When this happens I CRAVE sweets. I can't control it and I'll cut anyone down who gets between me and the vending machine at work lol! My psychiatrist believes it's due to the instant release of dopamine that sugar gives us. Like a quick fix and a way for me to try and stop my sudden shifts. My metabolism is fast, my weight stays around 125lbs and I'm 5'6. My concern is all the sugar intake will cause me to have diabetes, it's a misconception that people who are overweight are the only ones who get diabetes.  Bipolar and diabetes are so toxic together because just like our mood shifts with bipolar our sugar also shifts constantly with diabetes. 3 years ago I went to a hospital because I was in a lot of pain and had a serious flu like cold.  I was also dizzy and my equilibrium was off. Once the doctor returned to the room she asked me how long ago I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder. She then went on to say that "sometimes, when those who suffer from this disorder have episodes, they often make things up in their heads that seem real but aren't." She gave me a xanax and released me with a pamphlet stating I had been treated for psychosis. My sister was with me and she about lost her shit in the room when the doctor said that to me. 3 days later I couldn't breathe and my mom rushed me to urgent care. I fainted when they took my blood pressure and was rushed to another hospital where I was admitted for a pneumonia, kidney infection and an unknown virus. They couldn't stabilize me and my doctor spent over 3 hours at my bedside trying to figure out how to treat the virus they had never seen before. It was so bad he started preparing my parents for worst case scenario and had a priest visit. I pulled out of it and was discharged 3 weeks later. Moral is a lot of doctors and providers write us off as being psychotic before actually treating the symptoms. I still remember hearing the nurse outside my room say "just a heads up this ones bipolar" and giggle to another coworker. When doctors dont give proper health care that can cause early death as well.
Angela533x [info] I agree 100% when I was diagnosed with bipolar it was my partner that with offered support and when me and him had a fall out and I was upset his friend told me to think about how my bipolar was hard on my partner 😲 no kidding it's hard but it's not a walk in the park for me either
Yodiebear [info] Are you on any meds? Lamictal pulled me out of the deepest darkest depression. I never knew such depression existed. I’m still not completely stable, hypomanic at times, but I do not have depressive episodes anymore. Sure, I get upset & start sliding that way but it doesn’t get so far that I can’t recover pretty quickly. I have been diagnosed with bipolar2 as well as bpd but I haven’t gotten the therapy I’ve needed so....always a good place to start.💞
HighnessOfCats [info] "Dad, I think i have depression" Said a very depressed teenager. "Then shut the fuck up and take a happy pill" Said a father that doesn't believe in mental illness\--4 years later --"I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder" "You tried to pull this bullshit with me when you lived with me. Why? what happened? Did you try to kill yourself? How did you do it? OD, Cut, hang? What?" I walked out of the restaurant.
stardust_zan [info] I have episodes like that too. I'm diagnosed with bipolar with borderline traits. I've noticed you mentioned you have traits of that too, so maybe it has something to do with it ? I know my episodes got worse when I tired to self medicate, also anxiety can bring on weird symptoms, mixing things around. My last episode was pure madness with my moods all over the place and I could see my psychiatrist being baffled by my behaviour, but in the end he thinks it's due to drinking too much, experimenting with weed and sleeping pills and my stress/anxiety levels going over the roof.Did you think of talking to a doctor about it?
bmenorath [info] My dosage is 40mg a day. I was diagnosed with bipolar type 1 back in September. I was put on Latuda about two weeks ago for depression.
Soggy-Slapper [info] Alright so this thread has about 1.5k comments so I doubt anyone will ever see this but this is the first time I’ve ever talked to anyone about this in over 10 years So let’s go way back to middle school. I can’t remember exactly but my best guess would be that I was like 10-12 years old. I was getting abused at home by my father and I was being bullied at school by the other kids. My mom was the only person who understood that so she let me fake being sick to stay home from school sometimes just to get a break Now I don’t necessarily believe in ghosts, but my childhood house was weird and we all think it was haunted. There would be multiple times when we (everyone who lived there) would hear occasional voices that weren’t there, we would just get this feeling that we were being watched, we would randomly start feeling just *weird* and *wrong* and I honestly don’t have a better way to explain that but we all felt it. The most common thing though was that we would hear footsteps in the hallway and even see the shadows of feet from the gaps under our doors. Like I said, I don’t wanna say I believe in ghosts, but something about that house just wasn’t right So back to the story: I was getting abused at home and bullied at school particularly hard lately so I coordinated with my mom that we would fake me being sick so I could get the day home alone to recove After everyone left and I was home alone, I just felt wrong and uneasy the whole time but I couldn’t explain why. Then later in the day, I’d guess early afternoon around 3pm or so, I start occasionally hearing a footstep or two in the hallway Now I’m like 10-12 and I’m hearing footsteps in my house so I’m terrified. And I’m not talking faint and quiet footsteps, I’m talking a full grown man wearing steel toe boot footsteps. So I’m freaking out at this point and trying to reassure myself. My thinking was “okay this is scary but all that’s ever happened is this thing has made noises and made us feel weird so it can’t hurt us right?” Then out of nowhere, all of the lights in the house cut off, and all of the toilets in the house flush at the same time. I tried to comfort myself by saying that it was just sensory stuff, but then almost like it read my mind and called my bluff, whatever it was manifested into physical/material action for the first time, so I felt exposed and threatened So at this point, 10-12 year old me was freaking the fuck out. Since the only source of support in my life at the time was my mom, I call her while she’s at work and I just start crying and yelling about what’s happening and how scared I am. Then, inexplicably, after I finish pouring everything out on her and she’s finally able to start talking to comfort me, it all stopped. Now I’m 23, so I’m at least twice the age I was when this happened, and I still haven’t come up with an explanation for it. The best I can come up with is this: when I was 21 I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder type 2. Bipolar mania can sometimes result in psychosis and hallucinations, but that doesn’t happen with type 2 and I’ve never had any problems with those things before. Additionally, bipolar disorder typically develops in your 20’s, so the idea that I could’ve experienced the worst symptoms of my life and actually started hallucinating an entire decade before I was diagnosed is a serious stretch. Like I said I don’t necessarily want to say I believe in ghosts, but this shit was damn near inexplicable
YourMom304 [info] My son was a HORRIBLE sleeper from birth. He'll be 6 in July and up until October it would take 45 minutes up to several hours for him to fall asleep, and he absolutely would not fall asleep unless we were laying together. I was in tears most nights. My husband and I were miserable. His behavior was completely out of control during the day too. His doctor finally suggested melatonin and it has saved all of us. We give him the melatonin 20 minutes before bedtime and at bedtime we brush teeth, read one book, and then he's out in 10-20 minutes tops. And he was sleeping in his own bed for the first time ever (with the coronavirus upheaval he's back in our bed now, which is fine with me, if it bothered me he would be able to move back to his own bed).I finally have some breathing room at night. His behavior is so much better and he is so much happier. I wish we had done this way sooner. I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder last year and now understand how vital sleep is to keep my moods balanced, and those 5 years of broken sleep nearly did me in. You will be so glad you are making this choice once you come out on the other side.
goldeuphoria [info] Two years ago in a manic psychosis, I got a German Shepard puppy. This was on top of being a full time college student with 18 credits, 2 part time jobs, a sorority and a serious relationship. I got him because I was paranoid out of my mind, hallucinating and felt like he would make me feel safer. This was right before I was diagnosed. (Not the best reason to get a puppy, trust me I know)He made me feel safe and protected me when I was really out of my mind. I love him so much it’s unbelievable. Soon after I got him, I was diagnosed with bipolar 1. I started medication and therapy, and my psychosis (& it’s accompanying paranoia) went away. This was when I realized the gravity of the decision of having a dog was. I went into a depressive episode from the wrong mix of medication, and was so low that I was not able to take care of myself well or him. Being newly diagnosed, I didn’t realize this was a temporary episode and that it would subside with the right mix of medication. I had such low energy and was so down that I thought life would be that way forever.Out of my pure love for my amazing pup, I came to the heartbreaking decision to rehome him. I spent several months going over all the options and figuring out the best plan possible. I refused to place him in a situation that wasn’t better than the one I was giving him.Finally I found my pup an incredible home. He went from living with a broke college student in a tiny apartment, to a beautiful family with younger kids and big house and big yard to play in. The dad takes him for morning runs every day, and the kids play with him all day. He is in such an amazing home now, so much better than the home I would have ever been able to give him. When I realized eventually that I was in a depressive episode, I had a small degree of regret that I didn’t stick it out and try and get to a better place mentally to provide for him. My heart breaks that I had to give away my baby, my son, but I know without a doubt now that he is in the best home possible and is living an amazing life. I still miss him every day, and am so thankful for the safety and love he gave me. But, my mental health is significantly better without the extra responsibility of another being to provide for. I wish I could have given him the life I wanted to give him, but I have peace knowing he’s living a better life than I could ever dream of for him.Hope my experience can help. I wish the best for you and your pets! If you decide you can’t handle the stress of providing for them, I would say that is a very selfless decision because you have their best interests at heart and only want them to be in a loving home. Best of luck
TR7862 [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder later on they said that i am schizophrenic. I was having panic attacks that came suddenly in the middle of my class. I cried with sound and i was feeling that i have no tomorrow. I hope it helps.
Doggostrophic [info] Take this with a grain of salt, because this was from before I was diagnosed with bipolar. Out of all the drugs I've ever done, including marijuana, shrooms probably had the least negative effect on me. Actually, thinking back I don't think it had any negative effect.Even just a little bit of a joint makes me psychotic so that's gotta be saying something.
jncummins86 [info] Although I appreciate the sentiment, I can say with all honesty I have no alternatives than to keep taking what I’m on. I have been diagnosed with bipolar since 2009. This year is the first time I’ve ever tried lithium and this is the first time in my entire life that I am feeling “normal” emotional range. Unfortunately, given all I went through these past two years and the consequences of trying pregnancy safe alternatives after the no meds at all attempt, I am certain I will attempt suicide if I get that low again. On the flip, I am almost certain I will lose my marriage with the next extreme mania. Lithium can do a lot of harm during pregnancy. But I’m told by both my psych APRN and my OBGYN that through monitoring more regularly and closely and maintaining my health otherwise it is possible to deliver a happy healthy baby with no side effects from it. TBH, I’m amazed at how calm I have been posting this and responding... each passing day I realize more how much it’s important for me to stay on my meds the way they are.I hope you are able to find what works for you. It’s almost as unhealthy TTC while mentally unstable as it is to be on meds that MAY have effects... the struggle to know what’s best for you is real. Much love to you.
clauquick [info] I take Lamictal 100mg 2X per day for a seizure I had three years ago. I know it also treats bipolar but obviously thats not why I take it and I was prescribed it before I was diagnosed with bipolar. A little scared of meds.
snackthattalksback [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar 16 years ago.You literally said you were 13 in your post, which is why I asked. I wouldn’t be condescending, especially in this reddit.You saying multiple times that you love crazy girls is fetishizing. Also, very uncool to refer to someone with a mental illness as crazy. I stand by my comment.
Curly_Tea [info] I’m in the same boat as you. I have been diagnosed with bipolar 2 for over 20 yrs and have taken over 45+ meds, ECT treatments and numerous hospitalizations. Recently diagnosed with ADHD and started on stimulants. I feel a lot better and sometimes wonder if I ever really had Bipolar2. But I believe I actually did because I have rapid cycling. I don’t really know if that’s part of the ADHD. So many of the symptoms cross over so it’s hard to tell. But I know that the ADHD meds have really helped my mood so I’m really glad. I’m still on mood stabilizers and depression meds also. I wish I had done like you and stopped everything. But I’d probably be hospitalized if I did. I’m still on a handful of meds everyday, so I’m hoping maybe the ADHD meds work so good I can come off some of the others. 
cat-pants [info] You sound a lot like me. I was diagnosed with bipolar and generalized anxiety disorder. The job situation got so bad that I ended up going to disability insurance because of my MIs.I am not a doctor, so I don't know what's going on, but to me it doesn't sound like you're malingering. I hope you're able to see a psychiatrist and get treatment.
universemessages [info] Yeah I have bipolar but before I got diagnosed I was really addicted to coke. I started to do Adderall instead in an attempt to quit coke. Long story short that's how I was diagnosed with bipolar lol.
aurortonks [info] Oh yeah, of course. I used to regularly smash dishes in the kitchen when I got mad, before I was diagnosed with bipolar. Now, I get urges to smash stuff which ends up me usually punching myself in the leg or slapping myself in the face (these instances are very rare nowadays). I've come close to smashing things like my pc, laptop, phone, kindle, etc as well but haven't done so yet. I try to back off the ledge when the urges hit because I really like my things and damaging them would be heartbreaking once the anger or frustration subside. To do this, I use thought-changing techniques my therapist taught me such as reframing my thoughts into positives, writing down why I'm upset, and holding ice cubes until they get too cold over and over again. I also talk with my spouse when I'm feeling that upset and he helps talk through the thoughts and feelings so that I can calm down gradually while still having my emotions and thoughts validated. 
_outoforder [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder, so it’s not just depression. You’re right; the symptoms are definitely similar. I also agree that a label doesn’t necessarily matter, as long as you think you’re overall getting the help you need. My therapist always has said they treat symptoms, not disorders, which is why different medication works for different people. I have just always noticed that when it comes down to it, I have no idea who I am. I really question the reality of everything and everyone around me, on top of questioning myself. There’s other symptoms, but that’s the simplest way to put it. I think this can go hand in hand with other disorders, where they kind of blend together. Maybe just treating the depression will help this for you, especially if you’re in therapy and can talk about this openly.
bansheey [info] Just like you I was just discovered a month ago I was diagnosed with bipolar after thinking I had serve depression. I'm currently taking Latuda too but didn't have ant side effects. my nurse practitioner told me the pill works pretty quickly and if I had side effects longer than a week she needed to know. I would talk with whoever gave you the meds, it could be a weird combo. When I was coming off of my anti depression pills I had really bad side effecfs and was able to work with my nurse. Hopefully you start feeling better soon! 
harvestwheat27 [info] Yes! I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder last year, but previously, I didn’t know I had it. Depressive episodes often came with binge eating, and manic episodes often made me eat out of anger, somehow. My eating was quite normal when I was in a typical mood, but unfortunately there wasn’t much I could do before I knew I had the disorder. Even now, the medications come with side effects of weight gain, but since I’ve been emotionally stable for a year now, it’s much easier for me to control my weight! Thank you! I’m just glad it’s finally healthy for me to diet without worry! :)
luckysushi22 [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder at 13 and didn't take meds until I was 26. Those 13 years involved so many poor choices and so much misery. I attempted suicide more than once. I damaged relationships permanently. I would love to go back and tell teenage me the meds that work for me and to stay on them. It would have changed my life so much. Then I would go see some dinos and prehistoric beasts.
allegedbadnoodle [info] I’m no psychiatrist, but the way you described all of that sounds so much like me. I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 several months ago. My doctor adjusted my meds and I’m feeling soooo much better. It’s hard still, but medication has made an indescribable difference. And therapy. Therapy is a miracle worker. You’ve made a wonderful first step in believing your feelings and believing that you deserve to feel better. You’ve got this.
EphemerallyEverAfter [info] So can antipsychotics! But they aren't supposed to zonk you out. They can, but that's one of those side-effects that warrants switching medication. The reason it bothers me is two-fold. First, their ability to stabilize your moods is over-stated. They are more effective as anti-manic than anti-depressants for the very reason another poster made about them lowering dopamine, and don't necessarily stabilize your mood. When I go to support groups, I mostly see people who are really depressed and on antipsychotics. There are exceptions. Seroquel helps for both depression and mania, and olanzapine/Zyprexa is marketed in a combine pill with Prozac for bipolar depression. Furthermore, some of the older antipsychotic drugs that are similar can help for depression -- they just were never investigated for it at the time they were not in generic and there was money to be made (drug companies fund most research and trials, and when a drug goes into generic and the price goes down and anyone can make it, they are no longer interested in running trials because there's no money to be made).The other is side-effects. Antipsychotics are powerful, powerful drugs. The older ones have bad, bad long term side-effects. They cause brain degeneration, increased metabolism, weight gain, and therefore often diabetes. They also lead to parkinson's type symptoms -- tremors that are different than akathisia. Akathisia sucks too. And you can get neuroleptic malignant syndrome from taking them for years, which is a medical emergency. Supposedly, the newer antipsychotics don't have these side-effects, but the truth is we really don't know about the long term effects. Clinical trials have a person on a medication for, at most, around 8 months. Not years and years. And to be fair that would be ridiculous, you can't have years long clinical trials where a person is on a medication for ten years before it goes on the market.Seroquel, when it went on the market, had a similar reputation. Free from the side effects of older antipsychotics! And to be fair, a lot of those drugs are very very sedating, like Haldol and Thorazine. Other older antipsychotics, like Loxitane, not as much. But now Seroquel has been on the market for about 20 years and I've seen people who are experiencing some of these side effects having only ever been on Seroquel and similar drugs like Risperdal. Because the truth is, these long term side effects are/were not from taking, say, Haldol for years, but taking antipsychotics for years. Antipsychotics in general. To be fair, there is the chance these new antipsychotics won't have long term side effects, but we don't know. And some of them, the risks do exist but are just less... Abilify CAN cause increased metabolism and diabetes. When I was on it, my appetite skyrocketed. Mood stabilizers don't have as many side effects. Brain fog is a possibility like you said, but that's not a certainty and a side effect that warrants switching meds. But also there is a conception that they have long term side effects on some of your organs -- liver and kidney. And that's not actually true. It isn't true that Depakote and Tegretol ruin your liver over years. What it is, is that they either immediately impact your liver -- and you have some blood work to monitor it -- or not at all. It isn't a gradual chipping away at your liver, it's initial side effect and then you stop and switch if that's the case. The exception is if your liver becomes compromised for another reason. Like say you are an alcoholic and that weakens your liver. Then, yes, depakote might cause liver damage. Does that make sense?Ditto for lithium and your kidneys. Lithium won't ruin your kidneys, unless it immediately does so and then you stop. If when you start it, your kidneys remain fine, it won't hurt your kidneys over the long term. Now, there is an exception with lithium. Lithium WILL impact your thyroid hyromones if you take it for a long time. That is a guarantee -- someday you will end up with hypothyroidism if you take lithium. But that, while sucky no doubt, isn't the end of the world. With lithium you have your blood monitored (less frequently once your level is stabilized), and they will catch your thyroid hormone levels getting wonky. At that point you can either switch to a different medication, or, start taking a hypothyroid medication once the hormone does get too low. That is not a big deal. The medication, tmk, is not that expensive, doesn't have a lot of side effects, and really effective so it isn't like you have to go through a lot of trial and error to find one that works. Easy peasy treatment.From my personal experience, when I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder, my psychiatrist had a big big practice. He had a lot of patients and also had a research facility that ran clinical trials for drug companies. His practice was really set up for people whose conditions were not extreme, but too extreme to be managed for a family doctor. The way he described it to me before switching me to another psychiatrist who could see me in the hospital if I was hospitalized, and c ould follow me more closely, was his patients were kind of like "Billy has ADHD, and I can prescribe him a medication and I don't need to see him for another six months..." WHATEVER. For that reason, he didn't prescribe mood stabilizers (told me he didn't believe in them), but the truth was because he couldn't see patients frequently enough to do the monitoring required with them. When I was referred to him, it was because I initially was thought to have treatment resistant depression. No one knew how bad it would get. Anyways, once he diagnosed me, he put me on antipsychotics. First Abilify, then Risperdal, then Seroquel. And I didn't get any better -- I actually got worse for a while. It wasn't until I saw a psychiatrist who could follow me more closely who put me on Depakote that I saw any improvement.One of the greatest tragedies of bipolar disorder, in my opinion, is that many people do find relief from antipsychotics, but they are such heavy drugs with major consequences. I hope someday we can find a drug that brings relief without long term consequences. Maybe we will someday and maybe it will be an antipsychotic. That's certainly where virtually all the research is right now. So who knows! But as things are now, I find mood stabilizers to be much safer, I really do.
aquariancrybaby [info] It’s a Jenny Holzer piece and it says “IN A DREAM YOU SAW A WAY TO SURVIVE AND YOU WERE FULL OF JOY” in big red letters on what seems to be a white garage door.I found this quote in a time of my life where I felt everything was out of control, I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder last year.The quote just gives me hope, it feels like it’s telling me to follow my dreams because they will keep me happy. Even if I don’t achieve, I am surviving and still dreaming no matter what the world throws at me.
couldyoufuck1ingnot [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder and it seemed to change everything. I feel less free to Express my emotions and I'm constantly analyzing my feelings.
Julesrpgqueen [info] I am also a victim of childhood sexual abuse, by my stepfather, and physical, emotional abuse and neglect by my father, I think what your subconscious is doing is mingling together the love you wished you had received from your father with a need for physical intimacy that you are avoiding in your waking life, I understand why, most of the time I don’t want anyone to even touch me, and I haven’t had sex with anyone in 13 years, which has allot to do with what happened to me as a child and also I was raped by a guy I went to high school with 9 years ago and I haven’t really recovered from it, the dreams I typically have are about the houses I grew up in being mashed together it some freakish maze of rooms with back yards as big as the ocean, and I’m naked desperately trying to find clothing but all the clothes I find are things I wore as kid and don’t fit me, my father in my dreams is always this giant visceral slimy worm writhing on the sofa in the living room while a television with only static illuminates the darkness, I’ve found that the men I end up being attracted to mirror the abusive and erratic behavior of my father who is most likely bipolar, because I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder 20 years ago and it is hereditary, I’ve had to actively ask myself why I am in love or attracted to certain men, it helps to make a list, pros and cons of the person and seeing which on outweighs the other, it puts things in perspective, I think therapy would be beneficial to you, and if you have friends that are supportive, reach out to them, communicate with the people that care about you, it will help build back up what your father dismantled with his severe abuse.
chickenpants80 [info] Haha..no joke. After 2 bouts of crippling postpartum depression I was diagnosed with bipolar II disorder (I'd had it all my life, I just didn't know any better). I'd tried supplements and everything possible, but I finally realized that taking a butt load of medications made me feel 'normal' for the first time in my life. Lamictal, Celexa, and Trazodone, I love you so much. Yay Big Pharma, thanks for the life!
boguia [info] I’d definitely consult a doctor about it but my instinct is to say no. Head injuries in generall cause mood swings. People with mood disorders like bipolar are told to stay away because pot can potentially make things worse. I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 recently and can confirm.[Edit] Doesn’t stop me though, lol.
jaycakes30 [info] Hearing voices doesn't automatically mean schizophrenia.. I suffer with auditory hallucinations when I'm under severe stress and I'm diagnosed with bipolar and bpd, my cpn has told me it's quite common. Speak to your psychiatrist, they'll be able to help you. Stay safe! <3
SophieCatAndyCat [info] This is horrible! Im afraid because i am diagnosed with bipolar and i was put on strong drugs too. I had a good psychiatrist that told me that when i went to an inpatient day program to get better control over my bipolar, which it never helped this is another story for later, that the drugs they put me on cause severe birth defects and got me off of these mood stabilizers. They are never supposed to prescribe depakote to women of childbearing age because of the high risk of birth defects. I was 28 when they gave it to me. Plus, they tried Geodon first, and my entire right side went numb. I couldn't talk or eat. I think i was getting a mini stroke and they never told me. I refused to take the second dose they gave me and thankfully i went back to normal after that.
Aberrant262 [info] I was diagnosed with ADHD as a kid, took medication and such but as I grew older I thought I grew out of it. When I hit high school I thought everyone felt like I did, thought like I did. That I was just weaker than everyone else in dealing with it. Thought my depressions and such were just isolation from feeling ugly and being terribly socially awkward. Thought the highs I got were normal. Did a lot of drinking in school with friends, and even that was bipolar. Sometimes I was an incredibly sad drunk, sometimes it gave me the confidence to actually talk to people.I've always had a fairly strong streak of self control due to terror of being embarrassed. Never even considered that I had manic episodes, always thought that these things were just normal.Came as a shock when I was diagnosed with bipolar 2. Thought I just had depression due to external sources and such. Actually just went to psychologists for the depression and when I finally found a good one, they sent me to a psychiatrist and I got a joint diagnosis from them. It's still weird to think that this isn't just normal, that I'm pretty much chemically different from most people.It's a little lonely.
sureyeahno [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar at age 12.  Never had a real manic episode just the feelings from missed doses until I was 32.  The first “manic” episode happened to me once I started working out and standing up straight, quit doing drugs, quit humping every girl who would let me and quit playing with myself and started eating fruits and vegetables instead of just processed premade gmo food and drinking plenty of water.  I also quit being a social media/phone face addict.  Started to avoid tv as much as possible, I called it the babysitter.  Basically I applied moderation to all of my bad habits and other areas just fell into place.  Started to read books, took up hobbies, started to actually enjoy life and the people that were in it.  Then the dark night of the soul hit.  So many strange things happened no one could explain to me.  “Don’t know why your sternum perturbed out your chest or why you vomited and the pictures you showed it actually looks like dookie instead of puke, or why your lower back hurt so much.”  Yeah I lost my sanity temporarily, but too many events that my spirit wouldn’t let me shrug it all off as just coincidences.  Started learning about the sacred secretion.  Read the book anatomy of the spirit and it reassured me I was in fact sane for once, just discovered something I didn’t know even existed.  Since then slowly weened myself off all of my psychiatric meds with the help of a homeopathic psychiatrist.  I haven’t been the same since then and don’t doubt my choice.  My friends and family haven’t doubted my choice either.  Now when I get depressed it’s just for a day.  I just try my best to meditate and exercise every day.  If I don’t, I get days like today where I didn’t sleep because I squandered my time on my days off of work.  Don’t know if I was misdiagnosed or what, oh well.  I made it to where I’m at and I’m thankful I just made it here.  So long story short, I do not agree with underage diagnosis!
Spart_Farkles [info] Star Wars. Especially once I was diagnosed with bipolar and realized my Space Queen had it, too.
haiku25 [info] Hi, dual diagnosis here as well. I have BP-II, BPD and other comorbid illnesses. I was diagnosed with bipolar I’m 2015 and I remember that day so clearly because all the pieces just fell into place. I was put on meds and I slightly responded to them (I also had a horrible psydoc that gave me things no bipolar person should take) but also became even more unstable. I never thought I had BPD, at all. I always blamed everything on the bipolar. They do overlap and once I got the bipolar diagnosis, I thought it just made sense. After two hospital visits in two years, getting medication that either made me mentally or physically ill, I finally got a new psydoc. Around six months ago (or 4 or 5, I actually don’t remember the exact date from the top of my head), I decided to see a therapist. I had watched a few YouTube videos (I know, not the best idea) on the difference between BPD and bipolar. I knew I was bipolar, I had responded to the medication but I also knew something was off in me. I saw my therapist (who specializes in BPD) and within ten minutes, she confirmed my fears. I had both bipolar and BPD. She did doubt my bipolar at first but not anymore. With new meds, I’m stable and I hope that my bipolar is under control—for now at least. Which leads me to my BPD. Medication solved a ton of (bipolar) issues but it has made me very self-aware in that I can now tell the difference between the two. For the longest time, I had blamed everything on bipolar, even the mood swings, intense fear of abandonment and irrational bouts of anger. It wasn’t until a year ago when I lashed out and became super angry over something so trivial and someone pointed it out to me that I knew something was wrong—other than my bipolar. Being chemically stable has forced me to realize that I now need to work on my BPD. It’s so weird, before when I was unstable and extremely depressed, getting the BPD diagnosis on top of bipolar was just too much for me to bear.  But now, I feel like it’s not only manageable but with CBT/DBT therapy, I can slowly relearn things. Before, I had blamed bipolar for everything, hated it and myself and yes, at times I did use it as a crutch. I’m now at the point in my life (30 next year) where I’m tired of being messed up and I just want to live. In the best capacity that I can. It all sounds so positive but I swear, it’s really not. I’m currently struggling with my identity (who am I without my disorder(s)?), some ED-related stuff, anxiety and a toxic (abusive) work environment. So, I have good days and really bad days where I just resort to bad habits because it comes naturally. But now I’ve stopped fighting everything and have reached the acceptance phase. This is my normal and yeah, I hate it sometimes but it’s all I’ve ever known and I’m okay with that. I’m sorry this message is so long. Apologies for any spelling or grammatical errors, I’m typing this about to fall asleep. I guess this is my own rant. It feels really good to know there are others out there with dual diagnoses. Thank you for your post, all the best. 
minkabun [info] I do not have Asperper's so I will not pretend to fully comprehend your struggles but I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder ten years ago and the best advice I got regarding work was to fill out an ADA form (Americans with Disabilities Act). It can feel degrading at first but many employers—at least the good ones—are empathetic and willing to work with you to find a balance for managing work life. I had a manic episode within a month of starting a new job. My employer graciously told me to take off as much time as I needed to recuperate and ensured that my position would be there waiting for me when I was ready. If you go in being completely open with your employer, you may find that they are able to help accommodate your needs. Many are willing to work with you to find the best possible ways to be effective and help you determine your strengths and the best way to apply them. 
cactiss [info] Definitely this. Before I was diagnosed with bipolar i placed a lot of expectations on my then boyfriend. I've learned that it's super important to communicate about how you feel in general. Through love (and if they are mentally capable at that time) they will be more prepared for the lows.Definitely a lot easier when you live with them though :)
mjp141r [info] I’ve recently learned this and I’m starting to believe it’s true. I was diagnosed right after 9/11. I had a plane ticket for that day so I was pretty fucking traumatized. Anyway, my mood swings started shortly after and they were triggered easily and rapidly. I was diagnosed with bipolar 2, rapid cycling when I think it’s PTSD. I still think I have a mood disorder but not rapid cycling.
wildtownunited [info] Hi everyoneI've been diagnosed with bipolar2I take vraylar 3mg + seroquel 100mg each nightI still don't sleep much, but now I do get tired after about a week of getting less then an hour of sleep a day.I have a marriage counselor and a marriage mentor. I attend a men's group and celebrate recovery (a 12 step program) weekly.I have a cbt and a bipolar2 workbooks that I need to read.I need to eat better, exercise, and organize my time better.**Any advice out there? I'd love to hear it.****Thanks in advance for reading.*****Peace and Low Stress***
barnito_supreme_ [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar for years and was being treated with meds that more closely align with that diagnosis. As time went on, it became apparent that I was having some symptoms that more closely aligned with schizoaffective so that's where I ended up. It was a slow and gradual process.
sweetally4 [info] It is, I’ve been on so many medications. I really hope you don’t suffer the same path as myself. I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 in Jan 2018. Then rediagnosed with BP2 with comorbid BPD in August 2018. So I’ve been hanging around here for awhile!I’m on 40mg of Latuda right now to try and keep me as stable as possible (can’t go up anymore due to nausea/side effects) my anxiety is a bit worse but otherwise it’s okay.
mcbstl345 [info] I think it's the Effexor I take for my GAD (generalised anxiety disorder. I was diagnosed with bipolar with psychotic features a long time ago, I'm 40 now and tried all the sleeping pills besides Ambien and Lunesta. None have worked unfortunately, nor did Melatonin.
MildlyUpsetCrusader [info] A lot of things, over the last year or so I've thought a lot about life. I've had a lot of suicidal ideation and such as I've been diagnosed with bipolar one. I started not wanting to because I was terrified of non existance but then I realized it's not scary, because there is no you to be non existent.Then I thought about how shitty life is. Not even for me just the billions of people without clean water. Those who are raped. People dying of cancer. It's all rather shitty and happiness is extremely fleeting and most of the time at best people are feeling meh all the time.Then I thought about my own life. Maybe nothing is hopeless, but its just so much more difficult to try and get better. Esspecialy becuase I'm going to have episodes the rest of my life. Bipolar is a hell of a disease and it'll only get worse. I don't want to try that.My long term partner recently left me, but I was planning on hanging myself before that anyways, so that's not my main reason. Although it sure does help.
emeraldmtns [info] I agree with this comment. When I was 16 I went into a psychiatrist for depression. Looking back, he wasn't. great psychiatrist. He prescribed me an adhd med and antidepressant. It slowly turned into a full manic episode and then it ended with me attempting suicide, where I was diagnosed with bipolar. I think you should get a second opinion. I'm 24 and have been smoking marijuana since 16 off and on. I've never experienced a marijuana induced psychosis, especially with those extreme delusions. I am no doctor but I would assume that would be difficult to diagnose after the fact. Get a second opinion. And ultimately listen to your intuition. 
moodistry [info] The truth is, I self-medicated with LSD.  It had an amazingly positive experience and outcome for me.  I do not recommend this for the vast majority of people unless they have access to a therapist with experience using psychedelics in a therapeutic context or a research project.Before doing it, I looked extensively at research project protocols (dose, frequency, setting, etc.).  I have about 35 years of psychedlic use.  I was diagnosed about 15 years ago, and I've developed a high level awareness of my mood cycles in that time (I'm diagnosed with bipolar 2).  It was a risk I was willing to take because I had become dangerously suicidal.  It can be risky for people with mental health issues, but generally speaking it has a safety profile vastly better than most pharma drugs.  And it is not something you need to do forever.There's lots of both main stream media and scientific content out there discussing the benefits for unipolar depression (much less info and research about bipolar).  If you think this is a path you might choose, do lots and lots of research.  Michael Pollan's book *How to Change Your Mind* is a really good starting place.
hilfnafl [info] TL;DR He's given up on himself, you haven't given up on him. You can break up with him in good conscience.You're being perfectly fair and you're not giving up on him too soon. A fair assessment of your situation is that he's given up on himself. He knows what's wrong with his mental health. He knows what he has to do to improve his mental health. He's also shown you that he has no interest in doing anything to improve his mental health. You can't help someone who doesn't want to help themselves.I (58M) was diagnosed with major depressive disorder when I was a teenager until I had manic episode in my twenties and I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder. I'm not a mental health professional, but I have enough experience to know that your boyfriend's mood won't improve unless he receives professional help. You've done everything you can to get him to seek professional help to no avail. Your boyfriend is smoking weed instead of taking antidepressants and seeing a therapist. Your boyfriend has a dual diagnosis which means that he has a major mental illness and a substance abuse disorder. If you talk with any mental health professional they'll tell you that a patient with a dual diagnosis can be very difficult to treat effectively. There are a number of reasons for this, but suffice it to say that even if your boyfriend saw a psychiatrist first thing on Monday it could be weeks, months or years before his mood was stable.The last thing that I will say about your boyfriend is that if he's serious about quitting weed then he needs to SMART Recovery meetings at a minimum. If that doesn't work then he should voluntarily commit himself to inpatient treatment on a psych ward. Enough about your boyfriend ... it's self-help time.>You don't have to set yourself on fire just to keep other people warm.You have no obligation to help your boyfriend because he refuses to help himself. You also have no obligation to stay with your boyfriend because he's dragging you down instead of building you up. You won't be able to take care of your own mental health until you stop trying to take care of his mental health.If you decide to break up with him, and I sincerely hope that's what you decide to do, then you should cut off all contact with him once the breakup is complete. The breakup may be complicated if your living together, but it will be well worth it for you to work through those complications. The best reason to cut off all contact with him is that it will allow you to move forward with your life. He's not going to go away easily because he's an addict and addict's are very good at manipulating people. The best way to make sure that he doesn't weasel his way back into your life is to cut him out of your life.You should look for a support group near you. The DBSA is a good place to start. If there are no DBSA meetings near you, you should look for a NAMI meeting or a Recovery International meeting.
Tc8993 [info] Lastly, I was approved for the treatment of MDD through the Veterans Administration. Even though in my record, I've been diagnosed with bipolar 2 for 15 years.But it's the depression component that's caused the most issues. Surprisingly, I've been told that with the DSM, it's a set of characteristics rather than a specific diagnosis. So my VA psychiatrist, who's rarely referred  for TMS, listed depression as the referred diagnosis.  Because I really am suffering from depression exclusively.And it was approved. 180 days with unlimited visits.I'm sharing this with the hope that if there are other veterans that read this and contact your office, there is hope for coverage. I'll keep you posted, dr. Kent. And I'm going to check out your website. Thank you. Thomas Seattle Washington USA 😊
dizzysoda [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar NOS in 2016. I had a 4-day manic episode and a complete psychotic break, so they put me on medication. That turned to severe bipolar 1 with psychotic features in 2018 when I rapid cycled the entire year. Got my mood stable but still had psychosis so I got diagnosed with schizoaffective (bipolar subtype) when I had a psychotic episode last summer.
Pho_Zenny [info] I'm afraid I did come across a little strong.  I apologize to the OP for that. I take mental health very seriously and I have to learn to loosen up a bit. In any case, I'm just being honest. I've been in OP's shoes, and I understand how anxiety and depression affects the mind. I've lived with an anxiety disorder since childhood, and recently I have been diagnosed with bipolar. I am familiar with the mechanics of therapy and medication, and lifelong illnesses.OP, what I'm trying to say is that you should focus more on your mental health in order to iron out the things like knowing when to tap out. I'm sorry if I'm being condescending again. I don't know how else to convey my message.
MeatballsRegional [info] I have a lot of thoughts on Migraine. I was diagnosed with bipolar type 1 after an incredibly destructive period in my life. I was put on medication that I take daily and I am absolutely thriving, but it was definitely difficult for me to accept. While I would *never* go off my meds unless necessary, it's a lot."I begin to assemble/What weapons I can find/'Cause sometimes to stay alive/You gotta kill your mind"That shit hits HARD. Some day it's still hard to accept that without medication I don't have a lot of control over my me. Every time I hear that verse I cry.
texasaggieporkchop [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder 2 and bulimia nervosa. I'm not skinny though! Big misconception lol.
jonbearab [info] In my opinion, skip the NP and go straight to a psychiatrist. If you need a referral, go to your PCP. If you do see a NP, make sure they are a *psychiatric NP*.If you do have bipolar, don't let them prescribe antidepressants without first being on a mood stabilizer, as you can go very manic and regret it later. Also, don't take an antidepressant "to make sure you're bipolar or not."I've heard of people prescribing medication without an official diagnosis. But I would push for a diagnosis, then take medication.Ok, so to answer your question, the intake process is not that bad. For me, I went in, and basically started telling her my symptoms. Bring in a piece of paper with your symptoms written on it so you don't forget. After a while, she started asking me questions such as "who is the president of the United States?", "what year is it?", things like that. She then asked questions relating to my symptoms such as "how angry do you get when someone cuts you off in the parking lot?". After an hour and a half, I was diagnosed with bipolar type 2. And that was it. She wrote a script for lamotrigine and I was on my way.
linkmademedoit [info] Social Work major here. It took me 5 years to get my undergrad and I'm hopefully going to graduate with my masters this May (struggling to focus in one class). One semester in undergraduate I had to medically withdraw because of the disorder. I did get a few Ds and Fs in there. The best advice I can give is to keep seeing your doctor and go to therapy. The therapist should help you work through daily struggles and the psychiatrist or nurse practitioner should help you get stable on your medications. It took 6 years for me to get stable on my meds. It doesn't happen overnight. I'm on 4 different medications and we are hanging on the edge of a 5th. Others have more, some have less. I struggled in my classes with and without meds. I have to be open with my professors and tell them when I am struggling. I have even told some of them about the disorder and my medication change and have been given extensions or extra assignments to keep my grades up. It also depends on your own determination. You and I may be different. I was determined to prove people wrong, that some people with bipolar disorder could lead a successful life too with the proper treatment. I was determined to be proud of myself. For me, I needed meaning to keep going because some days would have been easy to just give up. Also, look for support. If you have people who know about your disorder, seek out their support too. That can help you move forward if you need someone else to talk to. Oh and to put it into context I have been diagnosed with bipolar 1 with rapid cycling. Don't let the disorder define you. You'll make it through this. We are proof it's possible. Now you just need to hold onto the determination within yourself. <3
SleepDreamRepeat [info] As someone who has type 1 diabetes and manic depressive disorder I can say that the stigma for both are so damn high. I always get the comments of "You can't be diabetic you're skinny!" Most people believe what ever the movies or media tells them. When I was diagnosed with diabetes all my friends and family were there to support me and help me. When I was diagnosed with bipolar no one came to support me through it. In fact most stopped associating with me entirely because I was labeled "Crazy" or whatever. Even after being stable for years I can't escape that stigma. When someone you know is suffering from a mental illness please don't let that illness define them.
bipolar_cap [info] Many of the symptoms of BPD and bipolar overlap, and it is also possible to have both at the same time. I was diagnosed with bipolar 2, then I went into a different health service and they suspected BPD before confirming the bipolar diagnosis.But whatever your symptoms, only a medical professional can give you a diagnosis. So if you feel you need more support or want to discuss your symptoms and diagnosis, I strongly encourage you to have another conversation with them - or with someone different who can give you a second opinion.Whatever "label" is given to the symptoms you have, the most important thing is that you receive support that helps you, be that medication or other therapies. So I suggest focusing on that aspect - your personal wellness - above any named disorder.Wishing you well x
a_throwaway_account3 [info] Thank you for your reply. I always thought that I had some deep issues stemming from my childhood. I cannot express my feelings and I just suppress them. I want them to surface and fix them. I also experienced a major manic psychotic episode. I still remember some parts and they are all my own serious problems. I think somebody needs to listen to me and guide me to be whole again.The reason I am suspicious with the technique is that it's still considered experimental. It may be due to the fact that current meta around the field is psychoanalysis. Gestalt is existential and my therapist has a PhD in philosophy, and master's degree in psychology.Researching around to topic made me realize that I actually have trust issues. I have basically read everything I could about the therapist and the technique. I try to answer whether this will be useful to me or not. Maybe I should stop and give it a try. Worst case is I will just lose a little bit of money.edit: I am diagnosed with bipolar type 1 and I have been taking my medication regularly. I now feel stable and ready for some therapy
BoobeusHagrid [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar about a year after my daughter was born because I had a mixed episode that lasted about that length of time, in which I damaged relationships with my family. You’re not alone and it does get better! But it does take work to get better, too. We’re all here for you!
psychedelicsweets [info] I didnt think of seeing someone specifically who works with BPD (I'm assuming you mean bipolar here; please correct me if I'm wrong!)I was diagnosed with bipolar in the hospital, and I've been titrating up on Lamictal. I felt stable for 2 weeks, but then this happened. Even, my mood still feels fine, just the reaction happened. I'm still not quite at therapeutic dose, and I think i was in. A bad mixed ep beforehand, so I might still be in it and it breaking through. I'm gonna talk to my doc and see what to do.
BrokeGuy808 [info] Hey a thread I can finally contribute to! A few weeks ago I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder by my therapist while I was having a particularly bad manic episode. I think the best way to describe how my brain felt is this: imagine an old school pinball machine, the ones with the buttons on the sides and the lights and shit. My thoughts feel like the pinball shooting around inside hitting all those levers and switches, moving too fast to focus on.Also I’ve noticed that I became far more prone to anxiety attacks, and those attacks were substantially more vicious.I wrote down a list of how I felt in my notes during it so I can copy and paste some of it here:- RACING thoughts - Time flies fast- VERY Easily distracted- EXTREMELY forgetful - Hard to filter what I think due to racing thoughts- Hard to filter what I say- Much faster talking speed- General elated ‘high’ throughout day- Feel like I have to continuously move- Face and body feels numb - Slight tingly feeling throughout body- Easily irritable- No appetite at all- No need for sleep (at least feels like it)- Very hard to keep track of time/dates- Body is fatiguing but mind is notI jotted all of this down (and more) in about 3 mins lmao. Anyways I still have to get a proper diagnosis from a psychiatrist so I can prescription treatments and what not, in the meantime I’ve been going through a lot of CBD haha.
Seattleite97 [info] Reading your section on the speech really stood out to me. I've ALWAYS been articulate and have never had a problem talking, explaining, presenting, telling stories etc. I was diagnosed with bipolar ll about two years ago. Around that same time I totalled my car and got a concussion, following with substance abuse (not a lot but more than my norm) due to not having a car. Ever since then my speech has been awful. The way you described struggling with remember words..thats me. I have a hard time putting words in the correct order and I honestly sound stupid when I talk now. I've thought this was related to the bipolar but reading your post has be questioning if it was the concussion. May I please DM you asking you more details? I've been struggling for 2 years now and it's tanked my self confidence.
Lvl23Mage [info] Before I was diagnosed with bipolar 2, my dr tried cymbalta. It did nothing for me. So I essentially failed that treatment which the dr determined my bp diagnosis. (I did try other antidepressants and they just made things worse)
16aspenwheeler [info] The worst is when they claim to have something serious (like bipolar) and then they are not diagnosed AND the symptoms are not even close to consistent with the DSM -5. I also see your point with using it as an excuse not to do things or as an excuse to do bad things. That particularly irks me because I am diagnosed with bipolar 1, but have put so much work into making sure I’m a functioning member of society.
Spasschin [info] I was on lithium as a teenager before I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder and it made my hands really shaky. Like I could just be sitting perfectly still and all of a sudden my hand would just fly up into the air, it was weird. I wasn’t on it long cause I had a shit doctor and she would change my meds every few weeks just bc she could so I’ll mention it to my new doctor and see what she thinks.
genieofthelamp11 [info] That’s exactly how I felt when I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder. Look into it. Ask a psychiatrist and don’t forget to mention how you worry but do nothing. That’s the mania kicking you in your depressed behind.
Shamelessfanforlife [info] well I'm diagnosed with bipolar 1, the mania usually lasts like two or four weeks, and the depression is usually kindof the same amounts of time but then sometimes I feel both at the same time. The mania is a fun and games at the beginning but then I start to ruin people's lives by doing reckless things and sometimes putting them in danger. It makes me act like I'm on drugs and then I go psychotic and everything gets foggy so it's really hard to remember much afterwards. And they make me take lamictal and seroquel but they're not working.
evior21 [info] I wrote my mom a letter when I was waaay younger and it had something in it about how I didn't see the point of living. I don't remember much of what was in the note, but I remember that being a very honest sentiment of mine. She went kinda berserk, started yelling and crying(her sister committed suicide so, as an adult now, her reaction is more understandable). Threatened to make me move in with my dad (parents divorced when I was 5) and told me I was just trying to hurt her and manipulate her. Made me feel soooo much worse and that was when I learned I couldn't talk about mental health with my mom...Years of cycles depression and self harm later I've been diagnosed with bipolar (which is what my aunt and my dad had/have).Even if you can't talk with your parents, find someone else who you can talk with (school counselor, teacher, friends, other family members). It's not good to keep that stuff bottled up inside, and while it's hard to open up, especially when you've been denied like that before, it'll be better for you in the long run.
Deepwater49 [info] I was super ready to tell you you’re an asshole but Jesus - she is taking the mick.I have debt and also don’t like it - before I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder I did a lot of stupid shit. My fiancé however is fully aware, maximum payment we can afford are made every month and I’ve never missed a payment. It’s gunna take a while to get rid of it but I understand the importance of why.Your gf is just straight up irresponsible and it sounds like she sees you as a convenient ATM.
Mother_of_dicks [info] I got hit by a car when I was 9. My prefrontal lobe was damaged. Fast forward almost 11 years, I have been diagnosed with bipolar disorder (runs in the family). My psychiatrist thinks the head injury plays a role in my manic episodes because it already makes me impulsive
BornAgainRedditGuy [info] I honestly convinced myself of this because after each depression I emerged from it inspired, productive, and euphoric. Then I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 and realized I was just going to cycles of depression and hypomania and wasn't in control at all. So yeah.
gaiame [info] It’s horrible knowing that we’ve been failed by psych docs who misdiagnosed is. It took almost 20 years that I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 and I did feel a great sense of relief along with real improvement on the new meds. But it still didn’t explain everything. I was diagnosed with DID about a year ago and as awful as that label is, I can’t tell  Yiu what a relief it was to get a diagnosis that explained everything thing. No meds for that, but I have comorbid bipolar2 and PTSD and have good meds for that. Stick with it and if something doesn’t feel right tell them. Good luck!
emyjodyody [info] Great answer! OP perfectly described my life right now. I have been diagnosed with bipolar and PTSD
r0cketappliances [info] I had a psychiatrist tell me once that there's no way I could have bipolar disorder because I don't stand in the middle of the street screaming. Two years later I was diagnosed with bipolar 2. I always knew in the back of my mind that something wasn't right and pretty much lived completely unchecked until a couple of months ago. Now I'm getting better and am left to pick up the pieces of the path of destruction I created for myself.
Cright87 [info] Before I was diagnosed with bipolar, my Dr gave me amitriptyline for sleep and it didn't help me sleep, but I woke up refreshed with little to no sleep and feeling great/terrific, I didn't think I needed sleep anymore.So YES, it definitely caused me to go manic.
hawkingsbird [info] I have PCOS, but I've suspected Cushings for a while too. I discovered the PCOS before I was diagnosed with bipolar, and have to say that i've found treatment for both to be sort of a nightmare. I'm on birthcontrol pills for my PCOS and it messes up my moods for sure, and I'm also on metformin and abilify. I'm still trying to piece apart how much of my mood disorder is based in my PCOS.
JunkDrawerExistence [info] I'm sure mental illness runs in my family - and I am diagnosed with bipolar 2 and borderline personality disorder so I know there is something wrong with me fundamentally as well. That knowledge almost makes it seem less worthwhile to stay alive...I am fundamentally flawed as a human, and while I can manage it with various tools, I will never be as effective or efficient a human as I would have been had I not been flawed. That fact kills me too.
outdoordude1 [info] I just explain it to them in matter of fact terms after the second date.I just tell them I'm diagnosed with bipolar, which means that some days I won't be able to see them. I don't go into it anymore than that unless they ask. It means that there is less pressure on you and an understanding from their side, rather than ambiguity which could be read as disinterest.
thefakerealslimshady [info] ya I cant count the profs on two hands that have said to me "I cant help you because every student in here is depressed and they all manage so why are you special". One prof told me "help was an excuse for me to be lazy and the only way to overcome depression is stop being lazy and force yourself to do stuff." I was even in the godamn neuro program and that was a neuro prof... I told my uni and they did nothing. Its better now for me that I'm diagnosed with bipolar and I've started to accept my condition is perhaps more serious than others and not my fault. At the time these things were so hurtful I wanted to end my life because I felt so inadequate and blamed myself for all my problems, even the bipolar I couldnt control. Bell lets talk day would come in Canada as well and all my friends statuses on facebook and insta would be how depressed they were, they went to therapy and were then fine a month later whereas I'm sitting there repeatedly failing out of college, i cant function, I'm seriously considering killing myself and sitting there wondering why can everyone else do it but I'm so weak. Bottom line: there needs to be more nuance in these conditions to differentiate, which wont happen till we have actual diagnostic tools and a better understanding of complex mechanisms to differentiate. Its taken countless professionals and 7yrs of my life to get diagnosed and start treatement. that's absolutely ridiculous. I might have finished college if I had figured it all out and treated myself sooner.
africanqueen86 [info] I am currently seeking to be evaluated for autism and am not yet diagnosed. The reason why I want to seek a diagnosis is that (a) I have always been very hard on myself for fucking up in social situations, and have never understood why - this could help me change my view of myself and help me to have more self-compassion, (b) I have been diagnosed with bipolar disorder and I think this diagnosis might be wrong - I am on antipsychotics, etc. and I might not need them, (c) I need reasonable adjustments at work, (d) my executive functioning is worsening and I don't know the reason why - burnout could help explain it, (e) I always force myself to socialize while I should be doing the opposite.I guess having a diagnosis would just help me with adequate treatment and self-care, accommodations at work, and help me to understand myself better.
taytay9955 [info] Some people who have medicine resistant bipolar have better results from the keto diet ( which was designed to treat epilepsy) so maybe that is an option if you notice that it is responsive to changes in diet and exercise. I think if you check the boxes you check the boxes and it is just extra shitty that it doesn't respond to drugs, but if you have never had an EEG it might be worth having done. Sometimes epilepsy can seem like bipolar disorder. I have a really long story about this where I was diagnosed with bipolar, then diagnosed with epilepsy only to get a second and then a third opinion who told me I didn't have epilepsy. However, it could be worth looking into if you have any other warning signs. [https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/11918434](https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/11918434)[https://www.tandfonline.com/doi/abs/10.1080/13554794.2012.690421](https://www.tandfonline.com/doi/abs/10.1080/13554794.2012.690421)
JustaLittleDuckie [info] I wouldn't full on say she is a scumbag, but absolutely scumbagish.My younger sister is very naive and self centered. My older sister and I have been holding out hope that she matures with experience but I have since abandoned all hope.A few months ago she graduated from college, got a job, and then was fired "for no reason" although there are plenty of reasons (namely the fact that she dressed so provocatively in a business environment that the company set up a mandatory meeting just to review the dress code. Three times). My parents have been her other source of income since forever and had then cut her off. So, then she is fired and for the first time she experiences what it is like to not have enough money for food, have to choose between rent and car payment, etc. So, being a mom of 3 paycheck-to-paycheck, I call her several times a week. I walk her through the process of asking for extensions on her bills, explain the process of welfare. I encourage her, support her, reassure her that her lack of employment does not mean she is a bad person, etc. I am supportive. Damn it.So one week she gets a new job. Yay!!! That same week, I am diagnosed with bipolar disorder. This is emotionally devastating. I am confused, alone, devastated, terrified. Not to mention my career is over. I am lost. Scared.I tell her through email. She responds that I not "throw it in peoples faces to get sympathy" and to not expect special treatment.I still haven't gotten over it. I haven't mentioned it since, and likely never will. But it really crushed me. I am not a whiner. I am not attention seeking at all (actually, she is) so it really broke my heart.I still haven't gotten over it. Can you tell? Lol
belladanka [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar at 15, and since then have added GAD, SAD, and I'm clinically depressed.
Masian [info] Yup, can attest to this. I burnt all of my bridges and completely excluded myself from society during an episode before I was diagnosed with bipolar affective disorder. It wasn't a pretty time. Thank god for meds, psychiatry and therapy.
themildones [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar II when I was 10 but didn't know about the memory loss until last year (I'm 24). I wish I had known about it sooner because it would have saved me a LOT of freaking out. Thanks for doing this <3 I always look forward to seeing you art.
macnsleaze [info] You assumed I was here for the generalized reasons that the stigma taught you....because I need conflict...because I've been diagnosed with bipolar?? If you didn't have my medical information, you couldn't jump to that conclusion (in order to use my diagnosis against me, and discredit what I'm saying). That's a cheap shot tbh. You may not personally create stigma by sharing your experience, but think about the bigger picture. The problem when you contribute to a community cesspool of negative bipolar associations--on a media site which is accessed by thousands of people reinforcing the association between "bipolar" and "hard to deal with," marketed not toward actual people with bipolar, but for their neurotypical SOs to chit chat and crowdsource whiny stories between strangers online (if they're all "begging for help" as they claim, they need professional help rather than advice from faceless amateur internet users). It is a fact that enumerated in the name of the sub is the term "bipolar," containing a thread full of miserable stories. Widening the trench between "us and them." That is where the stigma comes from. It shouldn't be taken personally, but like every social movement, bipolar stigma can be muted (but it seems all of them secretly enjoy the superiority *not being the one with stigma* gives them in the relationship. Usually under the guise: *i love them so much, I'm such a good SO, look at everything I do for them, and I'm sure they're a good person inside but their crazy ass sucks, they always yell at me and break up with me*). But within the bipolar population, there is an average ratio of normal functioning/low functioning individuals, but everyone here refuses to believe it. But believing the truth is hard when you belong to and habitually scroll through again, a community cesspool of negativity (under the guise of good intentions). You all seem to agree that *everyone* who is bipolar is crazy, when that is far from reality. I mourn for everyone like me who will continue to be prejudiced against until this is finally understood.EDIT: Soon this kind of sub will be as frowned upon as racist ones. Imagine a sub of parents complaining that their daughter is dating a black guy. The excuses are similar, they sound right and are accepted by those giving them, but to the ones they victimize, they are flimsy, creepy and wrong. Don't contribute to what essentially is propaganda, no matter how well you convince yourself it's innocuous, let alone beneficial.
Hdw333333 [info] Yep, and I'm 30, and yet I still can't get my tubes tied because I haven't had any kids yet/ aren't old enough. I decided I don't want kids 10 years ago when I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder, but I'm not allowed to make that choice until I'm "mature enough to know I won't change my mind". Fucking teenagers have more control over their bodies than me, a 30 year old fucking woman. It's infuriating. 
Rtg327gej [info] I hear where you are coming from, I have been diagnosed with bipolar. The problem with weed is that I abused it every waking hour and in the long run it only exacerbated my anxiety and it wreaked havoc with my bipolar disorder. We are all different so my experience may be different from yours.
haunted_mirror [info] I've been diagnosed with bipolar only recently, but I have had it for years. It caused little issues between me and my SO, but we always managed to make it through. We are in this together. He is the love of my life and not hurting him is my priority. I am the love of his life and supporting me is his priority. I don't feel a burden for him. He doesn't feel crushed by my illness. We have our balance and it is the most beautiful thing in the world. He gets me like no one does. I get him like no one does. This month we celebrated our 10th anniversary together and we are now officially engaged. 
Fatassmatilda [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar 10 years ago and I was diagnosed with borderline 4 years ago. I think I was always both at the same time but they finally realized the borderline part too. So living with both idk I figured out bipolar i can see when I'm becoming manic when I'm becoming depressed but o god the mood switches with borderline are fucking terrible they can change at any moment so I am rapidly cycling through moods on top of whatever bipolar is doing to me. I don't have any friends n my family all want me dead. And on top of this I also have PTSD and a panic disorder. Idk I got hit with the crazy stick hard. One interesting thing though that made me respond to ur post is that everyone always tells me " ooo no u can be both bipolar and borderline it's one or the other " but my doctor's diagnosed me so fuck those people they r not doctor's idk have u ever had someone say that to you?
adltchickadee [info] This is just what I've been feeling about this hashtag and I haven't been able to nail it down until you put it into words. Yes, nothing is ever said about hypomania! I used to teach, and I clearly remember a few students who I had to kick out of class for monopolizing conversation and making random sexual comments. That was years ago, and now that I've been diagnosed with bipolar, I realize that they were likely hypomanic and probably undiagnosed or off their meds. If I had know what was going on (i.e., if there  was a movement to "raise awareness" about hypomanic symptoms), I could have talked to them outside of class and referred them to the counseling center instead of telling them to gtfo of my classroom.Praising people for coming out with mental illness sounds wonderful, too, but I worry that people in high school and young college students getting comfortable with being "out" in high school and college will run into some cruel realities when they hit the workforce. Depending on their workplace, being "out" can possibly risk them their jobs. The rest of the world is not as progressive as some parts of the internet and most colleges. Leaving the security of school is terrifying for most students; building your self-concept around your mental health diagnosis will only make that transition worse.
nthnnh [info] I wish I could answer your question. Ive been on it for 7 years now, iniatlly 100mg a day to treat BPD but now I've been diagnosed with bipolar ii I'm going up to 300mg a day, been tapering up from 150mg a day for a few months now. As the person above me suggested talk to your doctor about it would be best. What effects are you expecting from it? My dose increase was to see if it helped control my hypomanic episodes and I'm not sure that it's working bc I feel like I'm going into one right now. I do feel it's really helped my depression though, my episodes arent nearly as severe as they used to be.
One-Eyed-Granny [info] Lol reminds me of when they put me on a high dose of methylphenidate for ADHD before I was diagnosed with bipolar.  Hello, six weeks of mania! That did NOT go well.
babykittenbella [info] I’m an adult child. At age 32 I suffered an episode of mania. My mother comitted me to an insititution involuntarily, and I was diagnosed with bipolar 1. I have been stable since, but am suffering severe consequences of the meds and social stigma around mental illness. It sounds like your son needs help very urgently. I did too at the time. However... Today I am scared of my mother and SO, because of the trauma of getting me help. There was paramedics and police involved, I was taken to a hospital in handcuffs, even though I never hurt anyone including myself. I have forgiven them, but will never ever forget. I think it might have been better if they had explained to me that I could go voluntarily, if not they had the power to rob me of my rights and would get it done without my consent. I might have gone on my own... Good luck!
ridethewavy [info] I saw this post and had to watch it immediately. It is totally me. I was diagnosed and treated for  ADHD from the age of 9 to 20ish.  After I had my first manic episode I was diagnosed with bipolar. It’s definitely something you should discuss with a psychiatrist. I would suggest making an appointment soon. 
thesesharpobjects [info] Honestly I still have bad days but overall I’m so much better. I sought therapy last year and it’s helped immensely. I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder and I also learned a lot of my problems were really just a result of deep rooted issues.
cinnamonrolls10 [info] Yes, omg. I’ve had palpitations so I went to the doctor and once she found out I was diagnosed with bipolar and anxiety, she disregarded every physical complaint I had and just wanted to send me off to a psychiatrist. Later I found out I really had a heart problem. 
MainerBitch [info] It has so many wonderful messages! I was just diagnosed with bipolar disorder, but I’ve always felt like Elsa- isolated. Different. Always seeking answers. Her empowerment in both movies has been such a hopeful message for me. I love these movies so much, and I’m so grateful they exist.
Genderflux-Capacitor [info] I wish I had more ideas for you. I'm transgender, and that has made it difficult to find a good psychiatrist. The first one referred to me as a "transsexual" upon our first meeting and then clutched his pearls when I referred to myself as queer.**Side note: Don't know how familiar you are with LGBTQIA etiquette (US, in this particular case). For anyone not familiar, neither transsexual nor queer should be used for anyone UNLESS THEY IDENTIFY THAT WAY. Him referring to me as transsexual was very ignorant. And frankly very strange. People usually default to trans or transgender these days. On the other hand, it is very common for people to refer to themselves as queer these days. I thought it was super strange that he was taken aback by that.Anyway, this guy scared me, and when my symptoms got worse and worse, I was too afraid to go back to him. This was before I was diagnosed with bipolar. So I went somewhere else. It didn't work out with the next person either, although that one actually did correctly diagnose me.So now comes the fun part: Dr. Alexis. I LOVED her at first. She actually said that she understood the trans thing and cared about my name and pronouns! I loved Herbst! She understood me! But she was always late. Very late. Sometimes by an hour.I kept telling her that this wasn't okay because I had to work. She would just get really condescending with me and tell me that I needed to be prepared to wait.On one of our last appointments, I very politely told her that I really needed her to be on time. She proceeded to deadname me. Repeatedly. Keep in mind, she had never treated me under my deadname. She never knew me by that name. It really felt like her "punishing" me for calling her out. She spent most of our 15 minutes lecturing me about HOW DARE I EXPECT HER TO BE ON TIME.I still remember how horrible it felt to be deadnamed REPEATEDLY and MALICIOUSLY and having to just accept it because she held my prescriptions in her hands.
Overclockinggirl [info] I am so sorry you’re going through this and it probably breaks your heart that you cannot physically get to her because of your disability. My mother was disabled and I know it would’ve broken her heart if she couldn’t get to me to help me. I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder almost 2 years ago and it is a tough battle but I am doing ok now. I will say that hospitalizations were 100% necessary about 4-5 times in my life. I tried committing suicide twice and failed, obviously. Then voluntarily committed myself after that because I realized I couldn’t go on living that way. Unfortunately, even after being hospitalized twice during that severe, 2 year long depressive episode, it didn’t get me to a euthymic mental state. Now that I am on the correct medication (mood stabilizer and LOW dose of an SSRI), I feel better than ever. I can say first hand that alcohol does not mix with bipolar disorder. I am struggling with that reality now but I’m working on it. I would say your best bet would be to call 911 or perhaps, if she is more stable today, the non-emergency number for the location she lives. I’m sure you can google it and find their number. Explain the situation and see if they can help. You could also try contacting NAMI (National Alliance of Mental Illness). Also, don’t beat yourself up and try to take care of yourself. It can be very draining trying to help someone with mental illness. I have lost many wonderful friends and even immediate family members because they weren’t able to balance their own lives and try to support me and help me. Deep down, I am a very happy, loving, calm, friendly person. However, when I am either manic or depressed, I’m a totally different person. It can scare people away and make them feel uncomfortable. If you have any other questions, feel free to direct message me. I hope this helped.
somethingsophie [info] You mentioned mania and depression, so I think we're diagnosis twins. I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder about two years ago and my entire family is riddled with mental health problems. Mine is particularly concerning as it has almost landed me in the hospital and very much effects my daily life. While I do not have PCOS or any physical issue that would prevent me from having children, I do understand the fear of passing mental health issues. I have seen my own father destroy our family because of his issues, and I know how much I struggle with my own on a day to day basis. I do not want my future potential offspring to have to fight that. Furthermore, my partner  whom I love deeply and plan on hanging out with forever is on the spectrum as well as a host of his own issues. The both of us agreed that there's just not really an ethical way that we could do the whole kid thing. The kick in the stomach is that he never really wanted them before being in our relationship, and I never really thought about them either. He's also got these two nephews that we see from time to time (we're moving to the same town as them) that are aged 1 and 3 and I'd never realized how maternal I could be.I don't really know how to describe the moment that I realized it. I was alone in my apartment when I connected the dots. It was weird because I never actively wanted children, but it seemed like a door was being slammed in my face. Even worse, it was/is a door that I could still have the choice of walking through if I want to, but I don't know how to do it without feeling supreme guilt. I cried a great deal. It was very uncharacteristic of me. I was just so fundamentally sad about it. I will admit, I sort of put it in a little space in the back of my head and I try not to think about it. Because we are different, I would be physically able, I guess my brain is compartmentalizing.Although you do have PCOS, that doesn't necessarily mean your eggs are not viable. If they are, IVF and surrogate is an option. If I'm being honest, if I were to ever have children, we may opt for surrogate regardless. Women with bipolar disorder tend to have more volatile pregnancies. The mood swings can be extreme and mine are already, quite frankly, dangerous as is. Although it's a long way off, we are aware that we need to keep all of those options open to us. I will say that I, personally, have never felt *any* inclination to be pregnant. To me, it would be a way of having a biological child.I'm the same age as you are, and it's been difficult. While I do know that I cannot possibly imagine the challenges and hurdles that you face are and how they must make you feel, I do know that there are so many options out there. As far as adoption goes, it is a completely viable and wonderful option. I do feel that innate selfishness of hoping that my future child would be a little version of my partner running around because he is great and I think that would be great, but I also know that adoption is an incredible route to take. I'm sure other people would be able to write more in depth relevant responses to this fact as I have little to no experience with the matter.*PS. Since I suspect we have the same diagnosis and I have not heard of this gene, would you mind possibly sharing the knowledge so that I could educate myself?* 
pokemonsunisbest [info] Seroquel is a pretty common first med to try. The sleepiness is totally normal. Feeling like you don’t need the medication anymore is totally normal. Not sure what it’s like where you are but you need to get in with a therapist and/or a psychiatrist ASAP. This is your first step. Once you have an official diagnosis then you personally know. Don’t stop the seroquel no matter how good you may feel without talking to a doctor first. You can always tell the doctor the seroquel makes you too tired you don’t want that and want to try something different. I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder type 2. Then major depressive disorder. Then after an outpatient program bipolar disorder type 1. I had a manic episode that turned psychotic thanks to Wellbutrin. It’s a fine line the doctors have to walk and they are just being careful. So they don’t want to straight up give you an antidepressant. I was on max dose of vraylar when they added the Wellbutrin and it still made me manic. They are being super careful by giving you seroquel first. If they suspect bipolar disorder then roll with that for now.
schalk81 [info] I am diagnosed with bipolar disorder and oftentimes I can't make it outside for days on end. So I brought outside in. 
Silly_Sloth_Owl [info] I’ve been told that as well. It definitely makes me more confused. I have been diagnosed with bipolar 2 for a very long time and haven’t been diagnosed with anything different, just anxiety/ ADD in addition to the BP2. But sometimes I don’t feel like certain symptoms match and I already have a hard time identifying with my disorder.Its hard because I know they mean it in a kind way. I am not upset. It just confuses me and isn’t as comforting as they intend it to be.(This happens with close friends, and it also happened with some coworkers who ended up finding out. Long story about how the coworkers found out.)Edit: Left a part out so I added it in, lol.
crypticcalamity [info] Took a reply I made in the multiple sclerosis subreddit and altered it slightly for this post. My husband was diagnosed with multiple sclerosis in 2013 and wanted to divorce because he didn't want to 'put me through' the uncertainty, the facets of disability that could prevent a 'normal' life, etc. I got mad and told him never to say that crap again. It's been hard, sure, especially after we had a child (turning 4 in August), but I cherish him in a way he still doesn't seem to quite believe or understand.I've been diagnosed with bipolar 1 mixed and rapid cycling episodes plus a few other things recently, but my unmanaged condition caused a lot of trials and heartache for both of us. Even still, he persevered. He believes in me when I don't. He loves me even when I go off the deep end, and is there to cushion my fall when I leap off proverbial cliffs.I believe in him. He is intelligent, kind, gentle, willing to try whatever new adventure I've decided to start (or support and embrace the changes my illness can bring). I love him so deeply that it hurts when my actions cause him harm or when his condition makes him feel pain, feel like a burden, feel worthless and depressed. Honestly I am scared for both of us. Neither of us know what our different illnesses have in store for the future. However, knowing that I have a partner who will take me as I am, even when I was not taking meds and barreling down paths full of bad choices, he stays by me, loves me, and holds me when I inevitably shatter and make life altering decisions that are difficult to recover from.We didn't sign up for life to throw this crap at us, but it did. Instead of giving up or shutting down, we take things as they come and try to adjust as best we can. We communicate. We genuinely care about each others emotional and physical wellbeing. We also adjust and make the best of the situation. Instead of being disappointed/upset that the beach is not an option, we make plans to take our daughter to the aquarium. (He can get a wheelchair and it is in the ac, and when our little girl inevitably gets worn out walking, she can ride the daddy express!) I want to make sure that we still get out and enjoy our time as a family and to savor every minute we get to spend living and experiencing life. It may not be what I imagined it would be years ago, but there is always a way to find a fun compromise and use the illness as a means of enjoying life in a different way.I don't understand how he can weather through the storm that is me, and he doesn't understand why I want him to be my partner and lover for life. I advocated his treatment and made decisions when he couldn't mentally cope. And he has done the equivalent for me.To anyone reading this, scared to be a burden or in a relationship or to have a family: you are worth it. You deserve any happiness you can find in life and you deserve to love and be loved and supported. If you want children, you deserve to have them and watch them grow, to teach them and in return savor the magic of life through their eyes.It isn't easy, but having my husband in my life makes it easier feel that living is worth it.Thank you, love. You will never be a burden to me. You give me the opportunity to think outside the box and find ways to enjoy life that are non-conventional and more interesting for it!
sundazedonsundays [info] Late to comment but you sound knowledgeable and I was wondering if you know how one can tell the difference between bipolar 2 and cptsd?I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 rapid cycling but the rapid cycling is random. Doesn’t follow any pattern for any amount of time.I tried an SSRI and it made me suicidal and anxious and a mess, my psychiatrist (who is not up-to-date on a lot of things) said that’s classically how one finds out they are bipolar.Would someone with cptsd still potentially react poorly to an ssri?
bajur [info] I have a special kind of hate for bells ‘let’s talk’ All over Facebook, newspapers, etc you see people saying  stuff like reach out, get help. Talk to someone, etc. the vast majority of the time when I talk to someone about my mental illnesses they get uncomfortable and either leave or change the subject. I lost friends when I was diagnosed with bipolar. Apparently my erratic behavior was ok when it was me being quirky, but not now. And yet they will post about how understanding they are, to reach out, etc. Bells let’s talk is nothing but another way for neurotypical people to pat themselves on the back about how they did good, and then forget about it the next day. And predictably let’s talk doesn’t cover the ‘big’ illnesses. People are talk about depression, anxiety, ptsd (but only if you at a vet!) but bring out the big guns? People shy away from schizophrenia, bipolar, psychosis, BPD, etc. It’s just a PR move to make bell look better. 
Tripotix [info] Thanks! I was diagnosed with bipolar just after completing this and am now on medication. It is helping! ;)
Chibi347 [info] I can totally relate. My older sister (by 6 years) has epilepsy. I remember having the same thoughts of wanting to have my physical injuries being more than they were. I know now that I was just craving more attention, mostly from my father. My family is great but I wanted to be “special” too. I obviously didn’t understand the severity of my sisters condition. I got what I wanted a year ago when I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder. I definitely always want to be mentally okay but sometimes I think about if I broke my leg it would give me an excusable chance to just, slooooow dooooown. I know where you’re coming from but now I just always wanna be okay. It makes me more available to the people I care about when they’re not okay.
BrandonRoyal24 [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 which started around when my sleep problems did 8 year's ago so I'm sure their related but even when I'm not depressed I have this problem I probably sleep better when depressed now that I think of itBut  I wasn't comfortable taking any of the medications that were prescribed to me.So I'll just have to deal with it and hopefully NYMakes cannabis legal soon .
TheLameLesbian [info] Like many people in this sub I have tried many things. I wasnt perscribed SSRIs once I was diagnosed with bipolar, but before when I was diagnosed with unipolar depression I tried Zoloft and lexapro, there were a couple more I tried, I forget the names of them. They did nothing to me, it was lake taking a sugar pill. And then I went on Wellbutrin and was thrown over the ledge and ended up in the hospital. Since then I have been on depakote, vraylar, latuda, abilify and now lamictal
turbophysics [info] Yup, tested into all the advanced classes, AP courses etc., always got dropped down to remedial by the end of the year. Not once in the 4 years of HS did I read a book for a school assignment even though I read _several_ on my own time. Not sure if this is helpful to you but I was diagnosed with bipolar II recently and it made it all much more clear. The overactive left brain period, completely unfocused brain, followed by periods of being completely overwhelmed, defeated, depressed and uninterested in everything.
DawgMan87 [info] The key here is stable job. 2 years ago I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder. It’s no excuse, though it explains why I’ve never held a job for more than 6 months at a time. You can rent a room. The question is how long. I don’t blame anyone for trying. I don’t blame anyone for failing. Though a full or part-time student with a full or part-time job with narc parents and add an undiagnosed mental illness..... thoughts and prayers.
sninapeters [info] I think I’d just had enough of having shitty nails, and having acrylic makes it hard to bite-and whenever I do try I’m reminded instantly to stop. When it’s just my natural nails, I won’t realize I’m biting until It’s too late and already looks bad. I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder over a month ago, that’s where the anxiety stems. I’m taking my medication regularly, and I’m still trying to get all balanced out, but I know I am getting better. 
classictom [info] I am diagnosed with bipolar disorder (which often shares the same medication treatment with schizophrenia, so idk, related?) I started medications which helped a bit, but I was later found to have very low B12 levels. I now get B12 injections once a month and my mood stability has improved.
shibbyshaw [info] I’ve been in it for 10 years and although I get really irritable and angry when my dose goes up (psych adjusts it’s about 2x a year based on how I’m feeling) once I adjust to it there’s nothing better I’ve tried. I take it with Lamictal and seroquel now but when i started it was just Wellbutrin before I was diagnosed with bipolar.
Hlrzzru2000 [info] I made a successful SAP appeal because I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder. Do you have any mental health issues that you could leverage?
notafanofmath [info] I’ll definitely try this next time I feel it coming on, this isn’t a suggestion I’ve heard before, but it makes sense. I took my abortive today, so that definitely helped, but I’m always happy to find other coping mechanisms because the panic med almost completely knocks me out, so I avoid it as much as possible. Physically exhausting myself was what I always did with high anxiety, before I was diagnosed with bipolar, and it did help, so I’ll definitely try this, thank you!
sensistarfish [info] I agree. My focus has improved so much that I’ve managed to fulfill education requirements beyond a high school diploma for the first time in my life in my mid thirties. I feel like the first thing doctors normally prescribe when you come to them with depression concerns is Zoloft, which is what I was first prescribed. After some intense therapy, I was diagnosed with bipolar 2, which stems from childhood trauma.  Zoloft is an SSRI, which can trigger mania in individuals with bipolar, which I never knew. That’s when I switched.That knowledge was available to me because my insurance pays for most of my counseling. Imagine if I didn’t have those resources, like so many people here, and I continued taking the wrong meds. Mental illness is such a tangled web, that getting proper help in the US can feel daunting. I’m anxious to see positive change in that regard. 
quesojacksoncat [info] I used to work as a behavioral counsellor for a residential treatment home for developmentally and physically disabled adults.  We took the ones who had been kicked out of other homes because their behaviors were too violent, extreme and disturbing for those homes. I quickly learned that as the staff we were expected to risk our lives and wellbeing for these clients with zero back up from management in regards to our safety & well-being.Here's a few examples:&#x200B;My main client, a 28 year old woman with violent tendencies towards herself and others (she's put people in the hospital and has nearly lost several limbs and a breast because her self-harm is so severe... she's used an uncooked piece of rice on her skin hard enough to open a vein and don't even get me started with what she can do with a plastic button.. She managed slit her throat quite deep with a broken button once). Anyhow, I worked with this woman in her small apartment along with one other staff member around for support if needed. I'm a 120lb female and while I was confident in my ability to restrain her if needed, she could easily get the upper hand if I was caught off guard and do some serious damage. It wouldn't be the first time. This client developed an obsession with scarring my face and wrote me notes that she wanted to pour boiling kettle water on me while I made her tea sometimes.  She expressed a desire to push me into the oven while I was cooking for her and also said she would grab the wheel while I was driving the company vehicle and make us crash off a bridge.   I no longer felt comfortable cooking foods like pasta or making her tea in the tiny apartment after we had a few close calls and she almost burned me with boiling water.  I brought this to the clinician who makes up her program and he told me I had to continue cooking there (there was an upstairs kitchen for other clients I proposed using) because if I cooked elsewhere it would destroy my clients sense of normalcy.&#x200B;I began asking my client to sit in the very back of the van when I had to drive her places because I feared she would grab the wheel or attack me while I drove (she always sat in the passenger seat before she started up with these threats) and she retaliated by punching the mirror off my personal vehicle which was parked in the same driveway.  Again the company refused to compensate me for the damage to my car and seemed unconcerned by the danger I was in.  Eventually, my mental health got to a point where I was anxious constantly.  I transferred to a different place within the company, hoping that since it was a "Day Program" with a lot of clients and staff doing activities together I would have more support.  This was not the case.  Now, I was expected to take up to 5 clients in a van into the community, all of which had the tendency to run away and become violent in the van or at the outing location.  At the main office, one of the clients beat a staff member with a fire extinguisher and she suffered permanent damage because there wasn't enough staff to keep her safe or stop the attack once it started.&#x200B;At this time, I started to realize I was going to get badly hurt or have someone hurt under my care, both of which would effectively end my career. Addressing my safety concerns  with management only led me to retaliation from my supervisors and being slightly ridiculed.  This entire time, I had a psychiatrist who was truly amazing and even better, his son worked at the same company as me and was experiencing similar issues.  I couldn't believe it, as we live in a capital city and the odds of that are just insane. My psych offered to put me on temporary disability due to my deteriorating mental state but I refused because I believe disability should be a last resort and I wasn't at that point.  During this year and  a half is when I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder and I had some extremely dark times, for sure exacerbated by my work environment.  I had to be on a variety of medications to make it through the days and  I accepted this may be the case for the remainder of my life. One day, a coworker of mine was severely beaten with a rake and had to be taken to the hospital by ambulance.  That day I sent in a brief email to my manager stating I was resigning, effective immediately, and would be happy to provide  a doctor's note if they had any questions.  They didn't.&#x200B;After that, I did a few interviews while my boyfriend supported us (not ideal, but we made it).  Within two weeks, I was hired for two jobs in one day.   One was as a waitress for a restaurant and the other was as a health support worker for a health care company.  I waitressed until my job at the health care company began and then began doing that full-time.  That career had it's issues but it supported me for the next 8 months until I found my current job. I now work in an office and the change in my mental state is absolutely incredible.  The lack of stress, financial stability and routine schedule has changed my life.  I've been off all my psychiatric medications for a few months and I've never felt so clear headed.  I  felt so hopeless before.  I look forward to most days at work now.&#x200B;Sorry for the novel, if anyone can relate to switching fields and positive effects on their well-being I'd love to hear.&#x200B;EDIT: spelling/sentence structure
THE_GR8ST [info] Look, I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder around 4 years ago. I was hospitalized for around a month and was unstable/manic longer than that.If I can graduate high school, start/finish an associates degree, complete an internship, find a FT position in IT, work there for 2 years, and get accepted to a university then the answer to your question is yes. People with mental health diagnoses/illnesses can be successful in the field. Depression is not the same thing as bipolar disorder, but I'm confident that there are sucessful people that have the same challenges as you who are successful not only in IT, but in any field. Mental health problems are not uncommon, if you work in a large company, for every 100 people there may be 1-2+ people with mental health challenges.My advice for dealing with mental health issues is to seek treatment from healthcare professionals. Get appropriate care/treatments for what you're dealing with. If/once your done that, then look for jobs.So, as far as finding a job, do what anyone else would do when trying to find a job.-revise your resume-practice interview questions-complete education/experience&skills/certs-apply for as many jobs as you can
gentlesting [info] This resonates with me deeply !!!! I was a huge cunt in HS, miserable and all over the place. I thought I could “beat the system” by not giving a fuck and doing the bare minimum. Managed to get into a great university and grew the fuck up after I was diagnosed with bipolar. Realized being a sarcastic cunt and pushing everyone away because I thought they were stupid doesn’t actually do me any good. Go us!!!
omgitstyler [info] In the last week I was just diagnosed with bipolar. Thank you for this. I honestly think it's a great perspective to have and will help me out a ton! 
ana30671 [info] My initial diagnosis was done after seeing my gp and asking to see their in house pdoc. I had no longstanding history of counselling. The psychiatrist went over basic diagnostic type questions as an evaluation, with our interview probably taking no more than 30 minutes. I was diagnosed with bipolar. When I went to my second psychiatrist questioning the diagnosis 6 months later, again our meeting was short, us going over symptoms, and was diagnosed again with bipolar. Current pdoc was even quicker, when he asked about my symptoms and I described how things have been for me and within a few sentences he said basically "oh yeah that's definitely bipolar".Psychiatric illnesses don't have specific tests, so it's not like you can expect it to take hours or days to be diagnosed. There are specific diagnostic criteria that the doctor looks for to make the decision. 20 minutes seems reasonable to me, that gives the two plenty of time to discuss previous and current symptoms and life experiences. If either of you are that dismissive of the idea just speak with your general practitioner about how you can get a second opinion.
Sapphicatalyst [info] I usually say to people, "I am diagnosed with bipolar disorder." I hope that by referring to it as a diagnosis it gets across the idea that this is a legitimate medical condition rather than a fad label or personality type. That being said, it does have a significant impact on personality so I understand why people would identify themselves or others as bipolar.
frenchiestfry96 [info] Yes! I've been diagnosed with bipolar disorder a year ago (something that somewhat stems from the abuse I believe), so I'll be in and out of therapy for years to come.Ever since I was a kid, loud sudden noises really upset me, and I also get anxious when I hear my Nfather's name. I still struggle with sharing my abuse in therapy because I feel as though I'm lying to everyone around me. Though, I'm going to bring this up and be assertive about the flashbacks and anxiety in my next therapy session. I never thought trauma would be so ingrained in my life as it is and affect the way small things like names, food products, or other small mundane objects.
dwide_schrude_28 [info] Dude me too.. when I was diagnosed with bipolar I kept hearing the line “schizophrenic or bipolar lite? I’ve never heard voices, but maybe it’s time to start (You’re super cool Rebecca!)”It was a fun time in my brain.
uglydunce [info] Personally, I think overtime everything just gets so much worse. I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 when I was 15 and I thought my diagnoses was a bucket of fuck because I couldn’t pull out a single symptom of mania/ hypomania in myself.. (They were there, and other people saw them.. Just not me).. But as I aged the symptoms became stronger to the point even I could notice them.. Just be sure to tell your psychiatrist about any new developments or any new way you’ve been acting...So they can adjust your medication and everything.. I’m only 17 so my advice isn’t the best... But I hope things get better!
FemaleScientist17 [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar in grad school and had a hard time focusing and workng in my lab. For me the best thing was adjusting my meds, so that meant communicating a lot with my doctor. Everyone is dofferent and what medication works for one person may not work for another. Don’t settle for feeling sort of crappy or really crappy. I also go to therapy and that helps to organize thoughts and teaches me valuable bipolar management skills. Good luck!
fitsofthefather [info] 1st, just as an aside, I never felt out of control when I was hypomanic. At the time it just felt like enlightenment of some kind. Just a thought. I've done mushrooms 3x; twice a full dose before I was diagnosed with bipolar II, once a "microdose" after I was diagnosed.It was always a neat and beautiful experience for me. It could be weird, a little anxiety-inducing (especially as you come up), hilarious, then even weirder, but ultimately beautiful and fascinating. The only time it ever got uncomfortable for me was when I smoked weed to extend the trip. That just made me paranoid and confused.Don't overthink it. Go somewhere private and beautiful with good friends. Relax and enjoy.Also be aware of contraindications w/ your meds if you can find that info. Some will also dull the effects.
sarikaya_comes_in [info] I have been on vyvanse for a few years (before my bipolar 2 diagnosis). It was for ADHD but I also have BED LOL. I take 70 mg every day. I was diagnosed with bipolar a month ago and that’s when I started taking lithium. Honestly I really like that I take vyvanse because the lithium definitely makes me a drag a little bit. I feel like they kind of balance eachother out for the majority of the day I guess. I don’t take it every single day, some weekends I’ll take off to reset my system if i feel like my tolerance has gone up. I also like that I can skip a few days without any major repercussions. I know a lot of medication needs to be taken every single day to work and what not. Just my experience! Good luck
ahtchpipes [info] Well I asked for help. help from friends, help from family, help from many doctors, and many psychiatrists. One time I heard a doctor with her nurse laughing about me and saying poor little anxiety girl is back. 32 stitches later I'm still alive with a much more bitter outlook than I ever have before. In some ways I'm happy I did it because I realized after that nothing else can hurt me. But I'm also extremely resentful  with how the healthcare system failed me after reaching out so many times. I was diagnosed with bipolar at the age of 27 I have been asking for help since I've been 16 and always had a problem with self-harm and legitimate suicide attempts. it's a lot harder than people think especially when you don't have access to a gun.Something really needs to be done. Especially with all those " ask for help campaigns " when nobody is there to actually listen
13n0 [info] I absolutely hate this about being mentally ill. Being ignored because I am “crazy”. I have been to hospital several times for other condition I have, diagnosed before I was diagnosed with bipolar and when I get admitted in hospital they Just put me out. Sedate me with a bunch of injections because I am mentally ill. It’s just like you loose all yourCredibility. 
Odramabama [info] One time I was drunk as a skunk and was walking down this street where there’s a bunch of bars and outdoor seating. There’s this dude eating a hamburger by himself and I just sit down in front of him and tell him AAALLLLLLLL my trials and tribulations. “And theeennnn I started smoking meth when my gf left me which just REALLY set off my mania if ya know what I mean. Whoooo then I went to rehaaaaaab and now I’m out and I’m so happy and not happy and can I have the rest of your fries?” I’m pretty sure I started off with the phrase “Well, it all started when I was diagnosed with bipolar at 15.”why am I like this 
HotNoseMcFlatlines [info] I really wish I could experience LSD again, as you said it really is beautiful. Unfortunately I have been diagnosed with bipolar disorder and it would be a dangerous gamble to try it again; plus the bipolar drugs I'm on are known to completely prevent or greatly diminish the effects of LSD.
T_86 [info] 33f here who has struggled with eating disorders my entire life. I’ve either gone months to years binge eating and gaining weight or extreme restriction of calories and high workouts to become underweight (most my life it’s been that one). On top of binge eating and anorexia, I was diagnosed with bipolar at age 12. Although anorexia is a huge struggle occupying my anxiety, it’s a struggle I can hide. Bipolar, however, does not have that luxury. I’m also a bit of a perfectionist and control freak so I’ve worked extremely hard at learning to best handle my bipolar disorder. Long story short, when people come into my personal life that I feel are going to stay, there know I need to tell them about my bipolar disorder. That’s become easier for me. My bf who I’ve lived with for 3 years is very supportive and one basic rule we use to keep our relationship work despite my mental illness is to never lie about anything, big or small. We try to work as a team and help shoulder each other’s burdens so being completely open and honest is crucial to that. I’ve been struggling hard with anorexia the past 13 months. I didn’t lie to my bf but I just didn’t tell him for quite awhile. If he asked questions like if I ate that day, I told him the truth but I didn’t fully open up about the actual struggle I’m going through till a couple of months ago. I think it’s really important to fully explain the struggle for others to understand. We can’t expect them to understand at all what it’s like when they haven’t been through it or seen it other than how the media poorly/wrongly displays it. You need to sit down and tell him the exact thoughts you have, as terrible as they might be. Let him see you cry or shake over it, fully make him aware so he can better understand that this is not something to take lightly, that an anxiety pill won’t make it go away or that simply thinking happy thoughts will help. Maybe even read books that you can relate to and lend them to him so he can see that it’s a real disorder, or watch YouTube videos on it with him. He can’t know it’s not just a “sad feeling” and that it’s an actual illness as real as cancer or diabetes unless you educate him. So sorry for that long post. I hope you read it and got something from it. Educating ppl in my life is the ONLY way I’ve ever got them to understand my mental illnesses are as real as any other illness. Nothing else has ever worked for me.Here's a great video explanation on how ED works in the brain. Maybe that might make it seem more real to him. https://youtu.be/UEysOExcwrE
bllaaushpibu [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 about 8 months ago. I don’t feel like the diagnosis is right. I’m filled with so much anger and hate towards myself and everyone around me, for no apparent reason. I’m struggling, falling apart, without anything to really hold onto
SplatterBox214 [info] All throughout my childhood, I watched my dad suffer with anxiety and depression. I was around it all the time. Saw him go in and out of rehab, too. It took my nearly 22 years (about 8 years of active symptoms by that point) to finally piece together that I was suffering from something extremely similar. I was working 2 jobs, quit one and got fired from the other because I just couldn't keep up with the work - largely to blame was this \*intense\* feeling of darkness and just plain not having the energy to complete tasks. I had an epiphinal moment while laying on my parents couch (had to move back home) that I had depression. I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 disorder when I was 26 (I'm 27 now) and all I can say is it's been a long journey of questions and answers. And I know it's still unfolding, which gives me this bittersweet feeling of both relief and fear, one in the same emotion.
youhadtime [info] When I was in 8th grade I had a school counselor mention to my parents that I may have bipolar disorder. My parents shamed me for reaching out to somebody about my problems and refused to get me help. A decade later, after my mental health continued to worsen every year, I finally pushed through that deep-rooted shame my parents instilled in me and saw a psychiatrist on my own. I was diagnosed with bipolar, which was no surprise to me (I had started to have full blown manic episodes with psychosis and deep depressions with suicidal thoughts and ideation).If I were to have gotten help a decade ago I don’t think things would’ve gotten as bad as they have. Or at least I would’ve had the coping skills to handle my disorder.
Skinninbones [info] To hop on the train here: before I was diagnosed with bipolar I was diagnosed with depression and given Lexapro (which made me vomit) and then Prozac (which made me manic). Eventually got so manic that I was having a panic attack every day. Kept getting sent to the ER where tons of IV Xanax wouldn't even calm me. First drug that worked was Haldol. Later I was put on extended release Depakote. Anti psychotics have helped me far more than SSRI's have. If anyone is having repeated issues with their SSRI meds and you haven't tried anything branded as anti-seizure or anti-psychotic, I strongly urge you to discuss doing so with ur psych. The change was immediately huge for me. Not perfect mentally but in a much better space to work through my shit.Edit: Worth noting at the end here that I am mostly manic with short periods of depression. Someone who deals with depressive symptoms longer than a couple hours-2 days max like me might not do as well on antipsychotics.
peacefulcate815 [info] I took Zoloft for depression, before I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder, and it didn’t really help me at all. In fact, it made me feel like an emotional zombie all the time and I stopped taking it. 😔Meds work differently for everyone though, and I am not a doctor, so I don’t claim to have all of the answers, that was just my experience with it.
coconutfi [info] That’s exactly what happened to me.  I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder at 20, but in hindsight I definitely had symptoms even at age 15-16.  Not frequent, but significant enough for me to recognize it as the disorder.
lavender2q72 [info] Well I was on Prozac for depression when in inpatient but then became hypomanic lol my psychiatrist saw me too hyper playing ballHockey during PE. so then I was diagnosed with bipolar
dysohcysp [info] I feel this exact way and I was just diagnosed with bipolar ii. But at the same time, me “trying to better myself” has included things like: me deciding in a day that I was going to move from New York City to South Carolina try to go back to the university that I failed out of 4 years ago. I see things clearly when I get hypomanic, a little too clearly, and then get over ambitious, think I can do everything to fix it perfectly and quickly, my emotions are all heightened so literally shit like scrolling through Pinterest and reading all the quotes makes me cry, and then a few days later I crash into a super deep depression where I won’t wanna get out of bed for days to weeks to months. I’m not entirely sure what my “normal” feels like but I’m hopeful to find it.
Daniel3434 [info] Before I was diagnosed with bipolar 1, I was put on just zoloft. Felt good for awhile but things got extremely crazy ending with full blown mania and Phychosis and me believing I was Jesus.
CoffeeCrazedMom [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar 2. I heard voices. I saw hallucinations. I had mood swings. It’s called psychosis. It’s rare for bipolar 2 to have psychosis. I’d rather not diagnose, but maybe my own diagnosis can help.
RecoveringAsthmatic [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder over 5 years. Just started medication and therapy for it this past spring. Spent two weeks in the psych ward for the same type of feeling I've been having now
jeniuseyourtelescope [info] :)* I've been diagnosed with bipolar disorder and have mood stabilizing drugs to deal with the mania and manic behaviors. I just got home from a 5 day stay.* I got my tax refund and it turned out to be a hefty sum that allowed me to pay off my Visa bill completely with around $500 to spare.* The boy I'm sort of into is texting me back after I dropped off the face of the earth while I was in the hospital.:(* I have bipolar disorder and have to be on mood stabilizing drugs and just spent 5 days in the hospital.
mcfuuuu [info] I have the same issue and it's been with me my whole life. Since I've been diagnosed with bipolar type 2, I have written it off as a bipolar symptom. However, my psychiatric nurse practitioner is thinking I might have ADHD and has scheduled me for a neuropsychological testing to get a more accurate diagnosis. Due to insurance complications, I've had a hard time finding a therapist since my previous one stopped accepting my insurance. Do you happen to know anything about this testing? It was a hectic day (doc was behind time wise) at my last appointment so we didn't get to discuss it other than I needed to schedule an appt. TIA
ouidhead [info] Wow that’s so crazy. I was put on Zoloft (400mg) for severe depression as well in college, but it made me so crazy. I never slept or ate. I ended up having auditory and visual hallucinations while spiraling into delusion. Like, one time I thought my coworkers (I worked as a teacher aide) were planing to kill me and I could *hear* their plans and whispered threats but their mouths would be *closed* or *no one* would be talking. Or the time I could see peoples’ auras and I was convinced I was the chosen one to heal people because I thought the colors told me things. At the time, I didn’t think I was losing my mind because i thought had felt better since I was so productive and in a extremely better mood. A week later after withdrawing from school, I was diagnosed with bipolar type 1 and put on 650mg of seroquel. Apparently, what I was experiencing was a bad manic episode. The seroquel helped for a while but made me feel so catatonic all the time. I slept for about 15-20 hours a day the first few weeks. Also, it made me gain 35 pounds because apparently it also has a side effect of making u feel like a black hole that just endlessly swallows food. It’s like the munchies without the high. We have definitely had similar experiences. I’m not saying you’re bipolar but it would be worth talking to psychiatrist about persistent symptoms. Also you’re definitely suppose to report any worsening symptoms as some meds could make you have severe suicidal ideation. Sending you love and light.
manicslut [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 a year ago and ADHD a couple months ago. I was prescribed adderall that I take a couple times a week for school and while it works wonders for my ability to focus and get things done, I think it also triggers hypomanic states.  I think overall the stimulants are bad for my mental health but I’m starting grad school in the fall and feel like I need adderall to get through the program even if it’s sabotaging my mental health. So I’m kind of stuck. I also started abilify a year ago which had me very stable until about a month ago.. not sure if my current hypomania is caused by the adderall or the time of year (I usually get hypomanic in the Springg). But, one of the worst parts about the dual diagnosis is that the impulsivity associated with ADHD combined with bipolar’s hypomania work together to create the perfect storm to make terrible choices. 
StephenNL [info] Please consider getting some help. There are so many resources to help out when you're feeling suicidal. I've been down that road before and the last time I almost didn't make it. And now I'm so grateful someone stepped in to help me out. One day one little thing will change and steer you down a new direction where there will be so many more possibilities for you to move beyond the homophobia you are surrounded with. So take a breath and realize that what you're experiencing now isn't what you'll always experience. You need to make sure you take care of yourself first and foremost. It's hard not to measure ourselves against others but no one can live your life but you. Your journey is unique to you and how it will shape you. There's no need to rush to feel like you're living independently as you perceive others you age are. Take the time to recognize that measuring your success to your own internal goals that will make you happy is all you need to worry about. You are the only person in the drivers seat of your life. You need to steer yourself towards what you want up attain. There is no one-size-fits-all approach to happiness. And for what its worth I am diagnosed with bipolar disorder. I don't think you need to worry that you might be bipolar. I think its a lot of stress and anxiety coupled with depression that is getting you down. Anyone in that situation would dwell on the negative. May I suggest you see your doctor to see if he can prescribe a short term anti-anxiety medication and maybe even a mild antidepressant. It could help curb some of the strong emotions and thoughts you're having to give you a chance to help yourself up from where you are now. And you don't even have to say anything about your sexuality in asking your doctor for this. One thing I've learned over years of struggling through mental illness and adversity is that even when things feel like they are out of control we can still take the reigns and make small changes everyday that add up to positive bigger changes. Just breathe and take it one thing at a time. Trust me, you'll realize you're much stronger than you're giving yourself credit for. You got this! Good luck. And make sure you reach out to whatever resources you can make use of. This pain you feel is temporary. Don't let it take your life and future happiness away from you. 
cjmatto [info] I didn't realize I had ADHD until like 3 years after I was diagnosed with bipolar 2. I switched psychiatrist and she could tell right away I had it and prescribed me medication which really really helped me and also improved my mood on a day to day basis.
chazj [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar 2 at the beginning of the year. We've worked on a med regime that seems to be working. It's not a miracle cure though and I still have plenty of bad days. My depression and mood swings are under control, my anxiety is a bit better than before. But little moments of happiness are seeping through and those freak me the freak out. They leave me sitting here saying, "what is this feeling?" It's weird until it hits me, this is what happy feels like, holy shit.  
lori-item [info] I miss him so much. I was diagnosed with bipolar I last year in December which was 2 years after I left him. I do believe that my undiagnosed disease had impacted our relationship and for so long I wished I had never met him. My heart is broken. My brain is broken. But at least I found my answer in me, not him.
jaymak27 [info] I hope it works out for u I was diagnosed with bipolar depression after I got divorced and that hasn't helped me at all I blame myself for my actions even tho I didn't know I wish u guys the best 
doing_well_in_spite [info] This may be the opposite of your question, but I don't take supplements because I took many of them for 15 years before being diagnosed. This had two consequences: 1) the didn't do a darn thing 2) the holistic 'dr' I went to mis diagnosed me and it took 15 years till I was diagnosed with bipolar diaorder.
Mana_Strudel [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar at 14, but 10 years later I received the schizo affective bipolar diagnosis.
indubitably_not [info] I'm sorry people suck :( I've long been made fun of for my many emotions and moods. Last year I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder and it all made more sense. I went from rarely ever taking any meds, to now taking about four a day, about to go up to five, plus some others as needed. So far most of the people I've told have been really supportive, but some make jokes about my tiny pharmacy. Not to say their comments don't bother me at all, but if I'm going to get made fun of either way, I might as well do what works best for me, which means taking my medications and going to therapy. And I'm working on setting healthy boundaries with those who aren't supportive of me doing what I need to do to take care of myself. No one understands the pain you go through as well as you do, so they don't comprehend the repurcussions of you not taking your meds, nor do they have to live with it. I've found it helpful to find others who are going through similar things (e.g.: bipolar, depression, etc). They haven't lived in my body but they are generally more empathetic and supportive, which helps me be more confident in my choices. Just because some people were born with bodies that don't require medications to function and feel okay does not give them right to mock or speak down to those who were born with bodies that do. Find your safe people, do your best to ignore the haters, and be kind to your body and your mind. Good luck, friend. I hope you feel better soon :)
yeslekkkk [info] Sooooooo you sound similar to me.Your face is doing better because whatever you did before to it was too irritating. That means your moisture barrier was off. I've had bad acne (cleared up for the most part now), and I too noticed that my face did better when I didn't touch it (and I didnt' even take off my makeup). When I used a facial cleanser and benzyl peroxide, my face went nuts. I finally started a new routine in early February, and I have one pimple right now. My face has made drastic improvements. I was too rough on my skin before. The secret I learned was to wash it with a cleanser (a gentle! cleanser, not an acne wash) once a day and put on lotion after. Just do that in the beginning. that's enough. please put on sunscreen. You could even get a lotion WITH spf. I really regret not putting on sunscreen. Your mom might be at risk for developing cancerous moles at some point, even if she looks fine now. Both of my parents have recently gotten cancerous moles removed. I'm not taking any more chances.I think just doing these basic things could actually make you feel a bit better about your skin and not contribute any more to your depression. Are you seeing a talk therapist? It sounds like talking with someone about your recent diagnoses could be really helpful. I am diagnosed with bipolar disorder and have gone through these sorts of depressive episodes, so I feel you. If you haven't gone to the bipolar page, you should head over there and talk with us there.  drinking/eating three times a day, sleeping with your mom, get on some meds and stay patient. It will get better. It takes time to deal with the diagnosis and go through all the stage. The good news is that now you have an explanation, and you can move forward. It's going to take a lot of work and time, but you can do it. Stay strong. Feel free to message me.
brittymaa [info] Thank you kind friend. I have also gotten MRIs and MRAs which were all normal. Along with trans cranial dopplers and of my neck which one (I think the trans cranial) showed that I have increased velocity in one vessel. Idk if I mentioned this elsewhere but I have been diagnosed with bipolar type 1 for years.
jenjen243 [info] Before I was diagnosed with bipolar II my psychiatrist did put me on medication for ADD and I felt SO much better!  I keep hoping he'll do it again but he won't:-(
ortizbum [info] Bipolar with more depression is type II, so that might be the one you have?  I was diagnosed with bipolar I, the one with more manic episodes, although I question that diagnosis all the time.  Because I have a very hard time sleeping I try to be very disciplined on keeping my sleeping time consistant and getting myself to bed at least three hours before I actually go to sleep.  Sleeping and nightmares are the symptoms I have most trouble with.  I dont really get depressed that often, unless I do something very stupid while manic and then I start regretting it at night.  So, I try to be by myself a lot during the day to avoid embarrassing myself with other people so that I can sleep at night.  Mania is like being on a tightrope - you have to be very balanced because the minute you start entertaining bizarre thoughts or ideas, you can get psychotic, and if you dont sleep enough, you can get psychotic as well.  For me, the struggle really is on being disciplined so that I can avoid psychosis and have more stability in my life.  
lilveggiedelight [info] I am diagnosed with bipolar II however I don’t have manic episodes very frequently so I guess my doctor thinks it’s okay. He said that rexulti works off of lexapro so if im not on lexapro I don’t need to be on rexulti. Maybe I should get a second opinion 🤭
amalthead [info] Yeah, this shit is why I was just diagnosed with bipolar 1 and not just cyclothymia. Used to get off public transit a few stops early because I'd be paranoid the bus was about to crash, stay up all night terrified my sister was going to break into my bedroom to kill me, always paranoid I was about to get fired at work...I'm on seroquel and I go to talk therapy, both help quite a bit. Meditation always felt like putting a bandaid on a gaping wound. Before I got treatment I would journal a lot and read back my thoughts for perspective which sort of helped? Like I could see how crazy they objectively looked, which helped me calm down even if in my heart I felt they were legitimate thoughts. Quick edit: Seroquel was way more helpful than talk therapy since it turned off intrusive thoughts, but both are good. 
monorogue [info] After I was diagnosed, of course I told my husband.It was the first time that actually everything made sense for him, and us. He learned that some of my behavior was due to me being manic or depressed.I told my parents bluntly that I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder, they previously knew I see a psychiatrist and therapist for my depression. My dad is kind of meh as he doesn’t really believe in this kind of stuff, my mom tries to understand but she fails miserably. It’s fine, not everyone is supposed to understand.I have two other friends whom I told, they were very understanding and helpful. And the rest? Well...The thing is people will react differently. What matters is that you understand your illness and handle it the best way you can. The outside world can be understanding, fearful or ignorant.Just make sure you stick to the ones that are understanding. You can just bring it up when you feel like it.For your parents, make sure they don’t do something else (like watching sports or whatever). Tell them you have something important to tell them and just go ahead. You can explain what it means, how do you feel, etc.For friends, the same. Be open about it.You don’t have to tell everyone if you don’t feel like it. Take your time. You can just tell to the ones very close to you.  You might even be surprised with people reacting nicely and being understanding and supportive.Good luck! And you can always come back here for support. This community is very nice. 
WineWeinVino [info] I think that's entirely possible. I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder a couple of years ago, but my mental health even from childhood was not good. I've since been diagnosed with chronic fatigue syndrome and fibromyalgia and the specialist I saw said that people with conditions such as bipolar, often develop other conditions such as these. As for getting worse when you feel safe... Maybe? I've only recently been diagnosed, but my childhood trauma was around 30 years ago.
drews_news [info] I’m 28 and I spent my early 20’s being quite successful and happy. I was able to put my sister through college even though I wasn’t fortunate enough to go. When I was 26 I had a nervous breakdown and lost touch with reality. I spent months in the hospital. I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder with psychosis. Also OCD and severe anxiety (which I was already being treated for). Anyway, when I left the hospital I found myself jumping from job to job, unable to find the stability I once had. I’ve burned through my savings and my mental state is deteriorating every day. Ironically enough, I was forced to move in with my sister and her boyfriend. They’re both normal and don’t really understand my illness. I’m trying hard to find a job and move out, as I feel pressured to do so, but I’m having a hard time. I’m not familiar with this area and my depression and mixed episodes are killing me. I’ve pushed away most of my friends and I have very little family. I can’t remember the last time I was happy and I don’t see anything good in my future. I think about suicide constantly.
hinsijutsowshaanu [info] This is personal for me.  I've been diagnosed with bipolar II and they want me to start on a mood stabilizer or antipsychotic.  I have no history of psychosis, reckless behavior, dangerous behavior, impulsive behavior, or (active) suicidality.  I do not meet any of the other commonly reported risk factors for manic switch either (e.g. younger age, rapid cycling, mixed features).  I am skeptical about the claims that starting me on only an SSRI will be dangerous for me.  I am tempted to conduct my own (N = 1) experiment with an SSRI first...although I am reluctant to do it without the consulting with a doctor first.  I was given a prescription of fluoxetine and olanzapine and could have just taken the fluoxetine but decided I'd better talk to the psychiatrist first.  I don't know if I will be able to convince them to let me try just an SSRI first though; I think the 'SSRI monotherapy for (all forms of) bipolar depression is dangerous or useless' idea is deeply entrenched.  I'm just a patient so I can't really tell how evidence-based it is, or how justified people like Michael Gitlin's skepticism is.
inkedandnerdy [info] Okay. So I'm going to tell a little bit of my story here to answer this. I was first diagnosed four years ago. I have been diagnosed with bipolar, BPD, GAD, and PTSD. All after severe trauma. I went to see a therapist for the first time when I decided I wanted to end an abusive relationship I was in and did not know how to and I needed strength and I knew it had messed me up. My first therapist told me one of the times I got raped didn't count because I was drunk. I walked out and then went back two weeks later. I fought. I found a therapist that worked for me. I got on an anti-depressant. My brain only wants to kill itself when I am lost in my trauma or I decide I'm worthless (also rooted in trauma.) Yes, I think my healthy brain never wants to kill itself. If suicide was natural and healthy-thinking, I don't see how the human race could be where it is today. Every mammal is built for survival. We fight to survive. That's life. And it's hard and it sucks. But I truly believe whatever you have going on, it gets better if you're willing to give it a chance and fight for yourself.
GardenerOfBees [info] Oh shit. I was diagnosed with bipolar in February at age 30 for my first manic episode.
trashy_cakes [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar 1 before adhd even though I've had the latter for longer. Once my bipolar was under control, I told my psych that I've been having trouble concentrating and staying on task, getting distracted easily etc so she prescribed me Adderall. Basically I double checked the symptoms of adhd before my appointment, mentally checking off which ones I have and went in with the intention to get Adderall. Don't ask for it specifically though, at least not until they tell you what they're giving you then maybe you can request it
EmptySighs66x [info] Oof. This resonates with me. I was diagnosed with bipolar when I was 16, but I was showing symptoms as early as 13.
sweet-melancholy [info] I don’t sleep around, I’ve always been in relationships. I have a few situations where it is obvious I was hypersexual, but generally I have a very low libido. It’s a part of why I didn’t think I was bipolar lol. My therapist suggested I test my hormone levels though. Edit- I am diagnosed with bipolar 1!
gnewfry [info] i am diagnosed with bipolar disorder.  i asked my psychiatrist if it was possibly bpd instead because my cycles are too short too.  she just said i was on the bipolar spectrum and i didn't need another label.  so i would say the same for you.  work within the label you have.  although for me the meds would've been the same.  for you i don't think so.  so i guess i would get another opinion.  sorry to type while working it out in my head.&#x200B;so diagnosed bipolar, but i have NEVER had euphoria.
Alidance816 [info] Yes!! Had social anxiety as a young kid and then in 2012 I was diagnosed with depression, Effextor made me go insane and was eventually put on Zoloft after being hospitalized. Zoloft just made me depressed but numb rather than suicidal. I was diagnosed with bipolar in 2017 after being hospitalized again. I’ve heard it’s very common for a bipolar 2 diagnosis to be initially depression. 
BipolarBabe7 [info] I'm on the other side of the story but I figured I might share a little of my experience.  I was the critically/chronically ill child in this situation, having moderate-severe depression and anxiety throughout most of my middle sister's childhood and almost all of my baby sister's.  Lord knows how tough they both are, but the littlest definitely started to either mimic or take on my symptoms/illnesses.  Now I'm diagnosed with bipolar (II) and BPD and my relationships with them are still in havoc.  Let me just say that I'm glad you made it out (generally) all right and that I hope your relationship with your brother is okay, and that his health is good now.
LostInOtherWorlds [info] Omg you are not fat. Look, my husband married me 7 years ago and I am 5' 8" and weighed 185 at the time. I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder and had to come on and off meds for the next five years, most of which caused weight gain no matter how hard i fought it. Today I am way heavier than that, but my husband thinks I'm gorgeous and loves me just the same. If a man is that shallow (and my dad is too. So I get it) leave his ass. You deserve better. You deserve someone to love you for you and if you want to lose weight, then lose it for healthy reasons. But don't get down about it. And don't project onto your boyfriend what your dad said. Because they are not the same person.
StereoClock [info] Thanks for the reply, Scurius.Yeah. I have already lost a lot of weight. My parents have been divorced since I was like 7. My mom had custody of me and my sister. I was diagnosed with bipolar like when I was 15. My dad offered me to go live with him for a while. He helped me A LOT. Like, materially and motivating me. He always thought I shouldn't think less of myself because of my disorder, that I could have a 99% normal life, as long as I did the right things. I was quite depressed at the time. I was weighting 105,700kg. The most heavy I have recorded. I went on to 92kg or so. I exercized every single day, ate salads before lunch and soup before diner. I was still in high school, and when I was living with my mom I skipped classes. When I was living with my dad, he drove me every day to the door of the school and waited until I got in. He woke me up in the mornings so I didn't miss my morning brisk walk. I lost weight. My grades went up (I normally am a good student, people call me smart, but I'm just good at paying attention when I want to). I got more in touch with my friends. I stayed with him about during a year. In my class photos in the year before and after the difference is astounding. I look much more healthy, energetic, and hopeful, close to my friends and stuff.I know life is hard, but in the end the work we put into it pays off a lot more than it seems like.Right now I'm having trouble getting enough sleep. I wake up 6h after going to bed, without an alarm clock. I've been "here" before, and I know I can find my way back into the good side of life.Thanks about the comment on football. It's my passion right now. Most fun I have all week. This saturday is the last practice until the first game of the season. I'm really hyped.Cheers.
kellysam401 [info] There were times where I used anger to get out of my painful ongoing depression. Later in life after going through my first manic.. I was diagnosed with bipolar. BPD diagnosed years before.
MrReeRee [info] I started smoking at 14 and was heavily into it by 16. I quit for each of my pregnancies but always slipped back as a way to 'relax'. I was diagnosed with bipolar and anxiety in my 20s and was displaying schizophrenic symptoms by 30. My smoking quieted my mind for a bit, but I got so much worse.I quit cold turkey after a psychotic episode and basically just finished my baggie one day and that was that. I didn't sleep well for about 6 weeks, I was also in a manic episode so that played a big part in my insomnia.By 2 months I was sleeping a bit better and I got married in June, after the wedding I slipped into a deep depression and craved it like a mother fucker. I knew it wasn't going to help so I basically just slept all I could to fight both feelings.By 3 months my lungs had evacuated all the funky bong gunk. But I was eating and eating so much I put on 20kgs. This had A LOT to do with my antipsychotics, my anxiety meds and antidepressants. By 5 months I was pretty much out the the pot woods and feeling more energetic and productive.  I cleaned my house for the first time in forever, and was more present with the kids. Helping with homework is so different when you're not smashed lol.By 7 months I found a job, and started working after 2 years of unemployment/maternity leave. And for the first time in 17 years went to work straight. And now I'm here. One of my darling crotch fruit smeared soap all over the shower floor and I slipped over, hurting my back. I always used pot as a pain relief and even today I'm fighting the urge to go score and puff the pain away. But I'm staying strong and trying my best to ignore it. Ibuprofen is working but only just. I'm going to go to a physio soon  so I don't fold and slip into my old habits.
Wildhart8 [info] I've been diagnosed with bipolar nos. I only get mild hypomania. I'm depressed almost all of the time. Antidepressants make me feel worse but ever since I've been put on a mood stabiliser and anti-psychotic my moods have evened out and it's taken the edge off. I wasn't sure if I was in any way bipolar but now that I'm getting the right treatment I can see that I am. Took me 15 years to get diagnosed. The books and website by James Phelps are good. My depression is atypical too. 
throw20180101 [info] I tried to kill myself and was brought to a psychiatrist. She's very professional and nice. I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder type 2, General Anxiety, PTSD and mild OCD. I've been put on medication and psychotherapy. Turns out some of my friends are also on medication for MDD and social anxiety. Everyone's been very understanding except for older folks like my lola. They dont believe in mental health issues and medication. 
AndItsAders [info] In my own experience and anecdotal conversations and research into both disorders has lead me to some soft opinions on their similarities and differences.Yes, you can absolutely have a borderline personality disorder and bipolar, which is a mood disorder. Personality is a mix of innate temperament, humor, curiosity as well as coping skills, relationship templates and societal conditioning. So when things get derailed in formative years people develop survival skills that can become toxic and maladaptive when they become ingrained.Bipolar is more in the category of an organic neurotransmitter and affects sleep, energy, creativity, goal setting, executive functions and has aspects like delusions and psychosis. It can’t be fixed through learning new coping skills, learning how to self soothe and self care - bipolar doesn’t give a shit! When you think you’re the sister of Jesus you’re not going to bother with unfamiliar challenging things that threaten your reality.I think that bipolar disorder when it kindles and becomes active looks a lot like bpd, especially as teens and young adults because the brain is still immature and not done developing. I was never diagnosed with BPD, but it was often considered a diagnosis when I was young and self destructive and self medicating with drugs and alcohol. I was diagnosed with bipolar when I was 24. And have had many challenges and episodes in the 12 years since then. My therapist and I really explored my fear that my personify was toxic. In between episodes my personality is fundamentally healthy. With medication for the bipolar I was able to develop a healthy personality. So, personality disorders and bipolar looks really similar during adolescence, which is why they aren’t diagnosed in adolescents. BPD and many personality disorders respond to dbt therapy, and can lose the diagnosis of BPD. That is really really good news. Having bipolar and coping with it poorly can lead to developing unhealthy personality aspects and can lead to meeting a full diagnosis. Bipolar is extremely treatable but is chronic, requires medication and treatment and is life long.One takes learning and the other takes managing. We have ways to cope with both!
wolfgame [info] Rather than recommending that he see a doctor, encouraging him to follow through on his own concerns, perhaps helping him to get started on that path would be the way to go.  I think that largely due to the stigma associated with mental illness, people avoid addressing their mental health, but everyone - mentally ill or otherwise - can benefit from even the most basic of treatment.And if that leads to a diagnosis, then he can get started on treatment.I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder at 34.  Not knowing for my entire life up to that point that I have this condition almost definitely cost me much of my career and relationships.
plausible_mermaid [info] Speaking of cake tutorials...18 years ago my brother got married. I was so excited I offered to make the wedding cake. I’d never made a wedding cake in my life. Good thing mania comes with unbridled expertise!🤩🤩It turned out pretty good. 2 layers with lots of large and small icing roses. I was diagnosed with bipolar many awesome cakes and 17 years later. 
Karoal [info] If you feel depressed, please go see a doctor if you can.It's good that you know the basic facts about mental illnesses. However the more you delve into it, the more you can get positive bias and reason on false assumptions.Feeling dreamlike is not a delusion, so don't worry about that. As long as it doesn't cause you distress, lots of people space out. If it's distressing, you might want to bring that up with your doctor then.Personally I have been diagnosed with bipolar. Anecdotally people's mental illness can be "coloured" by their personality.In my experience mental illness affects you a tiny bit like being under the influence of a drug. You're acting and thinking differently, but you're still you in some way. That's where the analogy ends but I hope you understand me that your personality and your mental illness blend together somewhat.I know it's easy to freak out, I have done it and am still doing it. But remember that you want to take care of yourself, not identify what exactly is "not right" with you.Edit: if it matters at all, I scored ENFP :)
IntrepidMachine [info] You didn’t waste those years. Shit happens and you’ll grow. When I was diagnosed with bipolar type 2 during high school, I didn’t get my shit together for a few years and I hated myself for it. Still now I keep having to remind myself that I’m not a lesser human being I have a mental illness. It’s hard, but from one gay guy with a mental illness to another, I totally believe in you and you can live a great life if you fight for itEdit: do you see a psychiatrist? Medicine? Therapy? Super important to dedicate yourself 100%
notthelasttimelord [info] Most people get tossed into mania/ hypomania when given an antidepressant. That’s how I was diagnosed with bipolar 1
LordoftheCatsx [info] Oh I was diagnosed with severe depression before I was diagnosed with bipolar. I didn't think my manic episode were..well, mania episodes until I broke down and told my pdoc everything and she kind of looked at me like, "you didn't think to tell me these things?" Then when I took the DSM test they finally diagnosed me. When I was on SSRIs I thought the extreme amount of energy & lack of sleep was "just me feeling better". Haha nope. Lithium has been pretty good to me. It keeps my mania episodes to a mostly hypomania, but sometimes I do get a few full blown mania symptoms, which aren't fun. I might just ask her if we can up the dosage agin, since I'm on a fairly low one (450mg) so. We will see. Thank you! I am trying my best. *Hugs*
nenenji [info] THIS^ even if he is not a hoarder, but depressed instead,  a bunch of people cleaning out his trash may be difficult for him. My sisters room is an absolute mess, similar to a lot of the pictures on this forum. She never lets me go inside her room, but I have out of concern peaked inside a couple of times... and the smell and sight of it makes my heart drop. I am diagnosed with bipolar2 so I’m very familiar with spiralling down into depression nesting. My apartment have gone through many cycles of spotless to ‘holy shit this is disgusting’, so I know how it can feel to be in that situation. When my apartment is in a ‘nest state’ I feel so incredibly ashamed and I would freak out if anyone would see how vile my living situation was. I suspect that my sister feels the same. If I even mentions her room and anything about helping her clean it, she becomes angry and extremely defensive. I still don’t know how to help her... so at this moment I try to support her and hope that she will be ready to accept my help one day.You never know how these people feel about their living situations and it can be a cause of some deep rooted problem. My problem was my mental illness so even if I got it cleaned up, I would end up with a mess again and again and again. 
BufufterWallace [info] Although it’s not food, I’ve been down a similar road. In high school I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder and one of the major struggles was cutting. It lasted well into my college years and I ended up working harder and harder to hide fresh wounds. In the mix of things I became Catholic and started slowly piecing together what faith is amid mental illness. A year or two ago I’d run into something about the cilice and it instantly appealed to me. I was half way through the order form on an online store (another bipolar issue) when I realized that because of my history and disordered desires regarding physical pain, I’d never be able to separate the psychological pleasure of self-harm from the spiritual practice of mortification. I didn’t get it and highly doubt I ever will attempt something like that. I’m mentally incapable of some pious mortifications. For me and for many with mental illness, otherwise innocent or laudable penitential practices can be triggers for psychosis. My advice is that since there has been a history of eating disorders, find a mortification which is unrelated to food and never attempt any mortification regarding food apart from the required minimum fasts. I would even take those as optional due to illness for a few years until you’re certain and comfortable that you’re doing things with sincere intent. That’s the treatment I’ve given myself and it’s spared me from some of the danger of mental illness. 
kitty07s [info] >  fat after being on antipsychotics for a few years.That is one of the mysteries to me, because that is what happened to me as well. I was gaining and losing weight normally ranging between 125-150 since high school due to hormonal changes, appetite changes, eating and activity then I was diagnosed with bipolar. I was 145 lb and due to manic espisode and incredible energy I worked out like crazy and lost again to 123-125 lb, then I was diagnosed and I was put on antispychotics. I gained 10 lb immediately in one week just in the hospital. Then I gained exponentially to 160 lb in 2 months! I was definitely not eating an extra 2000 cal over my TDEE which is the amount needed to gain this much in 2 months. I stopped gaining immediately after I could come off the antipsychotics but without meds it was hard to lose the extra weight. I gave up and over 5 years after I gained an additional 20 lb since I stopped caring anymore and gave up on weight loss. I am now able to lose since I am not on meds anymore. I am almost losing the extra 20 lb I gained post medication (so I am totally accountable for that) and hopefully I could lose 30 lb of the medication induced fat as well. People do have varying metabolisms but unless they have certain medical conditions, the variations is not that high. But being teenagers the growth hormones and other hormones can make you be thinner or heavier than normal because they are all wacked up and your body still changing. People's natural weight based on their diet and activity usually settles after teenage years.  For me I think my natural activity level and diet  set me around 135-145 lb in adult life. Other than that men and women who have thinner body structure are more prone to move and are more naturally active and less hungry, add the height and gender and you get even more burn, so they move around a lot more and burn a lot of calories and they don't realize it, so even if they eat crap food, they are are still not eating over their TDEEs so they don't gain. Sudden life changes that decreases those activity levels, messes up their hormones or their eating will make them gain more weight. 
lotrfan12345 [info] Happy to help! I'm a self care fiend. I was diagnosed with bipolar 7 years ago and my life was hell until I figured out all these tricks. If I don't take super good care of myself I'll go off the deep end so I'm kind of an expert! Let me know if you need any more advice :)
pifordaysss [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder but my psychiatrist (who I am no longer seeing) didn't give me any information on it or even told me which type I have. How can I tell, and where can I find the best information on this?
latter_choice [info] To answer your first question: Yes, there is research that suggests that people with bipolar disorder experience eating disorders (and vice versa)  more frequently than the general population. Without reviewing the research, if I recall correctly, eating disorders with impulsive traits like binge/purging anorexia, bulimia, and binge eating occur more often in people with bipolar disorder. That's not to say someone couldn't have a restrictive eating disorder and bipolar disorder though, or that the rate of restrictive disorders isn't higher in bipolar disorder than the general public (it probably is higher). If you're interested in doing you're own research, I'd suggest doing a general google search with the terms "eating disorder" and "bipolar". You can also use pubmed ([https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/](https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/)), but many articles are behind paywells (if you attend university or college you can likely gain access through your school's library). You can also try scihub ([scihub.org/search](https://scihub.org/search)) which provides free access to scientific articles.To answer your second question: I have bipolar disorder (probably II maybe I ) and I've been treated for restrictive anorexia in the past. My timeline is similar to yours. I struggled with a restrictive ED NOS (around 13/14) before I was diagnosed with bipolar (at 18). The ED NOS resolved on it's own (I never sought treatment) but I often struggled with disorder thoughts about my weight afterwards. When I had my first elevated episode (16) the thoughts disappeared and reappeared after it finished. After a serious episode of depression (psychotic features) that resulted in my diagnosis, I read that a healthy diet can help manage bipolar. I had already lost weight while depressed and wanting to prove to myself that I wasnt bipolar and that I could control my mood, I took healthy eating to an extreme and also starting restricting. My home life and relationships fell apart (out of my control) shortly after, and I started restricting more heavily. Eventually I was referred to an outpatient group treatment for my ED where I was also medicated for my mood disorder (which was essentially in overcoming the ED). I can't stress this enough, but CBT is extremely helpful for challenging and overcoming ED thoughts and behaviours. Mindful (and mechanical) eating also helped to retrain my hunger signals. A few years ago (at 24) I had another really serious episode of depression (re: psychotic features) and I found especially at the beginning of the episode, that I really focused on my body and weight and how I was unhappy with that. As it got worse though, I had more dark thoughts that became the focus and the disordering thoughts took the back seat. I still struggle with ED thoughts. They always increase when my mood is low. Properly treating my bipolar (currently I only take lithium) helps reduce ED thoughts and behaviours, but it doesn't get rid of them completely. I'll be starting a group CBT program soon and I hope to refresh my thought challenging skills!TLDR; There is a higher frequency of eating disorders in people with bipolar disorder than the general population. I had a restrictive eating disorder, and still have disordered thoughts, and these thoughts increase during lows and decrease during highs and when my bipolar is well managed.
celolex [info] I don't like saying this on my main account (because, as you've admitted, there's a lot of stigma) but I was diagnosed with bipolar two weeks ago. The stigma is one of the most difficult things to grapple with. I'm afraid to tell friends because I'm worried they'll cut me out of their lives if they know.  It's important to remember that bipolar manifests in many different ways, and your experience with one person is not indicative of everyone with the condition. Additionally, while she obviously caused you significant emotional distress, this girl in no way "totally ruined" your life – certainly not to the degree that she's ruining her own.
dylandonaghue [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar II by more than one psychiatrist, starting about 8 years ago. I do not have bipolar II. I was later on diagnosed with borderline personality disorder instead. I have also been diagnosed with ADHD, hyperactive type. I am, to this day, on a mood stabilizer (epival) and seeking ways to live without it.
mlv4750 [info] I’m the same. Found out I had hypothyroidism and even now that my meds are right I still have 0 energy. I was just diagnosed with bipolar disorder like 2 weeks ago and I’m really hoping the meds for that will help cuz I’ve got 3 kids at home and I feel so guilty all the time for not doing fun stuff with them.
BAUIntern [info] Oh wow, I have never heard of this. Although I was diagnosed with bipolar caused by seizures 3 years ago. I wonder if this could play a part?
Maitasun [info] I’m tempted to say me, then my brother. We switched places as being not only the black sheep but the family’s shame at one time. But man, my cousin is way worse. TD;LR: She is a manipulative bitch and probably a psychopath. Nobody likes her and she is currently destroying her family.She apparently has some kind of mental illness. I really want to believe it, because I was diagnosed with bipolar type 2 and was told I was lying and it feels awful... but this bitch is smart enough to fake it; if anything, she should be diagnosed as a psychopath. She destroyed the family. Everything has to be about her and if not, she throws tantrums that you can’t imagine. She threats with killing herself (and attempt it), or pee on herself. I shit you not, and she is not a child. She forced her parents to change schools when her friends or teachers didn’t do as she said. She somehow manipulated his father to beg to her ex-bf to be with her again or she’ll suicide. (The parents of the poor boy threatened with sue them if she ever came around him again.) She dropped out high school and know is homeschooled and want to force their parents to pay for University. Knowing her, she’ll will only make them go more bankrupt. Aunt and Uncle where the only loving marriage I saw while growing up and they are on the verge of divorce. My other cousin had to put his studies on hold (he was almost finishing Uni) to take care of her because she wasn’t safe to be alone. She is a manipulative bitch, treats everyone with disrespect, attack’s her mom any time she can, destroying her nerves, put their parents against each other... she even made her way out of rehab one day after being forced in (her parents were destroyed and was such a difficult choice to make, but it was the right one) SHE CRIED HER WAY OUT. “Mommy I love you so much, I’ll change, I promise”.Of course she did not. No one in my family likes her, she is banned from all family reunions, not allowed to be in any of my other aunts/uncle houses,  not even her grandpa wants her at his home. Just the bare mention of her name puts everyone in a bad mod. I really can’t do anything but hope she is really ill and that some therapy + correct meds will make her less of a bitch but I highly doubt it. Apparently, something awful happened to her a few weeks ago and my mom asked me to call her and say I will be there to support her and that I love her (I do, family is family) but instead of doing that I just thought: “Mom, do you really believe what she said?” And I feel awful for not believing her, but the antecedents are to strong to just ignore.
handmaid25 [info] Reformed Karen checking in!!!  I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder. Taking my meds and sailing right along now. I never went completely batshit like this woman, but I was definitely not above asking for a manager. My poor kids would be so embarrassed. I could see the apologetic looks they gave to people when I did it. Now that I’m medicated I just let things roll off my back. Is it really that important to freak out over small perceived injustices?  No it’s not. I don’t demand refunds or managers anymore. I just go on about my fucking day without blowing up the whole world.
EID1992 [info] When I was on lexapro, that’s when I was diagnosed with bipolar with mixed episodes. The lexapro is what sent me into the mixed episodes.
praxios [info] Absolutely NTA!My parents did something similar to me when I was admitted to an inpatient program where I was diagnosed with bipolar. The stigma for mental illness is life changing, so you are well within your rights for people not to know. I would make sure you mention to your mom what she did was not ok and a huge invasion of your privacy. She had no right to share something so private with hundreds of strangers on the internet without your permission. I'm so sorry this happened to you, and I sincerely hope that your recovery is going well 💕
fruitblender [info] Hey there, I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder. Do you want to talk? I was diagnosed 7 or so years ago. Not a ton of time, but plenty of experiences. Feel free to reach out to me via PM. This is manageable, I promise. 
kilroy000 [info] I got diagnosed when I was 5 and instantly out on stimulants by a psychiatrist. My mom would bring up bipolar (since she also has it) and gre would instantly shoot her down, saying that children can't have bipolar disorder. Fast-forward 9 years to when I start seeing a good psychiatrist, she dismisses me with bipolar and starts ne on proper medication. I personally think ADHD should only diagnose after other things have been ruled out, especially in children. Once I was diagnosed with bipolar and narcolepsy, and got onto appropriate meds for both, I could suddenly focus at school (my grades didn't improve much, but that's because I didn't do much homework).
i2303 [info] I feel you. I'm diagnosed with bipolar and, albeit unable to actually provide you with a yes or no answer as I'm not a professional, I must say you check a lot of boxes.I mean, in my experience, although I experienced highs on sexual desire during mania, I never did anything as risky as you described (not judging, I do get what is to lose control) but I heard other people say that's very present in their manic episodes.As for the lack of sleep, that's exactly the same with me: 3-4 hours and I feel like I just came back from a 6 month vacation on the beach.Buying stuff is something for me too, I don't think about it and even though I understand I'm messing up, spending money I don't have always seem like a good idea.Being less inhibited by social rules is also a thing, just like becoming more sociable and talkative and being less afraid of judgment.I didn't see you mention it, but from my experience and from what I hear from others racing thoughs and difficulty concentrating are very consistent with most cases.Despite all that, I must add that mania is different for everyone, so my what I call mania is not in any way a golden standard. Some people get really really aggressive and irritable, some superfocuse at stupid things, some (myself included, but not everytime) experience delusions such as believing you're being watched or followed (I believe that's something that sets apart mania and hypomania, give it a google if it interests you).Again, I am not by any means a professional, but based in my personal experience, I'd say you have a pretty solid case for a manic episode. I like  for related discussions, maybe more people there can relate to you?Anyways, I'd strongly suggest you seek help, as untreated bipolar tends to worsen with time.Hope I helped, take care!
yellowflower15 [info] No meds here... I have bad reactions to each one. Side effects all over the place. I haven't had a manic episode in years just struggle with depression and anxiety now. Meditation helps. Exercise and eating clean. It took me years to accept myself but now I have totally. Good hobbies that I enjoy doing along with good friends goes a long way. I also now microdose which is a massive help. Things can still be a struggle some days more than others but everyone has good and bad days not just those diagnosed with bipolar. My family was never understanding or understood bipolar whichever one and I have this thing with when people say I'm bipolar. I always say I am diagnosed with bipolar. Because I am not bipolar I am me.
Pavelexander [info] Those things aren't something you can get rid of, you can only learn to live with them. I've been a drug addict for the majority of my life and I've been diagnosed with bipolar, Borderline and ptsd. I managed to quit drugs through understanding those conditions, how they effect me and most importantly, what is left of me if you took them away. I can't control my mental illnesses, I still have episodes and it affects not only me but the people around me as well. I still have extreme reactions to random things, sometimes even physical like throwing up from random movie scenes. I still have days when I feel suicidal but through all this, I now have the bigger picture. I understand where this all is coming from and I don't hate myself for it anymore. I have people around me who I can trust and I know that all in all I have a good life even though it momentarily sucks sometimes.I am working hard on myself and as long as I do that I feel content. I don't want to fall back making excuses for myself I don't want to say "because of" I want to say "despite of"
OrangAMA [info] So I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder today, that's pretty much thrown a wrench in my life plans.Since I was a child up until now I've always wanted to be a deputy, I've basically spent my life building up to this but now I am basically disqualified from that. I know it's silly, but for me it feels like if I'm not doing that then I'm a failure. I've even had jobs that make me decent money and that I enjoy but still feel like if I'm not doing law enforcement then I'm not doing a real job if that makes sense. It's really crushing to have basically wasted 10 years working toward this to have my life plan and self worth to basically just be swiped away from me. I was a dispatcher before and managed fine although dispatch wasnt really for me, but mentally I always did fine and never had any problems that affected me on the job. But I understand that this is a deal breaker for most agencies and I understand why and am not trying to argue with that.Does anyone who has been in a similar situation have any advice for getting though this?
KnittedOwl [info] I'm a little younger than you but I've been dealing with mental illness since I was 9. My parents threw me into the psych department of my hospital for "anger issues" that no one could see. I was just a moody kid that didn't like talking to people. I never stopped seeing a therapist and psych. I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder the day I turned 18. Now with a back story where parents seem to think something is wrong, you would think they are supportive of me having a diagnosis but having bipolar might as well have been a death sentence to them. They don't allow me to drink, though I'm 21. They don't allow me to be moody. I've learned to "fake it until I make it" until I reach my room where I lock my door and get to be however I want to be. I've given them the bipolar disorder survival guide book to read. I've had my psych write explanations to them on what I have.I think the biggest thing is that when they grew up, being bipolar was a bigger deal then it is now. People could be put in psych wards for a very long time just for the diagnosis. I have an aunt who was very helpful in explaining it to me. She said "If you had cancer you would get treatment for that right? Your head is just a little sick and it's something people don't understand and will want to say you don't have, just like cancer because it's scary, but that doesn't mean you don't have it. You just keep treating it, going to the doctors and doing what is best for you"In the long run I started ignoring most of what my parent's said that was discouraging including the most recent "you should come off your meds so you can be skinny again" and I'm doing really well. 
Domidoggy8 [info] Not married yet (wedding was supposed to be in 2 weeks, postponed due to COVID-19) but engaged for 2 years and together for 6 years. We're happy and are actually finding that the shelter-in-place order is improving our relationship. 😂 That all being said, I was diagnosed with bipolar about a year into our engagement. I really got stuck on the statistics of a successful marriage while bipolar. I decided I needed to seek out therapy to help me decide if I should go forth with marriage. The counselor helped me to see that the fears were all unfounded and due to my insecurities with my diagnosis.My grandparents also had a successful marriage despite my grandfather being bipolar. It wasn't always roses, I can attest to that, but they stuck it out and were married for more than 40 years.
rachiedoubt [info] I have been diagnosed with bipolar 2 and PMDD in the past. I also have PTSD and anxiety and reproductive issues, so there are a lot of factors. I honesty feel like my severe hormonal fluctuations/reactions trigger bipolar stuff. I ALWAYS get hypomanic around ovulation, then crash back to depression again.  Every time. I do think mine are connected but I’m not sure how it works, or if that’s even how it works.
Rachell10 [info] It sounds like it could be possible for sure. Definitely talk to your therapist or doctor since they would know your history better and the right questions to ask. For me I was always confused why I could be completely on top of the world, stay up for days, etc and then a couple weeks later be literally in bed all day wanting to kill myself. After a suicide attempt I landed myself in the hospital initially diagnosed with depression, then after working with a psychiatrist for another 6 months they noticed that I have patterns of mania and depression and that is when I was diagnosed with bipolar. Definitely bring up that you think it could possibly be bipolar and give them your own personal situations which have made you come to that possible realization. This will definitely prompt them to consider that option and have a discussion with you about it. It’s definitely important to have the self awareness to recognize how you’re feeling and patterns (as it seems you’re doing well with) to discuss with your doctor. Personally I always like to write things down on a paper before I go see my doctor or else I sometimes forget to say certain things or I get nervous and it all comes out of my mouth all jumbled.
curley34 [info] I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder with paranoia a few weeks ago and I’m in the process of getting meds. Maybe that’s something you could look into? I knew there was a problem for a while and avoided going to the doctor because I didn’t want to be diagnosed with any thing. I found out that the diagnosis actually made me feel relieved knowing that the problem had been identified and there was steps I could take to fix it.
Mariconi13 [info] I have been diagnosed with bipolar disorder. It might have to do with my childhood but still not sure to be honest.
_hangingByAMoment [info] [CN] but follow up question, does this happen to him often? He might have some condition that makes him behave this way. It’s kind of odd, although a funny storyI have been diagnosed with bipolar disorder, and I do things like this sometimes when I behave impulsively and end up in weird situations
